   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

The Rohingya Crisis

   A group of Rohingya refugees after crossing the Bangladesh-Myanmar
   border, September 1, 2017. Mohammad Ponir Hossain/Reuters

   Hundreds of thousands of Rohingya, a Muslim ethnic minority group, are
   fleeing persecution in Myanmar’s western Rakhine State, fueling a
   historic migration crisis.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert and Andrew Chatzky

   Last updated December 5, 2018
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print
   A group of Rohingya refugees after crossing the Bangladesh-Myanmar
   border, September 1, 2017. Mohammad Ponir Hossain/Reuters

   Backgrounder
          Current political and economic issues succinctly explained.

Introduction

   Discriminatory policies of Myanmar’s government since the late 1970s
   have compelled hundreds of thousands of Muslim Rohingya to flee their
   homes in the predominantly Buddhist country. Most have crossed by land
   into Bangladesh, while others have taken to the sea to reach Indonesia,
   Malaysia, and Thailand.
   More From Our Experts
   Shannon K. O'Neil
   China’s Manufacturing Loss Should Be Mexico’s Gain
   Edward Alden
   The Next Stage of the U.S.-China Trade War Will Be Much Worse
   Meighan Stone
   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries

   Beginning in 2017, renewed violence, including reported rape, murder,
   and arson, triggered an exodus of Rohingya amid charges of ethnic
   cleansing against Myanmar’s security forces. Those forces claim they
   are carrying out a campaign to reinstate stability in the western
   region of Myanmar, but international pressure on the country’s elected
   leaders to rein in violence continues to rise.

Who are the Rohingya?

   More on:

   Myanmar

   Rohingya

   Refugees and Displaced Persons

   Aung San Suu Kyi

   Humanitarian Crises

   The Rohingya are an ethnic Muslim minority who practice a
   Sufi-inflected variation of Sunni Islam. There are an estimated 3.5
   million Rohingya dispersed worldwide. Before August 2017, the majority
   of the estimated one million Rohingya in Myanmar resided in Rakhine
   State, where they accounted for nearly a third of the population. They
   differ from Myanmar’s dominant Buddhist groups ethnically,
   linguistically, and religiously.

   The Rohingya trace their origins in the region to the fifteenth
   century, when thousands of Muslims came to the former Arakan Kingdom.
   Many others arrived during the nineteenth and early twentieth
   centuries, when Rakhine was governed by colonial rule as part of
   British India. Since independence in 1948, successive governments in
   Burma, renamed Myanmar in 1989, have refuted the Rohingya’s historical
   claims and denied the group recognition as one of the country’s 135
   official ethnic groups. The Rohingya are considered illegal immigrants
   from Bangladesh, even though many trace their roots in Myanmar back
   centuries.

   Neither the central government nor Rakhine’s dominant ethnic Buddhist
   group, known as the Rakhine, recognize the label “Rohingya,”
   a self-identifying term that surfaced in the 1950s, which experts say
   provides the group with a collective political identity. Though the
   etymological root of the word is disputed, the most widely accepted
   theory is that Rohang derives from the word “Arakan” in the Rohingya
   dialect and ga or gya means “from.” By identifying as Rohingya, the
   ethnic Muslim group asserts its ties to land that was once under the
   control of the Arakan Kingdom, according to Chris Lewa, director of the
   Arakan Project, a Thailand-based advocacy group.
   More From Our Experts
   Shannon K. O'Neil
   China’s Manufacturing Loss Should Be Mexico’s Gain
   Edward Alden
   The Next Stage of the U.S.-China Trade War Will Be Much Worse
   Meighan Stone
   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries
   Map of Rohingya migration routes
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Share Share

What is the legal status of the Rohingya?

   The government refuses to grant the Rohingya citizenship, and as a
   result most of the group’s members have no legal documentation,
   effectively making them stateless. Myanmar’s 1948 citizenship law was
   already exclusionary, and the military junta, which seized power in
   1962, introduced another law twenty years later that stripped the
   Rohingya of access to full citizenship. Until recently, the Rohingya
   had been able to register as temporary residents with identification
   cards, known as white cards, which the junta began issuing to many
   Muslims, both Rohingya and non-Rohingya, in the 1990s. The white
   cards conferred limited rights but were not recognized as proof of
   citizenship. Still, Lewa says that they did provide some recognition of
   temporary stay for the Rohingya in Myanmar.

   In 2014 the government held a UN-backed national census, its first in
   thirty years. The Muslim minority group was initially permitted to
   identify as Rohingya, but after Buddhist nationalists threatened to
   boycott the census, the government decided Rohingya could only register
   if they identified as Bengali instead.

   More on:

   Myanmar

   Rohingya

   Refugees and Displaced Persons

   Aung San Suu Kyi

   Humanitarian Crises

   Similarly, under pressure from Buddhist nationalists protesting the
   Rohingya’s right to vote in a 2015 constitutional referendum, then
   President Thein Sein canceled the temporary identity cards in February
   2015, effectively revoking their newly gained right to vote. (White
   card holders were allowed to vote in Myanmar’s 2008 constitutional
   referendum and 2010 general elections.) In the 2015 elections, which
   were widely touted by international monitors as free and fair, no
   parliamentary candidate was of the Muslim faith.
   “Country-wide anti-Muslim sentiment makes it politically difficult for
   the government to take steps seen as supportive of Muslim rights,”
   writes the International Crisis Group.

   Muslim minorities continue to “consolidate under one Rohingya
   identity,” says Lewa, despite documentation by rights groups and
   researchers of systematic disenfranchisement, violence, and instances
   of anti-Muslim campaigns [PDF].

Why are the Rohingya fleeing Myanmar?

     Rakhine State is Myanmar’s least developed state, with a poverty
     rate of 78 percent.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   The Myanmar government has effectively institutionalized discrimination
   against the ethnic group through restrictions on marriage, family
   planning, employment, education, religious choice, and freedom of
   movement. For example, Rohingya couples in the northern towns of
   Maungdaw and Buthidaung are only allowed to have two children [PDF].
   Rohingya must also seek permission to marry, which may require them to
   bribe authorities and provide photographs of the bride without a
   headscarf and the groom with a clean-shaven face, practices that
   conflict with Muslim customs. To move to a new home or travel outside
   their townships, Rohingya must gain government approval.

   Moreover, Rakhine State is Myanmar’s least developed state, with a
   poverty rate of 78 percent, compared to the 37.5 percent national
   average, according to World Bank estimates. Widespread poverty, poor
   infrastructure, and a lack of employment opportunities in Rakhine have
   exacerbated the cleavage between Buddhists and Muslim Rohingya. This
   tension is deepened by religious differences that have at times erupted
   into conflict.
   slideshow

The Rohingya Crisis: Expulsion and Exodus

   (BUTTON) View slideshow
   Anjuman Para

What’s caused the recent exodus?

   Clashes in Rakhine broke out in August 2017, after a militant group
   known as the Arakan Rohingya Salvation Army (ARSA) claimed
   responsibility for attacks on police and army posts. The government
   declared ARSA a terrorist organization and the military mounted
   a brutal campaign that destroyed hundreds of Rohingya villages and
   forced nearly seven hundred thousand Rohingya to leave Myanmar. At
   least 6,700 Rohingya were killed in the first month of attacks, between
   August 25 and September 24, 2017, according to the international
   medical charity Doctors Without Borders. Myanmar’s security forces also
   allegedly opened fire on fleeing civilians and planted land mines near
   border crossings used by Rohingya to flee to Bangladesh.

   Since the start of 2018, Myanmar authorities have reportedly cleared
   abandoned Rohingya villages [PDF] and farmlands to build homes,
   security bases, and infrastructure. The government says this
   development is in preparation for the repatriation of refugees, but
   rights activists have expressed concern these moves could be intended
   to accommodate other populations in Rakhine State. Furthermore, some
   have raised doubts that the government’s tactics have been in response
   to ARSA attacks, with reports showing that the military began
   implementing its policies nearly a year before ARSA struck.

     Security campaigns in the past five years, notably in 2012 and 2016,
     also resulted in the flight of tens of thousands of Rohingya from
     their homes.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   UN Secretary-General Antonio Guterres has described the violence as
   ethnic cleansing and the humanitarian situation as catastrophic. Rights
   groups and other UN leaders suspect acts of genocide have taken place.
   At an emergency UN Security Council meeting, U.S. Ambassador to the
   United Nations Nikki Haley said Myanmar authorities have carried out a
   “brutal, sustained campaign to cleanse the country of an ethnic
   minority,” and she called on members to suspend weapons provisions to
   the military. Other Security Council members, including Russia and
   China, have resisted increasing pressure on Myanmar’s government
   because they say it is trying to restore stability.

   Sectarian violence is not new to Rakhine State. Security campaigns in
   the past five years, notably in 2012 and 2016, also resulted in the
   flight of tens of thousands of Rohingya from their homes.

Where are the Rohingya migrating?

     * Bangladesh: Most Rohingya have sought refuge in nearby Bangladesh,
       which has limited resources and land to host refugees. More than
       1.1 million people are refugees in the country, according to
       Bangladeshi authorities. The World Health Organization projects
       the birth of sixty thousand babies in Bangladesh’s crowded camps in
       2018. Meanwhile, the risk of disease outbreak in camps is high,
       with health organizations warning of possible outbreaks of measles,
       tetanus, diphtheria, and acute jaundice syndrome. Moreover, more
       than 60 percent of the available water supply in refugee camps is
       contaminated, increasing the risk of spread of communicable and
       water-borne diseases. Vulnerable refugees have turned to smugglers,
       paying for transport out of Bangladesh and Myanmar and risking
       exploitation, including sexual enslavement. In November 2017,
       Myanmar and Bangladesh signed a deal for the possible repatriation
       of hundreds of thousands of refugees, though details remained vague
       and the plan was postponed. Planned repatriations were delayed
       repeatedly throughout 2018.
     * Malaysia: As of October 2018, eighty thousand Rohingya were in
       Malaysia, according to the United Nations, though tens of thousands
       of others are in the country unregistered. Rohingya who arrive
       safely in Malaysia have no legal status and are unable to work,
       leaving their families cut off from access to education and health
       care.
     * Thailand: Thailand is a hub for regional human smuggling and serves
       as a common transit point for Rohingya. Migrants often arrive there
       by boat from Bangladesh or Myanmar before continuing on foot to
       Malaysia or by boat to Indonesia or Malaysia. The military-led Thai
       government has cracked down on smuggling rings after the discovery
       of mass graves in alleged camps where gangs held hostages. But some
       experts say that while punishing traffickers disrupts the networks,
       it does not dismantle them.
     * Indonesia: The Rohingya have also sought refuge in Indonesia,
       although the number of refugees from Myanmar there remains
       relatively small because they are treated as illegal immigrants.
       Indonesia has rescued migrant boats off its shores and dispatched
       humanitarian aid and supplies to Bangladesh’s camps. Indonesian
       President Joko Widodo pledged more help during a visit to refugee
       camps in Bangladesh in January 2018.

Has civilian leadership changed the Myanmar government’s policies?

   In 2016, Myanmar’s first democratically elected government in a
   generation came to power, but critics say it has been reluctant to
   advocate for Rohingya and other Muslims for fear of alienating Buddhist
   nationalists and threatening the power-sharing agreement the civilian
   government maintains with the military.

   Some observers saw the establishment in August 2016 of an advisory
   commission on ethnic strife led by former UN Secretary-General Kofi
   Annan as a positive development. However, subsequent outbreaks of
   violence and several long-simmering conflicts between other ethnically
   based insurgent groups and the government have curbed this optimism.

   Aung San Suu Kyi, Myanmar’s de facto leader, has denied that ethnic
   cleansing is taking place and dismissed international criticism of her
   handling of the crisis, accusing critics of fueling resentment between
   Buddhists and Muslims in the country. In September 2017, the Nobel
   Peace Prize laureate said her government had “already started
   defending all the people in Rakhine in the best way possible.” That
   December, the Myanmar government denied access to the UN special
   rapporteur on human rights in Myanmar, Yanghee Lee, and suspended
   cooperation for the remainder of her term. Nevertheless, in September
   2018 the UN’s fact-finding panel released a report recommending
   Myanmar’s army leaders be referred to the International Criminal Court
   (ICC) and urging the UN Security Council to impose arms embargoes and
   sanctions.

How is the region responding?

   Protesters have at times gathered in cities in Pakistan,
   India, Thailand, Indonesia, and Bangladesh to condemn the killing and
   persecution of Rohingya. Bangladesh’s foreign minister condemned the
   violence in Rakhine as “genocide” in September 2017 and Indonesia and
   Malaysia called on the Myanmar authorities to halt their campaign and
   bring an end to the violence. Bangladesh and Myanmar have held
   bilateral discussions aimed at repatriating the Rohingya and
   guaranteeing their rights in Myanmar, but these have been ad hoc and
   have yet to produce a breakthrough.

   In October 2018, authorities in Bangladesh and Myanmar agreed to
   repatriate several thousand Rohingya but offered few specifics on how
   those refugees would be selected. Human Rights Watch suggested that
   those slated for repatriation had not volunteered, but rather were
   chosen at random by Bangladeshi authorities. Moreover, Myanmar
   officials did not specify whether returning refugees would be granted
   full citizenship rights, including freedom of movement.

   Alongside criticism of the plan from the United States and human rights
   groups, the United Nations urged a cancelation and warned that
   conditions in Myanmar were still unsafe for Rohingya. Ultimately, the
   Rohingya in Bangladesh refused to return until their citizenship rights
   were guaranteed. Experts say the Bangladeshi government must decide
   whether to continue to struggle to provide shelter for so many refugees
   or expel them and draw the ire of Western governments and aid
   organizations.

   Other governments in Southeast Asia generally lack established legal
   frameworks to protect refugees’ rights, and the ten members of the
   Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) have not coordinated a
   response to the deepening crisis. Indonesia, Malaysia, Myanmar, and
   Thailand—all ASEAN members—have yet to ratify the UN refugee convention
   or its protocol. ASEAN itself has been mostly silent on the plight of
   the Rohingya and on the growing numbers of asylum seekers in member
   countries, largely because of its members’ commitment to the principle
   of noninterference in each other’s internal affairs. “They aren’t going
   to take collective action on Myanmar, with Myanmar as one of its
   members,” says CFR’s Joshua Kurlantzick.

How has the rest of the world responded?

   In December 2016, U.S. President Barack Obama lifted sanctions against
   Myanmar, saying it had made strides in improving human rights. The move
   came amid a crackdown on Rohingya and was criticized by some as
   premature. A year later, new U.S. sanctions were imposed against a
   Myanmar general for his alleged role in the military’s attacks in
   Rakhine, and the U.S. government has continued to widen its sanctions
   regime on Myanmar military commanders in 2018, as evidence of the
   military’s atrocities mounts.

   Meanwhile, countries including the United States, Canada, Norway,
   and South Korea, as well as international donors, have upped their
   humanitarian assistance as the flow of Rohingya to Bangladesh has
   grown, and in early 2018 a team of UK medics led an emergency
   response to help stem the spread of disease in camps. The United
   Nations has requested $951 million in immediate relief funds [PDF] for
   2018. At the November 2018 ASEAN summit, U.S. Vice President Mike Pence
   ramped up pressure on Suu Kyi, saying that Myanmar’s “violence and
   persecution” toward the Rohingya were inexcusable.

   Advocacy groups including Human Rights Watch, Amnesty International,
   the Arakan Project, and Fortify Rights continue to appeal for
   international pressure on Myanmar’s government. In November 2018,
   Amnesty International stripped Suu Kyi of the Ambassador of Conscience
   Award it had conferred on her during her fifteen-year house arrest.
   Earlier in the year, the ICC’s chief prosecutor launched an
   investigation into alleged war crimes that forced the exodus of
   Rohingya.

   Still, resentment of the minority group has run deep for generations.
   Without overhauling “a culture of pervasive prejudice” and ensuring
   that Rohingya are treated as human beings, the situation in Rakhine
   State is unlikely to improve, says journalist and author Francis Wade.

Resources

   This 2018 Amnesty International report documents infrastructure
   development [PDF] on land abandoned by the Rohingya.

   This New York Times interactive demonstrates the exodus of Rohingya
   from Myanmar to Bangladesh.

   Francis Wade discusses the division of power in Myanmar between the
   civilian government and military in a CFR interview.

   Reuters illustrates the ballooning of camps along the
   Bangladesh-Myanmar border.

   A CFR Backgrounder charts Myanmar’s political evolution.

Explore More on Myanmar

   Southeast Asia

   While Bangladesh and Myanmar Plan Rohingya Repatriation, Rohingya in
   Myanmar Remain at Grave Risk

   Blog Post by Joshua Kurlantzick September 26, 2019 Asia Unbound

   Southeast Asia

   What Happens if Rohingya Stay in Bangladesh Forever?

   Blog Post by Joshua Kurlantzick September 4, 2019 Asia Unbound

   Southeast Asia

   The United Nations’ Failures in Myanmar: Lessons Learned?

   Blog Post by Joshua Kurlantzick July 10, 2019 Asia Unbound

Top Stories on CFR

   Sanctions

   What Are Economic Sanctions?
   For many policymakers, economic sanctions have become the tool of
   choice to respond to major geopolitical challenges such as terrorism
   and conflict.

   Backgrounder by Jonathan Masters August 12, 2019

   China

   Is China Manipulating Its Currency?
   The Trump administration has declared China a currency manipulator, but
   what that means for the ongoing trade war is far from clear.

   In Brief by Brad W. Setser August 8, 2019

   Women and Economic Growth

   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries
   The education gender gap costs the world between $15 trillion and $30
   trillion in human capital. U.S. aid programs need to equip girls and
   women to participate in the modern digital economy.

   Policy Innovation Memorandum by Meighan Stone and Rachel B. Vogelstein
   August 7, 2019 Women and Foreign Policy Program

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

   Public Health
   Daniel Becerril/Reuters

   Public Health Threats and Pandemics

   The E-cigarette Backlash
   An outbreak of a lung illness linked to vaping is raising concern
   worldwide and putting pressure on countries to rein in the booming
   e-cigarette industry.

   In Brief by Claire Felter October 2, 2019


   Vaping on the Rise in U.S., Especially Among Young People

   via Pew Research Center September 26, 2019


   The Mysterious Vaping Illness That’s ‘Becoming an Epidemic’

   via New York Times September 11, 2019
   Central America
   John Moore/Getty Images

   El Salvador

   The Troubled Northern Triangle
   The United States is struggling to respond to the latest wave of
   migrants fleeing poverty, violence, and corruption in El Salvador,
   Guatemala, and Honduras.

   Backgrounder by Amelia Cheatham October 1, 2019


   Congress Can Hold Trump Accountable on Honduras

   by Paul J. Angelo via The Hill September 18, 2019


   American Cities Reduced Violence—Will the Same Strategies Work in the
   Northern Triangle?

   by Steven Dudley via Foreign Affairs August 22, 2019
   Hong Kong

   Hong Kong

   An Economic Solution for Hong Kong
   After months of large-scale protests in Hong Kong, the city’s future as
   a bridge between mainland China and the outside world is in serious
   jeopardy. Fortunately, all sides share an interest in pursuing more
   inclusive growth within the “one country, two systems” framework that
   has been critical to Hong Kong’s success.

   by A. Michael Spence September 30, 2019

   China

   Democracy in Hong Kong
   As China’s power continues to grow, some fear that the considerable
   autonomy Hong Kong has enjoyed over the last three decades could slip
   away.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert September 30, 2019


   How China Sees the Hong Kong Crisis

   by Andrew J. Nathan via Foreign Affairs September 30, 2019
   China

   China

   Communist China’s Painful Human Rights Story
   The Chinese Communist Party has used arbitrary detention to maintain
   power since the People’s Republic of China was founded seventy years
   ago.

   by Jerome A. Cohen September 26, 2019


   The Problem With Xi’s China Model

   by Elizabeth C. Economy via Foreign Affairs March 6, 2019

   China

   The Chinese Communist Party
   The Chinese Communist Party faces a host of pressing domestic and
   international policy challenges as it transitions to a new generation
   of leaders.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert and Beina Xu September 27, 2019
   United States

   Politics and Government

   The Impeachment Inquiry: What to Know

   Blog Post by James M. Lindsay September 25, 2019 The Water's Edge


   Read the Released Whistleblower Complaint

   via U.S. House Intelligence Committee September 26, 2019


   The Other Ukraine Scandal: Trump’s Threats to Our Ambassador Who
   Wouldn’t Bend

   by Philip H. Gordon and Daniel Fried via Washington Post September 29,
   2019
   United Nations

   Donald Trump

   Stressing ‘Nation’ at UN General Assembly
   Though Trump’s tone was solemn and even-keeled, the overall thrust of
   his UN General Assembly speech was of transactional nationalism,
   emphasizing the importance of pursuing national interests and combating
   globalism.

   Blog Post by Stewart M. Patrick September 24, 2019 The Internationalist


   ‘America First’ Means a Retreat From Foreign Conflicts

   by Charles A. Kupchan via Foreign Affairs September 26, 2019


   Read President Trump’s Remarks at the UN General Assembly

   via White House September 25, 2019

CFR on the Record

   View All

   United Nations

   A Conversation With Minister Adel al-Jubeir of Saudi Arabia
   For further reading, please see the CFR In Brief “Trump’s Iran-Saudi
   Arabia Dilemma” by Philip H. Gordon, the CFR blog post “Scale and
   Nature of Attacks on Saudi Oil Makes This One Different” by Amy M.
   Jaffe, and the CFR quiz “See How Much You Know About Saudi Arabia.”

   Event with Adel al-Jubeir September 24, 2019

   Pakistan

   A Conversation With Prime Minister Imran Khan of Pakistan
   Prime Minister Imran Khan discusses the current state of U.S.-Pakistan
   relations, recent developments in the disputed region of Kashmir, and
   Pakistan’s relationship with India, Afghanistan, and other neighboring
   countries.

   Event with Imran Khan September 23, 2019

   United States

   CEO Speaker Series With Randall Stephenson
   Randall Stephenson discusses his business strategy and lessons learned
   from leading AT&T. The CEO Speaker Series is a unique forum for leading
   global CEOs to share their insights on issues at the center of commerce
   and foreign policy, and to discuss the changing role of business
   globally. HAASS: Well, good afternoon. Welcome to the Council on
   Foreign Relations. I’m Richard Haass, president of the Council, and
   today we have one of our meetings in the series on CEO speakers. It is
   on the record. Anything you say can and will be used against you.
   STEPHENSON: I didn’t know that. I want to dismiss myself. (Laughter.)
   HAASS: Do you want to leave now? We are pleased to welcome Randall
   Stephenson of AT&T to the Council for a conversation. He has been
   chairman and CEO for more than a decade now, twelve years give or take.
   STEPHENSON: Sounds like fifteen minutes underwater. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Well, hopefully this won’t. He’s, obviously, been involved directly and
   personally in any number of consequential decisions, most recently with
   the acquisition of Time Warner. I should also say that AT&T’s been
   generous, committing over a billion dollars over his years to a variety
   of education, retraining, and diversity initiatives, some within the
   company, some beyond the company. Full disclosure—important to give
   that—they’re a corporate member here at the Council on Foreign
   Relations, as was Time Warner in its—when it was an independent
   company. What we are going to do is Mr. Stephenson and I are going to
   have a conversation for a few minutes. Then we’ll open it up to you,
   our members, to ask the tough questions that I didn’t have the wit to
   ask. Let me just—thirty-second plug for the Council on Foreign
   Relations. Just this morning we issued our most recent task force
   report, Innovation and National Security: Keeping Our Edge. And I
   commend it to anyone in this room and beyond because it’s a real
   emphasis on what we need to do here at home, and that one can’t ask
   everything of our diplomats or our military. There are certain things
   we have to do as a society in order to put ourselves in a position
   where we can do what we need to to look after all aspects of our
   national security. So again, I really recommend it to you. Thanks for
   coming today. STEPHENSON: Good to be here. Thanks for having me. Happy
   to. HAASS: So let’s begin with China. I’ve been in this business a
   while, and I can’t think of another major relationship with the United
   States that has changed, and to give a sense of directionality,
   deteriorated as quickly and as dramatically as the U.S.-China
   relationship has in the last couple of years. And everyone decries the
   lack of bipartisanship in Washington; this is actually fairly
   bipartisan. If you listened to the Democratic debate the other night,
   the anti-China rhetoric was pretty—was pretty robust. What has been
   your experience with China? I mean, for example, a couple of questions
   come to mind. One, do you—are you aware that they’ve taken your
   technology? Have you—have you had a problem with that with China? I
   know you’re doing business with Huawei in places like Mexico. What
   has—what has been your experience with them? Have they been essentially
   a good partner or something less? STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) One of the
   companies over in China that’s a large-scale creator of—builder of
   telecommunication equipment, one of the first products they ever put
   out, and did quite well with, was a very close replica of a PBX back in
   the old days, in the 1960s, that was made by AT&T. (Laughs.) HAASS:
   What a coincidence. STEPHENSON: It was, probably coincidental.
   (Laughter.) So in terms of firsthand experience, you know, we’ve had
   our share of, you know, challenges and concerns in that regard. In
   terms of, you know, implications to AT&T specifically, we’ve had few
   issues because by and large we’re not allowed to do business there. We
   are prohibited from doing business. Now, we do have some points of
   presence and so forth. We’re allowed to do some things, carry traffic
   for customers. But we’ve had very little, little experience doing
   business within China. Now that has changed, obviously, with the
   acquisition of Time Warner. You know, Aquaman did $600 million before
   it got to the shores of the United States, and so that’s changing a
   little bit with this acquisition. But you know, my main thoughts as it
   relates to China is just what’s happening just domestically
   economically here in the United States as a result of what’s recently
   transpired, because I was one of the zealots, biggest supporters in
   terms of some of the economic policies of this administration. But all
   of these positives that have been generated over the last couple of
   years—predominantly business investment, which had been growing 6, 7
   percent year over year just consecutively like clockwork since the tax
   reform went in on corporations—we’re now in a manufacturing recession.
   And it’s—if you had to point your finger at, you know, something, it
   would be one of two things. It would be the Chinese situation and the
   Mexico situation. HAASS: Because it’s probably not that interest rates
   are not low enough. STEPHENSON: I don’t think anybody’s having trouble
   accessing capital right now, yeah. HAASS: (Laughs.) STEPHENSON:
   Accessing capital is not an issue. HAASS: If we end up in a world where
   we have, if not divorce, separation from China, and fairly separate
   supply lines and markets, and a lack of technology sharing, how much
   more difficult does that make business for you, or not? I mean, like if
   we end up in a slightly bifurcated world, what does it mean for a large
   company like yours? STEPHENSON: Yeah, I— HAASS: Does it make a
   difference? STEPHENSON: Yeah, it makes a heck of a difference. I think
   it makes a heck of a difference just on the United States, and a
   company like ours is dependent upon the health and vibrancy of the
   United States economy. And if you end up in a place where it’s—I don’t
   believe it’s China and the rest of the world; I think it’s China and
   others and the rest of the world, one could argue maybe some—to some
   extent it’s East versus West. And when you think about where is the
   growth in the global economy, you know, Asia is where the growth is.
   HAASS: Where the people are. STEPHENSON: And so if you’re a U.S.
   economy—and we just had this conversation; 5 percent of the population,
   20, 25 percent of the world’s economy—you’re kind of dependent upon
   trade if you want to keep growing your 25 percent share. And so a world
   where you are cut off from a significant amount of global growth, from
   our standpoint that’s a problem. And so where do you have to look, you
   know, Africa? Well, China’s doing a lot in Africa. I don’t know how
   this bifurcation happens. Perhaps Latin America we could do well with.
   But yeah, it’s disconcerting for a company that’s dependent upon U.S.
   growth. HAASS: One last thing that’s related to China. If there’s a
   trade deal with China, I think it’s possible to include things like
   market access and the Chinese will make certain commitments, again, on
   technology and the rest. The one area I can’t see a trade deal really
   accomplishing is a—is anything that would have a major reduction in
   Chinese subsidies from the state to their state-owned enterprises. And
   one of the areas that would, obviously, have consequences for would be
   things like 5G. Would you be happy with a trade deal that didn’t tackle
   the state subsidy issue, or do you just assume it won’t? STEPHENSON:
   I’m skeptical that a trade deal could be reached that would
   address—you’ve termed state subsidy. Let me just term—use the
   terminology just subsidy in general, because I don’t know how you
   enforce it. So, for example, the way some of the subsidies seem to work
   in China—everybody’s familiar with our industry and Huawei and what
   they do in China. And to put this into perspective, if Huawei could
   achieve in China a 90 percent share of Chinese communications, market
   share, they by definition have 30 to 40 percent global share. That’s a
   big deal. Now, if they could get another 10, 20 percent outside of
   China and start to get 40, 50 percent global share, this is a problem.
   This is a problem for the West. This is a problem for Western supply
   chain. How could they get that other 10 to 20 percent share around the
   globe? You talk about subsidies. I mean, it’s real easy to conceive of
   a situation where a Chinese communications company puts out a bid,
   Huawei bids at a premium to what everybody else bids, and Huawei wins
   it. They have 90 percent share in China. Now they go bid in Europe,
   what do you think happens? The flip. They bid at 20, 30 percent
   discounts to everybody else, and so as a result they start taking
   significant share outside of China. You go to Latin America, these
   shares are really high. Go to Africa; Huawei shares are really high.
   Europe, I mean, for heaven’s sake, there are many countries in Europe
   where they have 40 and 50 percent share. And so this company is gaining
   significant share in mobile technology around the world. And this is—if
   you don’t mind me just kind of bridging real briefly, they’ve gained
   this share in a world of 4G, fourth-generation technology. You go,
   well, OK, fine, but what about 5G? They’ve been very smart. They do not
   allow interoperability of their 4G equipment to their 5G equipment. So
   if you get 40 to 50 percent global share of 4G technology, guess what
   you’ve ensured yourself for 5G? Forty to 50 percent 5G market share.
   This is something that we in the West need to be conscious of and aware
   of. And while I don’t always endorse the approaches of our
   administration, I think the mindset, the thought process, the concern
   is probably on target. HAASS: Let me return to that in a few minutes,
   but let me—I want to touch on a couple of other subjects before we open
   it up. I want to talk about corporate America for a second. I assume
   many people in the room saw the Business Roundtable statement. I think
   you were one of the signatories. Essentially, the message was
   shareholder return can’t be our only preoccupation; we’ve got to have a
   wider sense of constituencies and stakeholders. But how do you
   navigate—it’s one thing to say that, but then you’ve got your quarterly
   reports. You’ve got something called Mr. Market that’s looking at you
   on a regular basis. How do you navigate a world where on one hand
   people are saying you’ve got to be sensitive to multiple
   constituencies, but—it’s a big “but”—we still care about your bottom
   line as shareholders? Is this an impossible dual mandate? STEPHENSON:
   No, I don’t—I don’t think it is at all. I mean, a lot of the media—the
   Wall Street Journal hyperventilated over it, and—that how can this be
   the case. I would represent that this is not anything new. If you
   really want to have a sustainable business model, sustainable what I’ll
   call free markets, you better be mindful and you better be cautious
   about things like supply chains, diversity, communities, and so forth.
   I just believe that if you’re not you have fracturing in a society, if
   corporations just run oblivious to that. You have to be mindful about
   your employees. I mean, how can you possibly expect to have a
   sustainable, profitable business over time if you’re ignoring all of
   these other variables? And so to me it’s the most logical thing in the
   world to think that the purpose of a corporation is to serve all those
   constituencies if you want to have a true sustainable model. HAASS:
   Keep moving around. AI, robotics, autonomous vehicles, this is the
   world we’re living in. You’ve established yourself—you being AT&T—as
   one of the leaders in the corporate world with reskilling, with
   training, education. If I’ve got it right, you basically go to your
   workforce in some cases and say you’re in a job, you’re doing great;
   the problem is this job is not going to exist in a year. What have—what
   have you learned from this? What’s working and what’s not working in
   terms of transitioning your workforce from today to tomorrow? What’s
   been your—what’s been your experience? STEPHENSON: What works is, first
   of all, making sure your employees understand how the world is
   changing. I mean, there has to be an awareness among your employees in
   terms of what is happening. Where are the jobs going? What jobs are
   going to be relevant three, five years from now, and what jobs are
   disappearing? And the one thing that—I wish I could take credit for
   this—our HR folks did was that starting point is out in our HR systems,
   when you go look at a particular job opening, it shows you what
   direction are those jobs going. Are they going up or are they going
   down? And if it’s a job where the number—the demands for the job are
   actually increasing, that’s heightening. That’s an awareness. That’s a
   really important thing. And so that’s a really important variable. And
   it seems basic, but a lot of people miss this. And so the employee
   understands this is where this thing is going. And you could think of
   the kind of areas; if I’m a telephone repairman, you know, and I go and
   click on for an opening, they’re going to see that that thing is doing
   this. You probably ought to be aware that’s not a kind of job that you
   want to be moving into. HAASS: Where does the CEO fit on that?
   (Laughter.) Sorry, cheap shot. (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, I don’t
   know that most people want it, to be honest with you. (Laughter.) But
   the other thing is, do you make it really, really easy for the
   employees to know what is required for the jobs they want to seek? And
   that sounds easy too, but you know, here are the certifications that
   are required, and if you want these certifications here’s where you go
   to get those certifications. Click this, this, this, take these
   classes, do this training, and now you are qualified for this job. And
   you can begin to truly move people—it doesn’t happen overnight, but you
   can truly begin to move people into the new world and into the new
   jobs, and it takes a period of time. I would say—we started this seven
   years ago and we said this is probably one of the most difficult
   logistical things we’ve ever tackled. And we build big networks and,
   you know, we do big logistical challenges, and this was one of the more
   difficult ones we took on. And I reflect back over seven years, and I
   have to say this is one of the areas that I take most satisfaction in
   over the last seven years, is how this has moved and transformed a
   workforce. HAASS: Let’s talk about healthcare for a second. You know,
   this country spends roughly—close to a fifth of its GDP in the area of
   healthcare. I don’t know the details of your program. STEPHENSON:
   Five-and-a-half billion dollars. HAASS: OK. So, again talking about the
   recent Democratic debates, a large number of the Democratic candidates
   are talking about some version of a large public option, in some cases
   taking away a private option. As someone who is spending this, you have
   hundreds of thousands of employees, what is your sense of where you
   want the government to go with healthcare? STEPHENSON: You know, look,
   if I were just saying purely financially motivated, government just
   takes over healthcare? Wow. I mean, five-and-a-half billion dollars a
   year we spend on it, right? That seems like an unlikely scenario, and I
   don’t think that it’s a scenario that is in the best interests of our
   employees. I do think we have to have a really vibrant, good, healthy
   safety net and access for people who are in areas of the economy where
   they can’t get healthcare. I’m all in and I’m all-in supportive of
   that. But the idea that the government is going to take over providing
   health care for—we insure I think somewhere around a million-and-a-half
   lives between retirees and actives. And taking that and dumping into a
   government system—that’s just one company—feels like a really, really
   big deal. And you know I don’t know. Some would say it’s too
   paternalistic, but I worry about the healthcare for our employees. We
   do a lot not just to control costs; we do a lot to ensure that our
   employees live healthy lifestyles—productivity, just their own
   longevity, et cetera. And once you start kind of abdicating that
   responsibility from companies, where does that lead you in terms of the
   general health of your employee body? I think it’s important that we as
   CEOs and companies have a vested interest in the health of our people.
   I think it’s a good thing. I think it’s a productive thing for society.
   HAASS: We actually practice that here, so we feel good about it. One of
   the—another area of emerging bipartisanship is hostility or
   questioning—I’ll make—I’ll dial it down a bit—towards big technology
   companies. Motivations may be different between the left and the right,
   but we see—whether it’s antitrust-based or regulation-based, we see the
   environment in which technology companies are operating in, clearly the
   temperature’s changing on that. STEPHENSON: Oh, boy. HAASS: What’s your
   reading of that, whether this would be welcome, or in some areas it
   might, in some areas it wouldn’t? To what extent are you concerned or
   potentially relieved that the government may be moving in this
   direction? STEPHENSON: I’m never one to wave a flag say go regulate or
   take on antitrust efforts on other companies. It’s just kind of against
   my nature. But it’s—it is interesting, and probably even ironic, that
   for twenty years the government seemed to have—didn’t seem to have; the
   government, the United States government, even state governments had a
   deliberate policy of light-touch oversight and regulation of the
   internet companies, and it was for good reason. They wanted to see
   these technologies flourish. It was good for America, get technological
   leadership. And so there has been a very, very light touch and
   hands-off approach to a lot of these companies, and mission
   accomplished. These companies have thrived, and we now have a lot of
   these companies who have a very significant share in the—in the domains
   where they operate. And you know, you think about AT&T, you know, back
   in the day we were regulated heavily as a monopoly until our market
   share fell below about 50 percent. We now have these companies that are
   now operating in domains where they’re having 60, 70 percent share of
   the particular areas where they operate. It probably should not be a
   surprise that people—attention is being heightened in terms of
   antitrust concerns. And are they legitimate, are they, you know,
   appropriate? I’ll let the authorities worry about that. But nobody
   should be surprised when you start getting 50, 60 percent market shares
   in these areas that the government starts looking closely at the
   behaviors. HAASS: And your sector is also an example where antitrust
   was applied, and after some degree of disruption quite a lot of
   companies did just fine. STEPHENSON: A lot of—AT&T, I would suggest.
   HAASS: Just to mention one, yes. (Laughs.) STEPHENSON: Company has done
   quite well in a—in a deregulated environment, and it is
   hypercompetitive. It’s a fun industry, but yeah, it took a little
   government intervention to get us to that place as well. HAASS: OK. Net
   Neutrality, let’s raise that—put that on the—I expect you got some
   opinions on— STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) HAASS: —on that, about what ought to
   be government policy in that area and how we ought to price it.
   STEPHENSON: I always start a conversation with Net Neutrality out with
   what does it mean, because if I were to just ask various tables to give
   me a definition of Net Neutrality, I— HAASS: You can’t ask this table,
   by the way. (Laughter.) I don’t care what they think. (Laughs.)
   STEPHENSON: I would—I would get multiple definitions of what it
   actually means. And if what we’re talking about is that there should be
   unfettered access to the content on the internet, and that, you know,
   companies like ours should not be able to block anybody from getting to
   certain content, or throttle you in terms of your use of content—we
   can’t treat AT&T’s HBO Max streaming better than Netflix’s
   streaming—and somebody ought to be able to develop a device that would
   connect to the internet and it ought to work as well as anybody else’s
   device, if you say that’s Net Neutrality, then by all means I think
   that’s important. I think it’s important to the growth, the
   development—the continued development of the internet. I think, in
   fact, that it is so important people in Congress ought to step up and
   do something about it, and actually ought to legislate what I just
   said. Instead, what we do is we have—we write the worst legislation in
   the world anymore. We write just kind of frameworks as legislation. We
   hand it off to a bunch of bureaucrats to regulate it. And depending on
   who is president one interprets it this way over here, and so companies
   orient themselves, they set up their business models over here. And
   then there’s an election, new president comes in, and we’re swinging
   all the way back over here, and you’re oriented over here, and your
   business practices are changing, and you don’t know how to invest in
   ten-, fifteen-year-horizon networks and so forth based on this kind of
   phenomenon. And so this is one of these areas that people need to step
   up and do their job and pass some legislation on this. This is a—this
   is chaotic for businesses who are trying to keep the U.S. in the
   leadership position on the internet. HAASS: So your view is almost
   whatever you decide just decide it and stick with it? STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   and I think there are some really broad frameworks that people can
   agree on. And it’s not too dissimilar from what I just articulated. I
   mean, there will be some—look, we’re all rent-seekers. You start this
   process and everybody’s going to be in there trying to get this thing
   and that thing. We just got to keep focused. And I will give credit on
   some of the recent legislation passed by Congress on tax reform on the
   corporate side—not the individual, but the corporate side. There were
   some big, broad principles that said get those competitive U.S. tax
   rate. There are some big, broad principles on Net Neutrality we should
   be able to legislate and get done. HAASS: I want to return just for one
   minute to 5G. And you know, given the way you’ve now—you know, where
   your company is with the acquisitions, you’ve got content, you’ve got
   distribution. The question is, given what we’ve said about China, given
   some of the European companies— STEPHENSON: Right. HAASS: —given
   Verizon, whether you think AT&T can be competitive in the 5G space.
   STEPHENSON: Oh yeah, I think we’ll be very—I think we’ll be leaders in
   the 5G space. We already are. When you think about, you know, what kind
   of determines how 5G rolls out, the first step is, how do you set
   standards so that you can get everybody manufacturing gear and
   equipment that guys like us go out and deploy? The standards are
   everything. And so AT&T was the leader in the standards-setting
   process. Now, something you should be aware of, for the first time in
   my career the Chinese got very aggressive in this, and they were all
   over the standards-setting process. But we got everything in the
   standards we wanted, that we thought the U.S. needed to have a shot at
   maintaining a leadership position. So standards are set right. We,
   AT&T, in anticipation of this, have been buying up, spending billions
   of dollars on acquiring wireless licenses, because when you think about
   5G, you got to have a lot of airwaves to pump all of these volumes
   through. We’ve spent over $40 billion over the last ten years on
   acquiring the licenses so that you can have the bandwidth to pump all
   this through. I will tell you AT&T is as in good a shape as anybody in
   the world. I think we’re in the best position in the United States and
   as good as anybody in the world. So mission accomplished there. We have
   a balance sheet that we’re committing to this and we’re investing in
   it. So I feel really good about that. We have great technology. We’ve
   done a good job on getting the technology ready. Here’s where we have a
   problem. If you’re thinking about your competition, you said Europe. I
   don’t think anybody in Europe has even issued an RFP for 5G yet, truly.
   So I set Europe aside. They have gone from first to worst in the—in the
   world of mobility for—you can debate why. But Europe is not in play
   right now. It’s China. If we want a leadership position, it’s vis-à-vis
   China. You want to deploy 5G, what are the big barriers? I’ve talked
   about some of the barriers, which we’ve now broken through. We’re past
   those, spectrum and standards and the equipment and so forth. Now you
   got to go out and put this stuff up. You got to go out and deploy
   thousands upon thousands of cell sites. Now, I don’t think in
   China—they’re spending three years trying to get San Francisco to
   approve a cell site. I suspect in China, when they want a cell site
   they go put up a cell site where they want it, and they’re putting up
   millions upon millions of cell sites while we’re over here kind of
   debating and thrashing through local/municipal regulations, state
   regulations, federal regulations trying just to get the infrastructure
   permits to put this stuff in place. And so if there’s a place where
   we’re going to fall behind, China is going to be able to go much faster
   in that regard than the U.S. will. And I’m not saying their approach is
   better. I get the environmental concerns, aesthetics, appearance. But
   we have people wearing aluminum-foil suits because they’re afraid of
   5G, right, and fighting deployment of 5G. I don’t think they’re dealing
   with that in China. HAASS: What about the regulatory side or the—so
   much of the spectrum is reserved for the military. Do you basically
   feel that the government has to change policies so you can do what you
   want to do with 5G? STEPHENSON: No, if there’s one area I have to tip
   my hat to the government, both the Obama administration and this
   administration, it is getting spectrum out into the marketplace. And
   there have been numerous auctions conducted. I told you we spent forty
   billion (dollars). The lion’s share of that have been in government
   auctions, acquiring airwaves. There have been already a handful of
   auctions on these really-high-frequency airwaves, which will make this
   stuff really hum. We’ve participated in a couple of those. There’s
   another one coming up this year. So I think our government is doing a
   really good job of getting the airwaves out into the hands of the
   market and the people who will deploy these networks. And that—we’re
   not lagging behind the Chinese in that regard. HAASS: You know, this is
   the Council on Foreign Relations. For a second I’m going to make it the
   Council on Financial Relations. One of my many joys in recent days was
   reading a twenty-plus page letter from Mr. Singer and company, from
   Elliott, sent you all advising you. So the criticisms or reactions
   about the idea that you’ve put together through acquisition rather than
   organic growth where you are, content and distribution, that
   essentially this is an old-fashioned conglomerate and that’s not a good
   idea anymore, how do you—how do you take that, other than not well?
   STEPHENSON: Look, I—the letter was—you know, I didn’t take the letter
   poorly. It was interesting to me the letter laid out some
   recommendations, and the recommendations seemed to be supportive of the
   strategy, the importance of Time Warner, the acquisition, and the
   importance of 5G which we have been talking about here, and the—and the
   power of the assets. You know, they actually talk about it in those
   terms. So, look, I read the letter, and candidly there were some areas
   that I just read and I thought, you know what, they make some good
   points. And we’ll engage with them on those points. It was a mixed bag,
   though. There were some that I read and I go, I’m not sure that’s so
   clear to me. And so those are areas we’ll also want to get some more
   detail. I mean, say what you will about Paul Singer’s organization,
   they’re smart people. They’ve got some really smart people. And so if
   they have some good ideas, I’m dying to sit down and we’ll grind
   through them and see what makes sense for all of our shareholders—not
   just one, but all of our shareholders. HAASS: One last question, then
   I’m going to open it up. When you went through the hoops of the merger,
   there were all sorts of questions about whether you would advantage
   your own content in your own distribution systems and disadvantage
   those of others. Where does that stand now? Because you now have all
   this content coming out of HBO and other places, and you’ve got your
   pipes so to speak. To what extent do others who want to get into your
   distribution system, other streaming services, how do they compete? How
   is—how is all this going to play out? STEPHENSON: It’s playing out
   exactly as we said it would play out in the courts. And I—it’s—there is
   not a whit difference between what we established as our position in
   the courts, and that is as a media company—I see Wolf and the team down
   here, CNN—I can’t even begin to fathom the motivation that would say we
   want to limit CNN’s distribution just to AT&T’s platforms. That is a
   mindless proposition. You develop and you spend a lot of money on
   developing great premium content, and how do you make money on it? Wide
   and broad distribution. You want to distribute it everywhere. And it’s
   the same with HBO. We want HBO distributed as broadly and as widely as
   we possibly can. That’s the way you create value out of franchises like
   HBO. And you know, we recently had a drop from Charlie Ergen on DISH
   Networks. He dropped HBO. You know, we didn’t stand up at home and
   start doing high-fives that DISH is not carrying HBO. You know, that’s
   a lot of distribution to lose. That’s how you make money. I see Sam
   Feist back there. Do you want more or less distribution for CNN, Sam?
   Q: I’ll take more. STEPHENSON: You’ll take more. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Good answer. STEPHENSON: And so I always felt like the government’s
   lawsuit felt a bit nonsensical. And I think what we’re seeing play out
   in the marketplace since the deal closed is affirming that, and I’m
   having a hard time conceiving of a—of a time where we have said, hold
   that content back from Comcast or hold it back from Charter. No, we’re
   saying how do we get it deployed and distributed on Comcast and
   Charter. HAASS: OK. I’ve already asked more than I know, so let me open
   it up to our members. Again, it’s on the record. Wait for a microphone.
   We’ll recognize you. Let us know who you are and keep it succinct. No
   speeches, just a question. Only Mr. Stephenson gets to give speeches
   today. STEPHENSON: I’ll try to be succinct. HAASS: Ray? Q: Ray Tanter
   of the American Committee on Human Rights and the Iran Policy
   Committee. STEPHENSON: Hi, Ray. Q: Sir, do you think that Huawei is
   playing chess while we are playing checkers? STEPHENSON: Who? HAASS:
   Huawei. Q: (Off mic)—the other day. STEPHENSON: Oh, Huawei? Q: Huawei.
   HAASS: They actually played go, not chess. But anyhow. (Laughter.) Just
   a technical fix here. STEPHENSON: Well, I think they’re really smart,
   and I’ve—as you heard me articulate, I think they’ve made some very
   smart strategic plays. And this issue of disallowing interoperability
   between 4G and 5(G)—I don’t want to get technical, but that’s a big
   deal. And you know, if you’ve got the 4G layer and you can’t
   interoperate to 5G, then you are beholden to Huawei for 5G. So— HAASS:
   Isn’t that kind of what Apple does when they basically tell you that
   your charger that worked with one generation doesn’t work with the next
   generation? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, but changing out a
   thousand-dollar smartphone is different than—if you—if you don’t want
   to use Huawei for 5G, then you have to go rip and replace your
   fourth-generation network and put in another player. So, look, this is
   a really big deal. We, AT&T, have led the effort on something—I’ll try
   to make this as simple as possible, but virtualization of networks,
   putting as much of the electronics out on the edge as possible, but
   more importantly I refer to open source—open-source software. So we’ve
   developed—worked with the industry to develop a software layer that is
   the operating system for 5G. This is the software layer. It makes all
   the stuff talk to each other, if you will. We developed a software
   platform here and we contributed it into the open-source community.
   It’s out there. And guess what this thing is? It facilitates
   interoperability. And a significant amount of the players around the
   world have said that is the software layer we want in our 5G
   deployment. It’s a really big deal. It will take a while to get this
   scaled to both—to all levels of the network, but as you get open source
   out there it enhances security—because you got everybody out there
   auditing this software and identifying bugs and so forth and you fix
   it—but it creates the opportunity for interoperability, and what it
   does is says nobody sells a box with software just embedded in it. No,
   you have the software up here in a layer and any box can run that
   software. Why is that important? Because suddenly you have had a
   technological solution for this locking in people to a certain
   technology, if you know what I’m saying. So if you’re wanting to buy
   Huawei equipment, it’s a box with software in it. We don’t need that.
   We’ve got our software; we just need boxes. We need more what I’ll
   commodity-type boxes. This is a technological revolution that I think
   can be our fix in the long run for how we ensure that the Western
   supply chains are not dismantled by virtue of a Huawei strategy here.
   So it’s—we’re going to have to be smart. I take my hat off to the
   administration on some of the things they’re doing, the entity list and
   so forth. But I think these kind of solutions are technological
   solutions that ensure we have a level playing field for everybody who
   wants to use something other than Huawei. HAASS: Shane Green.
   STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick. Q: Hi. I’m with a personal data platform called—
   STAFF: (Off mic.) Q: Shane Green. Sorry, I wasn’t sure if that was
   redundant. (Laughs.) Another area that China has a big advantage given
   their approach to technology is around data and privacy. Some people
   are calling it surveillance state and they’re actively exporting it. I
   think Freedom House has listed about thirty-five countries that are
   actively deploying their approach to surveilling their own
   people—creating a citizenship score, there’s all these sorts of things.
   Europe’s taking a pretty big or different approach with GDPR, and there
   were, you know, serious sensitivities around privacy. I’m curious how
   you see that, especially given that you’re both in the role of, you
   know, infrastructure and telecom, but also in the content business
   where, you know, collecting data and using it in advertising and the
   like is really important. So I’m curious about your thoughts on that.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah, this is—this is a big issue, and I’m going to back up
   a little before I just get to the core of your question. But, look, the
   beginning of your question is very relevant, and the paper that McRaven
   and the folks wrote here at CFR, I browsed it this morning, but it
   talks about the technologies that China has established as areas they
   want to advance and be in the leadership in: AI, quantum, and 5G. Those
   are not independent; those are interdependent. And if you think about
   all of these—and they have established them as the premise for economic
   as well as military leadership. And when you think about AI, what is
   the—what is the fuel that makes AI relevant? It’s data—data, data,
   data, data, data. That’s what AI is all about. As I said, the Chinese
   aren’t spending a lot of cycles and a lot of time, you know, permitting
   cell sites. They’re not spending a lot of cycles and time on privacy
   policies, and what data can we use, and what data can we collect. 5G is
   going to allow sensors all over the—all over the place. 4G networks, in
   a square mile you can connect thousands of devices. 5G, millions of
   devices per square mile, much lower power, much lower compute
   requirements. So data is going to be thrown off of this stuff. They
   have no issues with collecting data and using data, which will power
   AI, which will make their AI much more advanced and much more powerful.
   To make that AI relevant, you’re going to have to have different
   compute algorithms, quantum. Quantum is critical for all of this. And
   if you’re going to have great data, AI, great quantum, what are you
   going to need? You need to move this data around in real time. That’s
   why 5G is so critical. These all fit together, OK? Now, in the United
   States we are headed down a path, unless—here I go again—Congress acts.
   We’re headed down a path where California now has a data privacy rule,
   you have I believe Washington—I’m looking at my guys over here. Maine
   has a different privacy rule. There are multiple states working on
   their own privacy rules. They will all be different. If you’re a
   consumer, you’re not going to know what the rules are for how one
   company handles your data versus another. If you’re a company, it’s
   going to be hard to kind of manage this across fifty different states,
   while the Chinese are over there doing this. (Snaps fingers.) We need
   privacy legislation at the federal level. It needs to be robust. It
   needs to be a really good privacy bill where everybody is treated the
   same. But we need to have a privacy bill—this is going to be another
   one of those areas where we’re handicapped in the U.S. because we just
   don’t have rules and a framework that allows us companies—(snaps
   fingers)—to innovate and to move and to—and to really lead in these
   areas. So your question is a very important question. And it’s one that
   if we don’t get right it’s another area where we fall behind. HAASS:
   Well, I’ll just take one minute. Just I want to make sure everybody
   gets it about why 5G is so significant. What will—the speed, the
   capacity, and the rest, but just take a second to say why 5G is not
   just a linear increase, it’s something qualitatively different.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah. So when you talk 5G everybody goes, oh, it’s faster,
   right? And it is. It’s faster. It’s lower latency as well. I mean,
   you’re talking about really low latency, meaning from the time you
   issue a command from a machine or you push a smartphone or
   whatnot—(snaps fingers)—instantaneous reaction to the command. So it’s
   real-time networking. That’s important, but that’s not the gig. It’s
   what does that facilitate. And you heard me already say in a world of
   4G you can connect thousands of devices on a cell site within a square
   mile. (Holds up smartphone.) This. I can have my watch. You can have
   your car that’s connected to it, and you can have devices, thousands of
   them per square mile. 5G, that becomes millions—millions of devices per
   square mile. This becomes the most connected society we have ever
   conceived of. This is really game changing. Now, combine this with in a
   world of 4G you can locate this device—(holds up phone)—or this
   device—(points to watch)—or whatever device, a sensor, to within
   meters. But it’s GPS kind of stuff and it’s not very precise. In a
   world of 5G, you can locate devices within a couple of centimeters. It
   becomes very, very precise in terms of your ability to locate something
   that is connected to this network. Now, think of what—about what that
   means in the world of security. That wigs some people out. Me? Oh, this
   is new security level. This is great security. The idea that I can
   locate where is this relative to a transaction that’s taking place; am
   I within centimeters of a terminal, or can I set up geofence locations
   to say that only people within a very specific location can access
   data? I mean, this allows us to take security to a whole different
   place. That’s really important. Then the last—and these all fit
   together—but it allows what I call hyper-miniaturization. We have these
   big devices. You know, it’s got a big screen. But there’s a lot going
   on inside here. There’s a lot of compute power in here. There’s a lot
   of storage capacity in here. There’s a lot of power requirements to
   make all of that work. And so you have some form factors that are—that
   could be rather large. When the networks are this fast, this
   instantaneous, that compute, that storage, and even the power
   requirements could be pushed out of here back into the network. This
   fundamentally changes form factors over time. Google had the glasses we
   all talked about. This can conceivably become the form factor. You
   don’t need all of the horsepower in these devices. This could become
   your screen to the world. It truly can. You can now think of sensors
   that rather this size they become miniaturized, and they can have power
   that will last ten years because it doesn’t require that much power to
   keep them going. Now you can begin to have all of your
   infrastructure—traffic management, utilities, pipelines—you can begin
   to conceive of how much of a society’s infrastructure is underpinned by
   this kind of technology. Now, as I think about that, that is when I say
   it makes a lot of sense to ask what companies should be underlying the
   development of the equipment underlying this infrastructure? And if
   you’re ever going to be at a place where you’re worried about the
   relationship of a particular company or country, then you ought to be
   mindful as to who’s manufacturing this stuff. And so this is how it
   fits together in my mind and why I think we’re all wise to be
   thoughtful and prudent about how we pursue this. HAASS: What everybody
   also wants to know is whether they’re going to be able to find the
   television remote and—(laughter)— STEPHENSON: There will be no remote
   because you’ll say “turn on CNN” and it’ll just come on, OK? HAASS:
   That’s good. That’s good. Yes, sir. Q: Richard— STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick.
   HAASS: Just wait for a microphone. We all want to hear you. Q: Richard
   Adkerson from Freeport-McMoRan, a copper mining company. Randall—
   STEPHENSON: So you could tell us a thing or two about China here. Q: He
   said I couldn’t give a speech. (Laughter.) I’ve got one to give. But—
   Q: Another time. Q: Another time. Randall, I want to talk to you about
   the role you’ve played representing your own company and business in
   general through The Business Roundtable and other initiatives you’ve
   had. It seems to me we’ve had two administrations now where we’ve had
   real challenges in communicating business interests to government. We
   had some success, as you said, with taxes, but we— STEPHENSON: You’re
   telling me I’ve been an abject failure. Is that what you’re trying to
   say? Yeah. (Laughter.) Q: No, no, no, no, no. It’s a challenge for all
   of us and a challenge for our country—company because our of our impact
   on international relations. But I’d be interested in your comment on it
   just broadly. How do you think it’s—we know the challenges, but do you
   think—are you frustrated by it, encouraged by it? Do you—do you have
   observations of how we might do it better? STEPHENSON: Look, we’re
   dealing with elected officials, and that’s always a different
   environment to be in, right? I mean, these are people who are trying to
   address the interests of very specific constituencies. And so we
   always, I think, as business have to figure out how we make the
   case—and it happens to be the right case—that what we do has virtue,
   what we do has nobility; and what we do does create investment, it does
   create jobs, it does create the opportunity to provide healthcare. We
   educate our workforces. I’m talking people that—with us in the BRT. We
   educate our workforces like nobody else. And so I just—I’ve never been
   able to figure out, Richard, this formula for why is it so hard to
   convey that, you know, with the appropriate regulatory oversight and
   freedom of the press monitoring all of us and making sure we’re doing
   the right thing, but why is it so important or so difficult to convey
   that what is in the broader best interest of American business is in
   the best interest of the American consumer, the American worker? With
   the right constraints around, you know, how we treat people and so
   forth. And that’s why the issue you asked me about a moment ago—you
   know, the purpose of a corporation—that’s why this is so important.
   There has to be a virtuous cycle here. We have to see that a
   corporation has got the best interests of their employees and their
   communities and all of this in mind, because without that you can’t
   have the virtuous circle of profitability and reinvestment back into
   companies that invest in America. And so that’s a hard case to make.
   You know, I’ve sat up here twice today, tried to make it, and have not
   been very effective, obviously. But it doesn’t seem like it’s such a
   difficult concept to grasp if business—if business operates the way
   we’re talking about here. Now, all organizations have people who don’t,
   you know, exactly play by the same rulebook, and those companies need
   to be dealt with, and you need to have enforcement and regulation for
   those reasons. But by and large, large business in America does a
   pretty darn good job of taking care of the interests of the American
   worker. HAASS: I want to put one other question about Time Warner. When
   you—when you all acquired DirecTV, that was sort of a(n)
   engineering/hardware company taking over another engineering/hardware.
   But Time Warner is a creative company. How is that going in terms of
   merging cultures? Very, very different. And what have you learned? How
   is it—essentially, what’s been tougher than you thought, what’s going
   better than you thought? Where does that stand? STEPHENSON: So
   it’s—this is going to be an interesting case study one day because when
   we bought Time Warner and we tried to think about how do we—how do we
   manage this business, how do we preserve the creative culture that’s so
   critical to their success, you’re buying a business that every single
   night every asset drives home. And so how do you preserve the necessary
   culture of a creative company like that, but recognize that that
   industry is changing not on the margin, it’s changing radically? And I
   had this conversation yesterday, that as you think about how you run a
   company like that, you know, you would run Time Warner the way it was
   structured when we bought it one way with one type of person and
   leadership and so forth. But if you’re trying to take what I will call
   a legacy media company and transform it for the new era, would you
   think about organizing and managing it a little differently? Because
   this company, we got to get it pivoted. We got to take all this great,
   fabulous content and all this great talent and figure out how to get
   that content delivered digitally. Because while the amount of—amount of
   content people are consuming every day is actually growing, it’s not
   shrinking—you know, we hear about cord-cutting and oh my God, you know,
   people are not watching. No, people are watching more content, but all
   of the growth is happening on digital. So the pivot we have to run—and
   you know, we’ve done this not in creative cultures before, but we’ve
   done this a thousand times going from a legacy business to a new
   business, transitioning business models from wired line to wireless,
   you know, from old basic dialup to high-speed internet and fiber. You
   know, you run these transitions. Well, the media industry is having to
   run one of these transitions. And so how do you do that without
   breaking the culture that’s so important underlying all of this? And
   this is where we think we have a really unique advantage here if we can
   execute this play, because there are a lot of companies in media trying
   to run this transition and they’re pivoting to a digital model, but
   they don’t have distribution. Their distribution has been cable
   companies, satellite companies, and movie theaters. But what happens
   when that isn’t your primary distribution in the future? You better
   have some kind of direct relationship with the customer. And if there’s
   a media company that has a massive relationship with a massive number
   of customers, they would seem to have an advantage to me. Well, guess
   what? AT&T has 170 million customer relationships. That’s a pretty darn
   good starting point for if you can pivot a company to digital
   distribution. Now, we can take that and drive it through 170 million
   customer relationships. And I tell people we have a couple of early
   datapoints. They’re really early; we’re a year into this now. But HBO,
   in the course of one year, AT&T has been by order of magnitude the
   largest distributor of HBO in a very short period of time. In fact, if
   you look at the number-two distributor, we’re 67 percent larger than
   the number-two distributor. Think about it. It’s going through mobile
   now. It’s going through our broadband product. It’s going through our
   pay TV product. And it’s having an incredible impact in driving HBO
   volumes. And I told you DISH dropped HBO in the second quarter, just
   dropped them cold. (Snaps fingers.) A huge distributor of HBO. HBO grew
   3 percent in the second quarter. How? New distribution, right? And
   content is king. Distribution matters. You put the two together, we
   think there’s an opportunity to transform this media company to digital
   without having to compromise distribution in the interim. HAASS: Time
   for a few more questions. Yes, ma’am. Yeah. Q: Great, thank you. Molly
   Elgin-Cossart with Markle Foundation. STEPHENSON: Hi. Q: I wanted to
   come back to the education and training point. You talked about what
   AT&T has done, laudably, and I’m thinking there’s an entire ecosystem.
   There are other employers. There’s our K-12, which a speaker this
   morning said is actually our biggest national security threat, and
   other postsecondary education and training. And I’m thinking, what do
   you take away from that experience to inform the broader conversation
   about what policymakers should be thinking for education and training
   and for our talent pipeline, other employers? Sort of a slightly
   broader picture. I’d love to hear those insights. STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   this is an interesting question. And if you think about—you called it
   an ecosystem. That’s the right term. We built an ecosystem around
   employee development and reskilling our employee base. It seems to me
   so logical that this would work in a municipality. I mean, why can’t a
   city—pick it; Dallas, where we’re headquartered—why can’t Dallas
   inventory all the jobs in that community and, you know, they should be
   categorized. I mean, the world of AI, this stuff isn’t that hard
   anymore. It’s not that expensive to do anymore. But categorize all
   these jobs, directionally where are these types of jobs going—welders,
   HVAC. I mean, we’re relocating HVAC people into Dallas. Think about
   that, just people to work on air conditioners and heating systems. And
   these pay a lot of money, all right? There’s a demand for people who
   have HVAC skills. Why can we not have an inventory of these? Why can we
   not have very—for the broad base of jobs, what credentials are required
   for those jobs, and giving people access to the credentialing criteria
   to get those jobs? This seems like it would work in a—in a city, in a
   state, one could even argue in a federal environment. It’s not rocket
   science, really. It takes a lot of hard work and a lot of effort. But I
   think there are implications. Tom Friedman has come to me and
   challenged me, why don’t you just stand this up for Dallas, you know?
   And you know, you think about it, maybe there’s a business model here.
   But it just feels like something that could really move the needle in
   terms of getting people ready for the jobs that are growing, the jobs
   that are coming, rather than the jobs that have been. How do you
   reskill a community? HAASS: A little bit of a home-team advertisement:
   that was the subject of our previous task force report. STEPHENSON: Is
   that right? OK. HAASS: Yeah. No, it’s a—I think it’s big issue because
   if we don’t get it right this country’s not going to have—no pun—you
   know, the bandwidth to cope with a lot of things around the world
   unless we get this issue right. Yes, sir? Q: Hi. Eben Kaplan from
   CrowdStrike. You spoke about the tremendous opportunity that the 5G
   infrastructure will create. It also creates tremendous opportunity for
   abuse and destructive power of attacks if someone were to manipulate
   that infrastructure. I wonder where you see the role of the private
   sector versus the public sector in securing that. What’s the—what’s the
   right mix there in order to ensure that we reap those benefits without
   incurring some of the—some of the risks? STEPHENSON: They key word you
   used is “mix.” It’s a mix. And I think—I think we’re really good at
   network security. We invest a lot of money at it. We spend a lot of
   time at it. But you know, our government has a lot of information in
   terms of things that are going on, and they have insights into traffic
   and so forth that’s going over these networks. And putting the entities
   together in a way that protects, first of all, our consumers’ and our
   businesses’ information and data, but that—a lot of that, as you might
   well guess, does happen and does go on. I think as this gets more and
   more sophisticated, and more and more complex, and more and more
   aggressive—David Sanger is somewhere here in the room. If you haven’t
   read his book, go read it; it’ll scare the hell out of you in this
   regard. But we’re going to have to get better and better at partnering
   with government. And I would challenge that it’s got to be a two-way
   flow. Our government tends to like one-way flows, and for these things
   to work it will have to be two-way flows that are more fluid and so
   forth. But it’s going to be critical to partner on this. And David
   Sanger’s book makes the point that it’s hard to get people energized
   and to take action on this if they don’t recognize how significant the
   threat is. And the threat is significant. I mean, think about the
   implications of somebody taking down a significant portion of the
   internet. You could cripple financial communities. You could—you could
   stop a lot of things. And I try not to be too sensational in these
   things but, you know, some very targeted things could have significant
   implications on electric transmission, all right? And these are things
   that ought to be alarming. And we ought to have a bright light focused
   on this and making sure that government and business are working
   together. HAASS: Yes, sir. Q: Thank you. I’m Bob Perry with the
   Stevenson Group of International Consultants. You’ve given a very
   detailed and broad view of the 5G world, primarily in the U.S. and
   maybe other developed markets. My question goes to the developing
   world, specifically Africa. Go back to the year 2000, telephone
   penetration in Africa was maybe 1, 2 percent. Then came the cellphone.
   And now you have mobile use in villages of a hundred people, two
   hundred people. The question is, the opportunity and financial
   governance challenges if 5G move into that space. HAASS: Actually, when
   you answer that, also talk about low-density areas in this country. I
   had the same question, about rural areas. STEPHENSON: You know,
   something’s happened here in the United States that doesn’t get a lot
   of attention, but this is another one of those I believe there’s a
   model here for the world. And I’ve talked to the president of Mexico
   about this, in terms of how you achieve rural coverage in Mexico and
   connect everybody not to wireless telephony, but to connectivity, the
   internet. This is an internet device now, right? And so after 9/11,
   none of the emergency responders could interact and communicate. I
   mean, communications were a disaster after 9/11. Everybody was on
   different protocols. And firemen from Pennsylvania came to New York,
   and they could communicate with New York firemen, and the police
   couldn’t communicate with the fire, and the EMS couldn’t communicate.
   And it was just really, really bad. And so Congress passed legislation
   that instructed that a nationwide network—wireless network—be built for
   the first responder community. It was a big deal. It was called
   FirstNet. And so the government finally came out and did a big bid in
   2016—put out a big bid. We went in hard on this. And this bid said:
   Whoever wins this thing must build out all of America this network for
   first responders. And whoever wins it gets this big block of spectrum,
   airwaves, to build it in. But you got to build out the whole country.
   So very detailed requirements, and specifications, and so forth on
   this. We, AT&T, went in hard, and we won this thing. And we’re building
   out this nationwide network. We’re 60-some-odd percent complete now.
   This is really an amazing thing, because you’re getting this first
   responder network that is truly—it’s a high-performance network.
   Really, really impressive. When the first responders aren’t using it,
   we’re allowed to commercialize it for anybody else. But what’s
   happening? We’re building our rural America for the first responders,
   but the network’s available for rural America. We and the United States
   government are funding this. And you know how it’s funded? It’s
   funded—I told you, we spent $40 billion over the last ten years on
   wireless airwaves at auctions. In one of those auctions, the government
   carved off a few billion dollars of the proceeds and said: This is
   going to be used to help build this network out into rural America. And
   that’s what’s happening here. And I tell you, I watch this and I just—I
   expected this to be big and significant. It’s exceeding all of my
   expectations. And I do—when I talk to government officials around the
   world, I tell them: You need to watch this. This is really important.
   In Africa, in these communities, somebody has to buy the wireless
   airwaves. They’re either releasing those airwaves or they’re paying a
   check to get those airwaves. I think governments should be thinking
   about, how do I set some of that money aside now to take and put back
   into connectivity for our communities that would not otherwise have
   connectivity. So this is a model that I think has a lot of legs could
   be used elsewhere. HAASS: Randall, we’ve only got about a minute left.
   One of the very few principles we try to keep here is that we begin and
   end meetings on time. So many of us are enthralled with the HBO show
   Succession. And after having read the letter from Elliot, what we
   really want to know is to what extent does that tell us what we need to
   know about succession at AT&T? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Well, first of
   all, I have no sons that I can name as my successor. I don’t think that
   would be allowed at all, anyway. But I do love that show. I hope
   everybody’s watching that show. So please, tune in this Sunday night to
   Succession. (Laughter.) OK. HAASS: Thank you very much. STEPHENSON:
   Thank you, Richard. (Applause.) Thanks a lot. (END)

   Event with Randall Stephenson September 18, 2019 CEO Speaker Series

   Europe

   C. Peter McColough Series on International Economics With Sabine
   Lautenschläger
   Sabine Lautenschläger discusses Eurozone conditions and the European
   Central Bank's economic tools, as well as the effects of U.S. trade
   policy on the global economy. The C. Peter McColough Series on
   International Economics brings the world's foremost economic
   policymakers and scholars to address members on current topics in
   international economics and U.S. monetary policy. This meeting series
   is presented by the Maurice R. Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic
   Studies.

   Event with Sabine Lautenschläger September 19, 2019 C. Peter McColough
   Series on International Economics
   View All

   Expert Spotlight
   Robert D. Blackwill Robert D. Blackwill

   Henry A. Kissinger Senior Fellow for U.S. Foreign Policy

   U.S. Foreign Policy Europe and Eurasia Russia

   War by Other Means

   Book February 11, 2016 Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic Studies
   Robert E. Rubin Robert E. Rubin

   Chairman Emeritus; Former Secretary of the U.S. Treasury

   A Secret to Better Health Care

   Via New York Times May 28, 2019
   Michael Froman Michael Froman

   Distinguished Fellow

   Trade Globalization Economics

   Former Obama Administration Official: Trump Is Addressing
   'Longstanding' Trade Issues

   Via CNBC September 16, 2018
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Explainers

   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs

   1
     __________________________________________________________________

   4
   China Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen

   Pollution Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities

   China Belt and Road Tracker

   This tracker shows how the Belt and Road Initiative has changed
   countries’ bilateral economic relationships with China over time.
   Trade The Truth About Tariffs

   Tariffs have been applied over the years to protect homegrown
   industries and target competitors who are seen as using unfair trade
   practices. They impose costs on both importers and exporters and had
   been in decline until the recent U.S.-China trade spat.
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Experts in the News

   Benn Steil

   Steil: Trade War With China Will Be Factor in the Fed’s Decision-Making
   on Interest Rates

   Via CNBC September 21, 2019
   Steven A. Cook

   Cook: United States Is Prepared to Apply Further Sanctions on Iran And
   Not More

   Via CNN September 18, 2019
   Amy Myers Jaffe

   Myers Jaffe: India and China Should Decrease Their Use of Coal to Be a
   Climate-Neutral Economy

   Via Bloomberg Markets September 17, 2019
   View All

Featured Publications

   China

   The Third Revolution
   The Third Revolution argues that Xi Jinping’s dual-reform
   trajectories—a more authoritarian system at home and a more ambitious
   foreign policy abroad—provide Beijing with new levers of influence that
   the United States must learn to exploit to protect its own interests.

   Book by Elizabeth C. Economy May 2, 2018 Asia Program

   Japan

   Japan Rearmed
   Japan’s United States–imposed postwar constitution renounced the use of
   offensive military force, but, Sheila A. Smith shows, a nuclear North
   Korea and an increasingly assertive China have the Japanese rethinking
   that commitment—and their reliance on U.S. security.

   Book by Sheila A. Smith April 8, 2019 Asia Program

   U.S. Foreign Policy

   The Road Not Taken
   In chronicling the adventurous life of legendary CIA operative Edward
   Lansdale, The Road Not Taken definitively reframes our understanding of
   the Vietnam War.

   Book by Max Boot April 2, 2019
   View All

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

   from Digital and Cyberspace Policy Program

Protecting Data Privacy With User-Friendly Software

Cyber Brief

   February 18, 2016
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print
   Download PDF

   Report

   Sara "Scout" Sinclair Brody

   Executive Director, Simply Secure

   Protecting the privacy of user data from unauthorized access is
   essential for business executives, policymakers, and users themselves.
   The pace of targeted attacks and massive data breaches is only
   increasing. Each new incident hurts organizations' bottom lines,
   undermines users' trust in the products they use every day, and can
   have dire consequences for public safety.
   Sara "Scout" Sinclair Brody

   Executive Director, Simply Secure

   The problem is multifaceted. Technologists are rushing to fix software
   vulnerabilities. Regulators are trying to keep pace with the realities
   of a complex ecosystem. Market-based approaches, such as cybersecurity
   insurance, remain immature. In addition, consumers are still learning
   what options they have, and what options they should be asking for.

   More on:

   Privacy

   Cybersecurity

   Digital Policy

   Technology and Innovation

   Currently, end users can use software that provides strong privacy
   protection with a high degree of certainty. Unfortunately, adoption
   rates for such software are low, largely because of how hard it is for
   nonexperts to use. This does not have to be the case. Software
   developers in the open-source community—who are generally the first to
   build encryption and privacy tools—need to improve the design of their
   tools to make them more user-friendly and useful. In turn, corporate
   and government purchasers should begin promoting the value of
   open-source software, particularly as it offers best-in-class security.
   These steps would go a long way toward improving privacy online.

Background: Cryptography and User Experience

   Tools that provide strong privacy guarantees have historically been
   niche products, requiring a special understanding of the underlying
   security mechanisms in order to operate them. However, many of the
   basic concepts are straightforward. For example, encryption allows the
   contents of a message to be scrambled so that third parties cannot read
   it. Users apply an encryption key—similar to a long, complex
   password—to scramble data, and a decryption key to unscramble it. If
   the encryption of messages passing between users Alice and Bob occurs
   on their respective computers, and the decryption keys are under their
   sole control, it is called end-to-end encryption. This form of
   encryption is the gold standard in privacy preservation, because it
   prevents would-be eavesdroppers from intercepting the conversation.

     Many software companies live and die by their UX and employ a host
     of designers and researchers to improve it.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   Software tools for end-to-end encryption have been available to users
   since the early 1990s, when Phil Zimmerman created a program called
   Pretty Good Privacy (PGP) and released it to the public free of charge.
   However, nonexpert users have faced a number of challenges with these
   tools from the beginning. In a 1998 paper, "Why Johnny Can't Encrypt,"
   Alma Whitten and J. D. Tygar documented problems facing users of PGP.
   The authors found that participants had difficulty performing even
   basic tasks like encrypting and decrypting messages. Further studies
   have replicated these results with a variety of software programs.

   The integration of software into daily life—from workplace desks to
   phones tucked in pockets—has led to tremendous professionalization of
   user-experience (UX) design. From big firms to small app developers,
   many software companies live and die on the quality of their UX and
   employ a host of designers and researchers to improve it. Not
   surprisingly, end-to-end encryption tools are derided when they are
   hard to use, whether these tools are for playing games or talking
   confidentially about sensitive material. Given this industry focus on
   UX design, it may seem odd that privacy tools still have a reputation
   for being hard to understand and use. Several factors contribute to
   these apparent shortcomings, which limit the development and adoption
   of user-friendly privacy tools.

     Nonexpert users have a hard time distinguishing strong security
     properties from their snake-oil alternatives.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

Challenges

   One fundamental challenge to both the usability and adoption of
   privacy-preserving tools is that privacy is considered a secondary
   task, as demonstrated through user-experience research. A secondary
   task is always subservient in users' minds to the primary task, which
   is whatever core activity the software is meant to enable: sending
   emails in an email client, exchanging instant messages in a chat
   program, or collaborating on documents in a file-sharing application.
   Many security features have this second-class status: users describe
   talking to their friend not as "secure messaging" but simply
   "messaging," with the need for security as an ancillary requirement.
   This is problematic for software designers because users will readily
   abandon success on the secondary task if it becomes too onerous, or if
   they perceive it to be in conflict with the primary task.

   More on:

   Privacy

   Cybersecurity

   Digital Policy

   Technology and Innovation

   Privacy-preserving tools seeking mass appeal face another significant
   challenge: nonexpert users have a hard time distinguishing strong
   security properties from their snake-oil alternatives. It is easy to
   call a tool "secure," but it is hard to communicate the nuances without
   going into overwhelming details in an app-store listing. There have
   been efforts over the years to create a third-party seal of approval
   for secure tools, but these attempts have either foundered in obscurity
   or lacked credibility by allowing developers to purchase approval after
   a cursory self-evaluation.

   Creating well-designed privacy-preserving tools with mass appeal also
   faces a variety of ecosystem hurdles. First, most tools in this space
   are developed as open-source products, which means that the authors
   publish the source code for anyone to read. This is good for security
   because the transparency of the open-source development model makes it
   possible to conduct independent reviews of the software (reducing the
   probability of critical vulnerabilities). It is bad for sustainability
   because few open-source projects are profitable, and many derive their
   funding from unsteady sources of income such as donations or grants.

     A multitude of conflicting requirements around cryptography loom on
     the horizon in different jurisdictions.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   Second, the majority of nonexpert users are unlikely to transfer their
   digital lives to niche security tools, and prefer to prioritize their
   primary tasks by choosing the convenience of popular cloud platforms.
   End-to-end encryption is in direct conflict with the business model
   most platforms have adopted, because it prevents the data mining and ad
   targeting that these services have monetized. A service provider such
   as Google cannot serve targeted ads if it cannot read the contents of
   an email.

   Finally, a recent resurgence of a decades-old debate around the
   propriety of encryption technologies—particularly as they relate to
   law-enforcement efforts to thwart terrorism or investigate crimes—is
   creating tremendous uncertainty for software developers. Apple and
   Google have both made upgrades to support user-controlled encryption by
   default in strategic products (iMessage's encrypted chat, Android's
   encrypted file system). However, these nascent investments are unlikely
   to be followed by large-scale integration of privacy-preserving
   technologies, given that a multitude of conflicting requirements around
   cryptography loom on the horizon in different jurisdictions. For the
   United States, it is especially unfortunate that this debate emerges at
   a time when confidence in technology companies' ability to protect user
   data is still suffering from the fallout of the Edward Snowden
   revelations.

     Cryptography cannot distinguish good people from bad, so a backdoor
     for one is a backdoor for all.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

Recommendations

   First and most urgent, the current debate over the use of encryption
   undermines the promotion of privacy tools. The U.S. government proposed
   a technological backdoor with the Clipper Chip in the early 1990s,
   using the same arguments heard today. It failed spectacularly. Although
   technology has evolved since, the fundamentals of encryption have not.
   Policymakers in the United States and other countries should recognize
   that anything less than intact cryptography puts all users at risk.
   Developers cannot build software that allows law enforcement to access
   encrypted communications but prevents malicious actors from exploiting
   that access. Cryptography cannot distinguish good people from bad, so a
   backdoor for one is a backdoor for all. Undermining the encryption used
   by U.S. companies would place the average consumer at risk of attack by
   malicious third parties, and merely motivate criminals and terrorists
   to use one of many alternative options. Powerful cryptography tools can
   easily be built outside the United States; as the self-declared Islamic
   State's use of German messaging service Telegram demonstrates, software
   rarely respects borders.

     It is time to professionalize the practice of open-source
     development.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   In addition, technology decision-makers, including chief information
   security officers and others with purchasing power, need to promote the
   value of open-source tools throughout their organizations. This can be
   done by authorizing in-house engineers to contribute to open-source
   projects during work hours and explicitly seeking technology
   consultants experienced in the open-source world. Open-source
   development can span geopolitical barriers to create technologies that
   offer best-in-class security, but all too often such projects are
   viewed as half-baked or risky by decision-makers. The volunteer
   authorship of many projects contributes to this reputation, but the
   lack of polish in the user experience design does greater damage.
   Changing a company's culture from one of client ("software is an
   expense, what do I get for my money?") to one of community ("software
   is an investment, how can we contribute strategically for long-term
   benefit?") can help organizations and projects find innovative, secure,
   and affordable solutions.

   Open-source developers, in turn, need to prioritize user-experience
   research and design, as well as to optimize their tools for large
   organizations. The focus of too many projects has long been on users
   who resemble the developers themselves. It is time to professionalize
   the practice of open-source development, recruit designers and
   usability researchers to the cause, and take a human-centered approach
   to software design. In particular, project leaders should make the
   development process more accessible to new participants by including
   explicit instructions to user-experience experts in their
   documentation. Although this change in focus will require a cultural
   shift within the open-source community, it will allow projects to
   attract more users and more donations, and ultimately result in more
   useful tools.

   Digital and Cyberspace Update

A bimonthly newsletter featuring expert commentary from the Digital and
Cyberspace Policy program on cybersecurity, digital trade, internet
governance, and online privacy.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   To support these efforts, technology-focused foundations and software
   companies' research and development wings should shift funding
   priorities toward more applied research on crafting and communicating
   about security-related features. Much of the work in this area examines
   the reasons a tool is hard to use—not ways to improve it—or focuses on
   toy refinements (e.g., "this custom interface is better than the
   standard"). As an example of such research, WhatsApp recently
   incorporated end-to-end encryption into its mobile messaging platform,
   without changing the user experience of its product. However, it
   accomplished this by hiding all privacy-specific features and tasks
   from its users, which in turn introduces vulnerability to certain kinds
   of attacks. Instead, researchers should work to identify factors that
   make privacy features successful across tools, and examine how such
   features might be added to popular products without harming user
   satisfaction.

   Taken together, these recommendations would both incentivize and
   facilitate organizations and individuals in their efforts to adopt
   stronger protections of user data from unauthorized access.
   Easier-to-use privacy tools and greater consumer confidence, in turn,
   will support continued growth, innovation, and financial stability in
   the digital era.
   Sara "Scout" Sinclair Brody

   Executive Director, Simply Secure

Explore More on Privacy

   Cybersecurity

   Cyber Week in Review: July 12, 2019
   France approves a 3 percent Digital Services Tax on large tech
   companies; the UK fines British Airways and Marriott for data breaches
   under the GDPR; United States and UK signal relaxation of Huawei
   hardline; trade tensions drive tech companies out of China; and U.S.
   mayors unite against paying ransom to hackers.

   Blog Post by Adam Segal July 11, 2019 Net Politics

   Cybersecurity

   Will the Future Bring Digital Trench Warfare Between the EU and China?
   Four scenarios for the future of digital geopolitical conflicts

   Blog Post by Guest Blogger for Net Politics June 26, 2019 Net Politics

   Digital Policy

   Cyber Week in Review: May 31, 2019
   This week: House Speaker Pelosi takes on Facebook; a new global pact on
   AI; tech industry stakeholders criticize UK security agency proposal;
   U.S.-Huawei legal saga continues; and, Google issues new privacy
   standards for its extensions.

   Blog Post by Adam Segal May 31, 2019 Net Politics

Top Stories on CFR

   Sanctions

   What Are Economic Sanctions?
   For many policymakers, economic sanctions have become the tool of
   choice to respond to major geopolitical challenges such as terrorism
   and conflict.

   Backgrounder by Jonathan Masters August 12, 2019

   China

   Is China Manipulating Its Currency?
   The Trump administration has declared China a currency manipulator, but
   what that means for the ongoing trade war is far from clear.

   In Brief by Brad W. Setser August 8, 2019

   Women and Economic Growth

   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries
   The education gender gap costs the world between $15 trillion and $30
   trillion in human capital. U.S. aid programs need to equip girls and
   women to participate in the modern digital economy.

   Policy Innovation Memorandum by Meighan Stone and Rachel B. Vogelstein
   August 7, 2019 Women and Foreign Policy Program

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

   Public Health
   Daniel Becerril/Reuters

   Public Health Threats and Pandemics

   The E-cigarette Backlash
   An outbreak of a lung illness linked to vaping is raising concern
   worldwide and putting pressure on countries to rein in the booming
   e-cigarette industry.

   In Brief by Claire Felter October 2, 2019


   Vaping on the Rise in U.S., Especially Among Young People

   via Pew Research Center September 26, 2019


   The Mysterious Vaping Illness That’s ‘Becoming an Epidemic’

   via New York Times September 11, 2019
   Central America
   John Moore/Getty Images

   El Salvador

   The Troubled Northern Triangle
   The United States is struggling to respond to the latest wave of
   migrants fleeing poverty, violence, and corruption in El Salvador,
   Guatemala, and Honduras.

   Backgrounder by Amelia Cheatham October 1, 2019


   Congress Can Hold Trump Accountable on Honduras

   by Paul J. Angelo via The Hill September 18, 2019


   American Cities Reduced Violence—Will the Same Strategies Work in the
   Northern Triangle?

   by Steven Dudley via Foreign Affairs August 22, 2019
   Hong Kong

   Hong Kong

   An Economic Solution for Hong Kong
   After months of large-scale protests in Hong Kong, the city’s future as
   a bridge between mainland China and the outside world is in serious
   jeopardy. Fortunately, all sides share an interest in pursuing more
   inclusive growth within the “one country, two systems” framework that
   has been critical to Hong Kong’s success.

   by A. Michael Spence September 30, 2019

   China

   Democracy in Hong Kong
   As China’s power continues to grow, some fear that the considerable
   autonomy Hong Kong has enjoyed over the last three decades could slip
   away.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert September 30, 2019


   How China Sees the Hong Kong Crisis

   by Andrew J. Nathan via Foreign Affairs September 30, 2019
   China

   China

   Communist China’s Painful Human Rights Story
   The Chinese Communist Party has used arbitrary detention to maintain
   power since the People’s Republic of China was founded seventy years
   ago.

   by Jerome A. Cohen September 26, 2019


   The Problem With Xi’s China Model

   by Elizabeth C. Economy via Foreign Affairs March 6, 2019

   China

   The Chinese Communist Party
   The Chinese Communist Party faces a host of pressing domestic and
   international policy challenges as it transitions to a new generation
   of leaders.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert and Beina Xu September 27, 2019
   United States

   Politics and Government

   The Impeachment Inquiry: What to Know

   Blog Post by James M. Lindsay September 25, 2019 The Water's Edge


   Read the Released Whistleblower Complaint

   via U.S. House Intelligence Committee September 26, 2019


   The Other Ukraine Scandal: Trump’s Threats to Our Ambassador Who
   Wouldn’t Bend

   by Philip H. Gordon and Daniel Fried via Washington Post September 29,
   2019
   United Nations

   Donald Trump

   Stressing ‘Nation’ at UN General Assembly
   Though Trump’s tone was solemn and even-keeled, the overall thrust of
   his UN General Assembly speech was of transactional nationalism,
   emphasizing the importance of pursuing national interests and combating
   globalism.

   Blog Post by Stewart M. Patrick September 24, 2019 The Internationalist


   ‘America First’ Means a Retreat From Foreign Conflicts

   by Charles A. Kupchan via Foreign Affairs September 26, 2019


   Read President Trump’s Remarks at the UN General Assembly

   via White House September 25, 2019

CFR on the Record

   View All

   United Nations

   A Conversation With Minister Adel al-Jubeir of Saudi Arabia
   For further reading, please see the CFR In Brief “Trump’s Iran-Saudi
   Arabia Dilemma” by Philip H. Gordon, the CFR blog post “Scale and
   Nature of Attacks on Saudi Oil Makes This One Different” by Amy M.
   Jaffe, and the CFR quiz “See How Much You Know About Saudi Arabia.”

   Event with Adel al-Jubeir September 24, 2019

   Pakistan

   A Conversation With Prime Minister Imran Khan of Pakistan
   Prime Minister Imran Khan discusses the current state of U.S.-Pakistan
   relations, recent developments in the disputed region of Kashmir, and
   Pakistan’s relationship with India, Afghanistan, and other neighboring
   countries.

   Event with Imran Khan September 23, 2019

   United States

   CEO Speaker Series With Randall Stephenson
   Randall Stephenson discusses his business strategy and lessons learned
   from leading AT&T. The CEO Speaker Series is a unique forum for leading
   global CEOs to share their insights on issues at the center of commerce
   and foreign policy, and to discuss the changing role of business
   globally. HAASS: Well, good afternoon. Welcome to the Council on
   Foreign Relations. I’m Richard Haass, president of the Council, and
   today we have one of our meetings in the series on CEO speakers. It is
   on the record. Anything you say can and will be used against you.
   STEPHENSON: I didn’t know that. I want to dismiss myself. (Laughter.)
   HAASS: Do you want to leave now? We are pleased to welcome Randall
   Stephenson of AT&T to the Council for a conversation. He has been
   chairman and CEO for more than a decade now, twelve years give or take.
   STEPHENSON: Sounds like fifteen minutes underwater. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Well, hopefully this won’t. He’s, obviously, been involved directly and
   personally in any number of consequential decisions, most recently with
   the acquisition of Time Warner. I should also say that AT&T’s been
   generous, committing over a billion dollars over his years to a variety
   of education, retraining, and diversity initiatives, some within the
   company, some beyond the company. Full disclosure—important to give
   that—they’re a corporate member here at the Council on Foreign
   Relations, as was Time Warner in its—when it was an independent
   company. What we are going to do is Mr. Stephenson and I are going to
   have a conversation for a few minutes. Then we’ll open it up to you,
   our members, to ask the tough questions that I didn’t have the wit to
   ask. Let me just—thirty-second plug for the Council on Foreign
   Relations. Just this morning we issued our most recent task force
   report, Innovation and National Security: Keeping Our Edge. And I
   commend it to anyone in this room and beyond because it’s a real
   emphasis on what we need to do here at home, and that one can’t ask
   everything of our diplomats or our military. There are certain things
   we have to do as a society in order to put ourselves in a position
   where we can do what we need to to look after all aspects of our
   national security. So again, I really recommend it to you. Thanks for
   coming today. STEPHENSON: Good to be here. Thanks for having me. Happy
   to. HAASS: So let’s begin with China. I’ve been in this business a
   while, and I can’t think of another major relationship with the United
   States that has changed, and to give a sense of directionality,
   deteriorated as quickly and as dramatically as the U.S.-China
   relationship has in the last couple of years. And everyone decries the
   lack of bipartisanship in Washington; this is actually fairly
   bipartisan. If you listened to the Democratic debate the other night,
   the anti-China rhetoric was pretty—was pretty robust. What has been
   your experience with China? I mean, for example, a couple of questions
   come to mind. One, do you—are you aware that they’ve taken your
   technology? Have you—have you had a problem with that with China? I
   know you’re doing business with Huawei in places like Mexico. What
   has—what has been your experience with them? Have they been essentially
   a good partner or something less? STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) One of the
   companies over in China that’s a large-scale creator of—builder of
   telecommunication equipment, one of the first products they ever put
   out, and did quite well with, was a very close replica of a PBX back in
   the old days, in the 1960s, that was made by AT&T. (Laughs.) HAASS:
   What a coincidence. STEPHENSON: It was, probably coincidental.
   (Laughter.) So in terms of firsthand experience, you know, we’ve had
   our share of, you know, challenges and concerns in that regard. In
   terms of, you know, implications to AT&T specifically, we’ve had few
   issues because by and large we’re not allowed to do business there. We
   are prohibited from doing business. Now, we do have some points of
   presence and so forth. We’re allowed to do some things, carry traffic
   for customers. But we’ve had very little, little experience doing
   business within China. Now that has changed, obviously, with the
   acquisition of Time Warner. You know, Aquaman did $600 million before
   it got to the shores of the United States, and so that’s changing a
   little bit with this acquisition. But you know, my main thoughts as it
   relates to China is just what’s happening just domestically
   economically here in the United States as a result of what’s recently
   transpired, because I was one of the zealots, biggest supporters in
   terms of some of the economic policies of this administration. But all
   of these positives that have been generated over the last couple of
   years—predominantly business investment, which had been growing 6, 7
   percent year over year just consecutively like clockwork since the tax
   reform went in on corporations—we’re now in a manufacturing recession.
   And it’s—if you had to point your finger at, you know, something, it
   would be one of two things. It would be the Chinese situation and the
   Mexico situation. HAASS: Because it’s probably not that interest rates
   are not low enough. STEPHENSON: I don’t think anybody’s having trouble
   accessing capital right now, yeah. HAASS: (Laughs.) STEPHENSON:
   Accessing capital is not an issue. HAASS: If we end up in a world where
   we have, if not divorce, separation from China, and fairly separate
   supply lines and markets, and a lack of technology sharing, how much
   more difficult does that make business for you, or not? I mean, like if
   we end up in a slightly bifurcated world, what does it mean for a large
   company like yours? STEPHENSON: Yeah, I— HAASS: Does it make a
   difference? STEPHENSON: Yeah, it makes a heck of a difference. I think
   it makes a heck of a difference just on the United States, and a
   company like ours is dependent upon the health and vibrancy of the
   United States economy. And if you end up in a place where it’s—I don’t
   believe it’s China and the rest of the world; I think it’s China and
   others and the rest of the world, one could argue maybe some—to some
   extent it’s East versus West. And when you think about where is the
   growth in the global economy, you know, Asia is where the growth is.
   HAASS: Where the people are. STEPHENSON: And so if you’re a U.S.
   economy—and we just had this conversation; 5 percent of the population,
   20, 25 percent of the world’s economy—you’re kind of dependent upon
   trade if you want to keep growing your 25 percent share. And so a world
   where you are cut off from a significant amount of global growth, from
   our standpoint that’s a problem. And so where do you have to look, you
   know, Africa? Well, China’s doing a lot in Africa. I don’t know how
   this bifurcation happens. Perhaps Latin America we could do well with.
   But yeah, it’s disconcerting for a company that’s dependent upon U.S.
   growth. HAASS: One last thing that’s related to China. If there’s a
   trade deal with China, I think it’s possible to include things like
   market access and the Chinese will make certain commitments, again, on
   technology and the rest. The one area I can’t see a trade deal really
   accomplishing is a—is anything that would have a major reduction in
   Chinese subsidies from the state to their state-owned enterprises. And
   one of the areas that would, obviously, have consequences for would be
   things like 5G. Would you be happy with a trade deal that didn’t tackle
   the state subsidy issue, or do you just assume it won’t? STEPHENSON:
   I’m skeptical that a trade deal could be reached that would
   address—you’ve termed state subsidy. Let me just term—use the
   terminology just subsidy in general, because I don’t know how you
   enforce it. So, for example, the way some of the subsidies seem to work
   in China—everybody’s familiar with our industry and Huawei and what
   they do in China. And to put this into perspective, if Huawei could
   achieve in China a 90 percent share of Chinese communications, market
   share, they by definition have 30 to 40 percent global share. That’s a
   big deal. Now, if they could get another 10, 20 percent outside of
   China and start to get 40, 50 percent global share, this is a problem.
   This is a problem for the West. This is a problem for Western supply
   chain. How could they get that other 10 to 20 percent share around the
   globe? You talk about subsidies. I mean, it’s real easy to conceive of
   a situation where a Chinese communications company puts out a bid,
   Huawei bids at a premium to what everybody else bids, and Huawei wins
   it. They have 90 percent share in China. Now they go bid in Europe,
   what do you think happens? The flip. They bid at 20, 30 percent
   discounts to everybody else, and so as a result they start taking
   significant share outside of China. You go to Latin America, these
   shares are really high. Go to Africa; Huawei shares are really high.
   Europe, I mean, for heaven’s sake, there are many countries in Europe
   where they have 40 and 50 percent share. And so this company is gaining
   significant share in mobile technology around the world. And this is—if
   you don’t mind me just kind of bridging real briefly, they’ve gained
   this share in a world of 4G, fourth-generation technology. You go,
   well, OK, fine, but what about 5G? They’ve been very smart. They do not
   allow interoperability of their 4G equipment to their 5G equipment. So
   if you get 40 to 50 percent global share of 4G technology, guess what
   you’ve ensured yourself for 5G? Forty to 50 percent 5G market share.
   This is something that we in the West need to be conscious of and aware
   of. And while I don’t always endorse the approaches of our
   administration, I think the mindset, the thought process, the concern
   is probably on target. HAASS: Let me return to that in a few minutes,
   but let me—I want to touch on a couple of other subjects before we open
   it up. I want to talk about corporate America for a second. I assume
   many people in the room saw the Business Roundtable statement. I think
   you were one of the signatories. Essentially, the message was
   shareholder return can’t be our only preoccupation; we’ve got to have a
   wider sense of constituencies and stakeholders. But how do you
   navigate—it’s one thing to say that, but then you’ve got your quarterly
   reports. You’ve got something called Mr. Market that’s looking at you
   on a regular basis. How do you navigate a world where on one hand
   people are saying you’ve got to be sensitive to multiple
   constituencies, but—it’s a big “but”—we still care about your bottom
   line as shareholders? Is this an impossible dual mandate? STEPHENSON:
   No, I don’t—I don’t think it is at all. I mean, a lot of the media—the
   Wall Street Journal hyperventilated over it, and—that how can this be
   the case. I would represent that this is not anything new. If you
   really want to have a sustainable business model, sustainable what I’ll
   call free markets, you better be mindful and you better be cautious
   about things like supply chains, diversity, communities, and so forth.
   I just believe that if you’re not you have fracturing in a society, if
   corporations just run oblivious to that. You have to be mindful about
   your employees. I mean, how can you possibly expect to have a
   sustainable, profitable business over time if you’re ignoring all of
   these other variables? And so to me it’s the most logical thing in the
   world to think that the purpose of a corporation is to serve all those
   constituencies if you want to have a true sustainable model. HAASS:
   Keep moving around. AI, robotics, autonomous vehicles, this is the
   world we’re living in. You’ve established yourself—you being AT&T—as
   one of the leaders in the corporate world with reskilling, with
   training, education. If I’ve got it right, you basically go to your
   workforce in some cases and say you’re in a job, you’re doing great;
   the problem is this job is not going to exist in a year. What have—what
   have you learned from this? What’s working and what’s not working in
   terms of transitioning your workforce from today to tomorrow? What’s
   been your—what’s been your experience? STEPHENSON: What works is, first
   of all, making sure your employees understand how the world is
   changing. I mean, there has to be an awareness among your employees in
   terms of what is happening. Where are the jobs going? What jobs are
   going to be relevant three, five years from now, and what jobs are
   disappearing? And the one thing that—I wish I could take credit for
   this—our HR folks did was that starting point is out in our HR systems,
   when you go look at a particular job opening, it shows you what
   direction are those jobs going. Are they going up or are they going
   down? And if it’s a job where the number—the demands for the job are
   actually increasing, that’s heightening. That’s an awareness. That’s a
   really important thing. And so that’s a really important variable. And
   it seems basic, but a lot of people miss this. And so the employee
   understands this is where this thing is going. And you could think of
   the kind of areas; if I’m a telephone repairman, you know, and I go and
   click on for an opening, they’re going to see that that thing is doing
   this. You probably ought to be aware that’s not a kind of job that you
   want to be moving into. HAASS: Where does the CEO fit on that?
   (Laughter.) Sorry, cheap shot. (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, I don’t
   know that most people want it, to be honest with you. (Laughter.) But
   the other thing is, do you make it really, really easy for the
   employees to know what is required for the jobs they want to seek? And
   that sounds easy too, but you know, here are the certifications that
   are required, and if you want these certifications here’s where you go
   to get those certifications. Click this, this, this, take these
   classes, do this training, and now you are qualified for this job. And
   you can begin to truly move people—it doesn’t happen overnight, but you
   can truly begin to move people into the new world and into the new
   jobs, and it takes a period of time. I would say—we started this seven
   years ago and we said this is probably one of the most difficult
   logistical things we’ve ever tackled. And we build big networks and,
   you know, we do big logistical challenges, and this was one of the more
   difficult ones we took on. And I reflect back over seven years, and I
   have to say this is one of the areas that I take most satisfaction in
   over the last seven years, is how this has moved and transformed a
   workforce. HAASS: Let’s talk about healthcare for a second. You know,
   this country spends roughly—close to a fifth of its GDP in the area of
   healthcare. I don’t know the details of your program. STEPHENSON:
   Five-and-a-half billion dollars. HAASS: OK. So, again talking about the
   recent Democratic debates, a large number of the Democratic candidates
   are talking about some version of a large public option, in some cases
   taking away a private option. As someone who is spending this, you have
   hundreds of thousands of employees, what is your sense of where you
   want the government to go with healthcare? STEPHENSON: You know, look,
   if I were just saying purely financially motivated, government just
   takes over healthcare? Wow. I mean, five-and-a-half billion dollars a
   year we spend on it, right? That seems like an unlikely scenario, and I
   don’t think that it’s a scenario that is in the best interests of our
   employees. I do think we have to have a really vibrant, good, healthy
   safety net and access for people who are in areas of the economy where
   they can’t get healthcare. I’m all in and I’m all-in supportive of
   that. But the idea that the government is going to take over providing
   health care for—we insure I think somewhere around a million-and-a-half
   lives between retirees and actives. And taking that and dumping into a
   government system—that’s just one company—feels like a really, really
   big deal. And you know I don’t know. Some would say it’s too
   paternalistic, but I worry about the healthcare for our employees. We
   do a lot not just to control costs; we do a lot to ensure that our
   employees live healthy lifestyles—productivity, just their own
   longevity, et cetera. And once you start kind of abdicating that
   responsibility from companies, where does that lead you in terms of the
   general health of your employee body? I think it’s important that we as
   CEOs and companies have a vested interest in the health of our people.
   I think it’s a good thing. I think it’s a productive thing for society.
   HAASS: We actually practice that here, so we feel good about it. One of
   the—another area of emerging bipartisanship is hostility or
   questioning—I’ll make—I’ll dial it down a bit—towards big technology
   companies. Motivations may be different between the left and the right,
   but we see—whether it’s antitrust-based or regulation-based, we see the
   environment in which technology companies are operating in, clearly the
   temperature’s changing on that. STEPHENSON: Oh, boy. HAASS: What’s your
   reading of that, whether this would be welcome, or in some areas it
   might, in some areas it wouldn’t? To what extent are you concerned or
   potentially relieved that the government may be moving in this
   direction? STEPHENSON: I’m never one to wave a flag say go regulate or
   take on antitrust efforts on other companies. It’s just kind of against
   my nature. But it’s—it is interesting, and probably even ironic, that
   for twenty years the government seemed to have—didn’t seem to have; the
   government, the United States government, even state governments had a
   deliberate policy of light-touch oversight and regulation of the
   internet companies, and it was for good reason. They wanted to see
   these technologies flourish. It was good for America, get technological
   leadership. And so there has been a very, very light touch and
   hands-off approach to a lot of these companies, and mission
   accomplished. These companies have thrived, and we now have a lot of
   these companies who have a very significant share in the—in the domains
   where they operate. And you know, you think about AT&T, you know, back
   in the day we were regulated heavily as a monopoly until our market
   share fell below about 50 percent. We now have these companies that are
   now operating in domains where they’re having 60, 70 percent share of
   the particular areas where they operate. It probably should not be a
   surprise that people—attention is being heightened in terms of
   antitrust concerns. And are they legitimate, are they, you know,
   appropriate? I’ll let the authorities worry about that. But nobody
   should be surprised when you start getting 50, 60 percent market shares
   in these areas that the government starts looking closely at the
   behaviors. HAASS: And your sector is also an example where antitrust
   was applied, and after some degree of disruption quite a lot of
   companies did just fine. STEPHENSON: A lot of—AT&T, I would suggest.
   HAASS: Just to mention one, yes. (Laughs.) STEPHENSON: Company has done
   quite well in a—in a deregulated environment, and it is
   hypercompetitive. It’s a fun industry, but yeah, it took a little
   government intervention to get us to that place as well. HAASS: OK. Net
   Neutrality, let’s raise that—put that on the—I expect you got some
   opinions on— STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) HAASS: —on that, about what ought to
   be government policy in that area and how we ought to price it.
   STEPHENSON: I always start a conversation with Net Neutrality out with
   what does it mean, because if I were to just ask various tables to give
   me a definition of Net Neutrality, I— HAASS: You can’t ask this table,
   by the way. (Laughter.) I don’t care what they think. (Laughs.)
   STEPHENSON: I would—I would get multiple definitions of what it
   actually means. And if what we’re talking about is that there should be
   unfettered access to the content on the internet, and that, you know,
   companies like ours should not be able to block anybody from getting to
   certain content, or throttle you in terms of your use of content—we
   can’t treat AT&T’s HBO Max streaming better than Netflix’s
   streaming—and somebody ought to be able to develop a device that would
   connect to the internet and it ought to work as well as anybody else’s
   device, if you say that’s Net Neutrality, then by all means I think
   that’s important. I think it’s important to the growth, the
   development—the continued development of the internet. I think, in
   fact, that it is so important people in Congress ought to step up and
   do something about it, and actually ought to legislate what I just
   said. Instead, what we do is we have—we write the worst legislation in
   the world anymore. We write just kind of frameworks as legislation. We
   hand it off to a bunch of bureaucrats to regulate it. And depending on
   who is president one interprets it this way over here, and so companies
   orient themselves, they set up their business models over here. And
   then there’s an election, new president comes in, and we’re swinging
   all the way back over here, and you’re oriented over here, and your
   business practices are changing, and you don’t know how to invest in
   ten-, fifteen-year-horizon networks and so forth based on this kind of
   phenomenon. And so this is one of these areas that people need to step
   up and do their job and pass some legislation on this. This is a—this
   is chaotic for businesses who are trying to keep the U.S. in the
   leadership position on the internet. HAASS: So your view is almost
   whatever you decide just decide it and stick with it? STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   and I think there are some really broad frameworks that people can
   agree on. And it’s not too dissimilar from what I just articulated. I
   mean, there will be some—look, we’re all rent-seekers. You start this
   process and everybody’s going to be in there trying to get this thing
   and that thing. We just got to keep focused. And I will give credit on
   some of the recent legislation passed by Congress on tax reform on the
   corporate side—not the individual, but the corporate side. There were
   some big, broad principles that said get those competitive U.S. tax
   rate. There are some big, broad principles on Net Neutrality we should
   be able to legislate and get done. HAASS: I want to return just for one
   minute to 5G. And you know, given the way you’ve now—you know, where
   your company is with the acquisitions, you’ve got content, you’ve got
   distribution. The question is, given what we’ve said about China, given
   some of the European companies— STEPHENSON: Right. HAASS: —given
   Verizon, whether you think AT&T can be competitive in the 5G space.
   STEPHENSON: Oh yeah, I think we’ll be very—I think we’ll be leaders in
   the 5G space. We already are. When you think about, you know, what kind
   of determines how 5G rolls out, the first step is, how do you set
   standards so that you can get everybody manufacturing gear and
   equipment that guys like us go out and deploy? The standards are
   everything. And so AT&T was the leader in the standards-setting
   process. Now, something you should be aware of, for the first time in
   my career the Chinese got very aggressive in this, and they were all
   over the standards-setting process. But we got everything in the
   standards we wanted, that we thought the U.S. needed to have a shot at
   maintaining a leadership position. So standards are set right. We,
   AT&T, in anticipation of this, have been buying up, spending billions
   of dollars on acquiring wireless licenses, because when you think about
   5G, you got to have a lot of airwaves to pump all of these volumes
   through. We’ve spent over $40 billion over the last ten years on
   acquiring the licenses so that you can have the bandwidth to pump all
   this through. I will tell you AT&T is as in good a shape as anybody in
   the world. I think we’re in the best position in the United States and
   as good as anybody in the world. So mission accomplished there. We have
   a balance sheet that we’re committing to this and we’re investing in
   it. So I feel really good about that. We have great technology. We’ve
   done a good job on getting the technology ready. Here’s where we have a
   problem. If you’re thinking about your competition, you said Europe. I
   don’t think anybody in Europe has even issued an RFP for 5G yet, truly.
   So I set Europe aside. They have gone from first to worst in the—in the
   world of mobility for—you can debate why. But Europe is not in play
   right now. It’s China. If we want a leadership position, it’s vis-à-vis
   China. You want to deploy 5G, what are the big barriers? I’ve talked
   about some of the barriers, which we’ve now broken through. We’re past
   those, spectrum and standards and the equipment and so forth. Now you
   got to go out and put this stuff up. You got to go out and deploy
   thousands upon thousands of cell sites. Now, I don’t think in
   China—they’re spending three years trying to get San Francisco to
   approve a cell site. I suspect in China, when they want a cell site
   they go put up a cell site where they want it, and they’re putting up
   millions upon millions of cell sites while we’re over here kind of
   debating and thrashing through local/municipal regulations, state
   regulations, federal regulations trying just to get the infrastructure
   permits to put this stuff in place. And so if there’s a place where
   we’re going to fall behind, China is going to be able to go much faster
   in that regard than the U.S. will. And I’m not saying their approach is
   better. I get the environmental concerns, aesthetics, appearance. But
   we have people wearing aluminum-foil suits because they’re afraid of
   5G, right, and fighting deployment of 5G. I don’t think they’re dealing
   with that in China. HAASS: What about the regulatory side or the—so
   much of the spectrum is reserved for the military. Do you basically
   feel that the government has to change policies so you can do what you
   want to do with 5G? STEPHENSON: No, if there’s one area I have to tip
   my hat to the government, both the Obama administration and this
   administration, it is getting spectrum out into the marketplace. And
   there have been numerous auctions conducted. I told you we spent forty
   billion (dollars). The lion’s share of that have been in government
   auctions, acquiring airwaves. There have been already a handful of
   auctions on these really-high-frequency airwaves, which will make this
   stuff really hum. We’ve participated in a couple of those. There’s
   another one coming up this year. So I think our government is doing a
   really good job of getting the airwaves out into the hands of the
   market and the people who will deploy these networks. And that—we’re
   not lagging behind the Chinese in that regard. HAASS: You know, this is
   the Council on Foreign Relations. For a second I’m going to make it the
   Council on Financial Relations. One of my many joys in recent days was
   reading a twenty-plus page letter from Mr. Singer and company, from
   Elliott, sent you all advising you. So the criticisms or reactions
   about the idea that you’ve put together through acquisition rather than
   organic growth where you are, content and distribution, that
   essentially this is an old-fashioned conglomerate and that’s not a good
   idea anymore, how do you—how do you take that, other than not well?
   STEPHENSON: Look, I—the letter was—you know, I didn’t take the letter
   poorly. It was interesting to me the letter laid out some
   recommendations, and the recommendations seemed to be supportive of the
   strategy, the importance of Time Warner, the acquisition, and the
   importance of 5G which we have been talking about here, and the—and the
   power of the assets. You know, they actually talk about it in those
   terms. So, look, I read the letter, and candidly there were some areas
   that I just read and I thought, you know what, they make some good
   points. And we’ll engage with them on those points. It was a mixed bag,
   though. There were some that I read and I go, I’m not sure that’s so
   clear to me. And so those are areas we’ll also want to get some more
   detail. I mean, say what you will about Paul Singer’s organization,
   they’re smart people. They’ve got some really smart people. And so if
   they have some good ideas, I’m dying to sit down and we’ll grind
   through them and see what makes sense for all of our shareholders—not
   just one, but all of our shareholders. HAASS: One last question, then
   I’m going to open it up. When you went through the hoops of the merger,
   there were all sorts of questions about whether you would advantage
   your own content in your own distribution systems and disadvantage
   those of others. Where does that stand now? Because you now have all
   this content coming out of HBO and other places, and you’ve got your
   pipes so to speak. To what extent do others who want to get into your
   distribution system, other streaming services, how do they compete? How
   is—how is all this going to play out? STEPHENSON: It’s playing out
   exactly as we said it would play out in the courts. And I—it’s—there is
   not a whit difference between what we established as our position in
   the courts, and that is as a media company—I see Wolf and the team down
   here, CNN—I can’t even begin to fathom the motivation that would say we
   want to limit CNN’s distribution just to AT&T’s platforms. That is a
   mindless proposition. You develop and you spend a lot of money on
   developing great premium content, and how do you make money on it? Wide
   and broad distribution. You want to distribute it everywhere. And it’s
   the same with HBO. We want HBO distributed as broadly and as widely as
   we possibly can. That’s the way you create value out of franchises like
   HBO. And you know, we recently had a drop from Charlie Ergen on DISH
   Networks. He dropped HBO. You know, we didn’t stand up at home and
   start doing high-fives that DISH is not carrying HBO. You know, that’s
   a lot of distribution to lose. That’s how you make money. I see Sam
   Feist back there. Do you want more or less distribution for CNN, Sam?
   Q: I’ll take more. STEPHENSON: You’ll take more. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Good answer. STEPHENSON: And so I always felt like the government’s
   lawsuit felt a bit nonsensical. And I think what we’re seeing play out
   in the marketplace since the deal closed is affirming that, and I’m
   having a hard time conceiving of a—of a time where we have said, hold
   that content back from Comcast or hold it back from Charter. No, we’re
   saying how do we get it deployed and distributed on Comcast and
   Charter. HAASS: OK. I’ve already asked more than I know, so let me open
   it up to our members. Again, it’s on the record. Wait for a microphone.
   We’ll recognize you. Let us know who you are and keep it succinct. No
   speeches, just a question. Only Mr. Stephenson gets to give speeches
   today. STEPHENSON: I’ll try to be succinct. HAASS: Ray? Q: Ray Tanter
   of the American Committee on Human Rights and the Iran Policy
   Committee. STEPHENSON: Hi, Ray. Q: Sir, do you think that Huawei is
   playing chess while we are playing checkers? STEPHENSON: Who? HAASS:
   Huawei. Q: (Off mic)—the other day. STEPHENSON: Oh, Huawei? Q: Huawei.
   HAASS: They actually played go, not chess. But anyhow. (Laughter.) Just
   a technical fix here. STEPHENSON: Well, I think they’re really smart,
   and I’ve—as you heard me articulate, I think they’ve made some very
   smart strategic plays. And this issue of disallowing interoperability
   between 4G and 5(G)—I don’t want to get technical, but that’s a big
   deal. And you know, if you’ve got the 4G layer and you can’t
   interoperate to 5G, then you are beholden to Huawei for 5G. So— HAASS:
   Isn’t that kind of what Apple does when they basically tell you that
   your charger that worked with one generation doesn’t work with the next
   generation? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, but changing out a
   thousand-dollar smartphone is different than—if you—if you don’t want
   to use Huawei for 5G, then you have to go rip and replace your
   fourth-generation network and put in another player. So, look, this is
   a really big deal. We, AT&T, have led the effort on something—I’ll try
   to make this as simple as possible, but virtualization of networks,
   putting as much of the electronics out on the edge as possible, but
   more importantly I refer to open source—open-source software. So we’ve
   developed—worked with the industry to develop a software layer that is
   the operating system for 5G. This is the software layer. It makes all
   the stuff talk to each other, if you will. We developed a software
   platform here and we contributed it into the open-source community.
   It’s out there. And guess what this thing is? It facilitates
   interoperability. And a significant amount of the players around the
   world have said that is the software layer we want in our 5G
   deployment. It’s a really big deal. It will take a while to get this
   scaled to both—to all levels of the network, but as you get open source
   out there it enhances security—because you got everybody out there
   auditing this software and identifying bugs and so forth and you fix
   it—but it creates the opportunity for interoperability, and what it
   does is says nobody sells a box with software just embedded in it. No,
   you have the software up here in a layer and any box can run that
   software. Why is that important? Because suddenly you have had a
   technological solution for this locking in people to a certain
   technology, if you know what I’m saying. So if you’re wanting to buy
   Huawei equipment, it’s a box with software in it. We don’t need that.
   We’ve got our software; we just need boxes. We need more what I’ll
   commodity-type boxes. This is a technological revolution that I think
   can be our fix in the long run for how we ensure that the Western
   supply chains are not dismantled by virtue of a Huawei strategy here.
   So it’s—we’re going to have to be smart. I take my hat off to the
   administration on some of the things they’re doing, the entity list and
   so forth. But I think these kind of solutions are technological
   solutions that ensure we have a level playing field for everybody who
   wants to use something other than Huawei. HAASS: Shane Green.
   STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick. Q: Hi. I’m with a personal data platform called—
   STAFF: (Off mic.) Q: Shane Green. Sorry, I wasn’t sure if that was
   redundant. (Laughs.) Another area that China has a big advantage given
   their approach to technology is around data and privacy. Some people
   are calling it surveillance state and they’re actively exporting it. I
   think Freedom House has listed about thirty-five countries that are
   actively deploying their approach to surveilling their own
   people—creating a citizenship score, there’s all these sorts of things.
   Europe’s taking a pretty big or different approach with GDPR, and there
   were, you know, serious sensitivities around privacy. I’m curious how
   you see that, especially given that you’re both in the role of, you
   know, infrastructure and telecom, but also in the content business
   where, you know, collecting data and using it in advertising and the
   like is really important. So I’m curious about your thoughts on that.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah, this is—this is a big issue, and I’m going to back up
   a little before I just get to the core of your question. But, look, the
   beginning of your question is very relevant, and the paper that McRaven
   and the folks wrote here at CFR, I browsed it this morning, but it
   talks about the technologies that China has established as areas they
   want to advance and be in the leadership in: AI, quantum, and 5G. Those
   are not independent; those are interdependent. And if you think about
   all of these—and they have established them as the premise for economic
   as well as military leadership. And when you think about AI, what is
   the—what is the fuel that makes AI relevant? It’s data—data, data,
   data, data, data. That’s what AI is all about. As I said, the Chinese
   aren’t spending a lot of cycles and a lot of time, you know, permitting
   cell sites. They’re not spending a lot of cycles and time on privacy
   policies, and what data can we use, and what data can we collect. 5G is
   going to allow sensors all over the—all over the place. 4G networks, in
   a square mile you can connect thousands of devices. 5G, millions of
   devices per square mile, much lower power, much lower compute
   requirements. So data is going to be thrown off of this stuff. They
   have no issues with collecting data and using data, which will power
   AI, which will make their AI much more advanced and much more powerful.
   To make that AI relevant, you’re going to have to have different
   compute algorithms, quantum. Quantum is critical for all of this. And
   if you’re going to have great data, AI, great quantum, what are you
   going to need? You need to move this data around in real time. That’s
   why 5G is so critical. These all fit together, OK? Now, in the United
   States we are headed down a path, unless—here I go again—Congress acts.
   We’re headed down a path where California now has a data privacy rule,
   you have I believe Washington—I’m looking at my guys over here. Maine
   has a different privacy rule. There are multiple states working on
   their own privacy rules. They will all be different. If you’re a
   consumer, you’re not going to know what the rules are for how one
   company handles your data versus another. If you’re a company, it’s
   going to be hard to kind of manage this across fifty different states,
   while the Chinese are over there doing this. (Snaps fingers.) We need
   privacy legislation at the federal level. It needs to be robust. It
   needs to be a really good privacy bill where everybody is treated the
   same. But we need to have a privacy bill—this is going to be another
   one of those areas where we’re handicapped in the U.S. because we just
   don’t have rules and a framework that allows us companies—(snaps
   fingers)—to innovate and to move and to—and to really lead in these
   areas. So your question is a very important question. And it’s one that
   if we don’t get right it’s another area where we fall behind. HAASS:
   Well, I’ll just take one minute. Just I want to make sure everybody
   gets it about why 5G is so significant. What will—the speed, the
   capacity, and the rest, but just take a second to say why 5G is not
   just a linear increase, it’s something qualitatively different.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah. So when you talk 5G everybody goes, oh, it’s faster,
   right? And it is. It’s faster. It’s lower latency as well. I mean,
   you’re talking about really low latency, meaning from the time you
   issue a command from a machine or you push a smartphone or
   whatnot—(snaps fingers)—instantaneous reaction to the command. So it’s
   real-time networking. That’s important, but that’s not the gig. It’s
   what does that facilitate. And you heard me already say in a world of
   4G you can connect thousands of devices on a cell site within a square
   mile. (Holds up smartphone.) This. I can have my watch. You can have
   your car that’s connected to it, and you can have devices, thousands of
   them per square mile. 5G, that becomes millions—millions of devices per
   square mile. This becomes the most connected society we have ever
   conceived of. This is really game changing. Now, combine this with in a
   world of 4G you can locate this device—(holds up phone)—or this
   device—(points to watch)—or whatever device, a sensor, to within
   meters. But it’s GPS kind of stuff and it’s not very precise. In a
   world of 5G, you can locate devices within a couple of centimeters. It
   becomes very, very precise in terms of your ability to locate something
   that is connected to this network. Now, think of what—about what that
   means in the world of security. That wigs some people out. Me? Oh, this
   is new security level. This is great security. The idea that I can
   locate where is this relative to a transaction that’s taking place; am
   I within centimeters of a terminal, or can I set up geofence locations
   to say that only people within a very specific location can access
   data? I mean, this allows us to take security to a whole different
   place. That’s really important. Then the last—and these all fit
   together—but it allows what I call hyper-miniaturization. We have these
   big devices. You know, it’s got a big screen. But there’s a lot going
   on inside here. There’s a lot of compute power in here. There’s a lot
   of storage capacity in here. There’s a lot of power requirements to
   make all of that work. And so you have some form factors that are—that
   could be rather large. When the networks are this fast, this
   instantaneous, that compute, that storage, and even the power
   requirements could be pushed out of here back into the network. This
   fundamentally changes form factors over time. Google had the glasses we
   all talked about. This can conceivably become the form factor. You
   don’t need all of the horsepower in these devices. This could become
   your screen to the world. It truly can. You can now think of sensors
   that rather this size they become miniaturized, and they can have power
   that will last ten years because it doesn’t require that much power to
   keep them going. Now you can begin to have all of your
   infrastructure—traffic management, utilities, pipelines—you can begin
   to conceive of how much of a society’s infrastructure is underpinned by
   this kind of technology. Now, as I think about that, that is when I say
   it makes a lot of sense to ask what companies should be underlying the
   development of the equipment underlying this infrastructure? And if
   you’re ever going to be at a place where you’re worried about the
   relationship of a particular company or country, then you ought to be
   mindful as to who’s manufacturing this stuff. And so this is how it
   fits together in my mind and why I think we’re all wise to be
   thoughtful and prudent about how we pursue this. HAASS: What everybody
   also wants to know is whether they’re going to be able to find the
   television remote and—(laughter)— STEPHENSON: There will be no remote
   because you’ll say “turn on CNN” and it’ll just come on, OK? HAASS:
   That’s good. That’s good. Yes, sir. Q: Richard— STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick.
   HAASS: Just wait for a microphone. We all want to hear you. Q: Richard
   Adkerson from Freeport-McMoRan, a copper mining company. Randall—
   STEPHENSON: So you could tell us a thing or two about China here. Q: He
   said I couldn’t give a speech. (Laughter.) I’ve got one to give. But—
   Q: Another time. Q: Another time. Randall, I want to talk to you about
   the role you’ve played representing your own company and business in
   general through The Business Roundtable and other initiatives you’ve
   had. It seems to me we’ve had two administrations now where we’ve had
   real challenges in communicating business interests to government. We
   had some success, as you said, with taxes, but we— STEPHENSON: You’re
   telling me I’ve been an abject failure. Is that what you’re trying to
   say? Yeah. (Laughter.) Q: No, no, no, no, no. It’s a challenge for all
   of us and a challenge for our country—company because our of our impact
   on international relations. But I’d be interested in your comment on it
   just broadly. How do you think it’s—we know the challenges, but do you
   think—are you frustrated by it, encouraged by it? Do you—do you have
   observations of how we might do it better? STEPHENSON: Look, we’re
   dealing with elected officials, and that’s always a different
   environment to be in, right? I mean, these are people who are trying to
   address the interests of very specific constituencies. And so we
   always, I think, as business have to figure out how we make the
   case—and it happens to be the right case—that what we do has virtue,
   what we do has nobility; and what we do does create investment, it does
   create jobs, it does create the opportunity to provide healthcare. We
   educate our workforces. I’m talking people that—with us in the BRT. We
   educate our workforces like nobody else. And so I just—I’ve never been
   able to figure out, Richard, this formula for why is it so hard to
   convey that, you know, with the appropriate regulatory oversight and
   freedom of the press monitoring all of us and making sure we’re doing
   the right thing, but why is it so important or so difficult to convey
   that what is in the broader best interest of American business is in
   the best interest of the American consumer, the American worker? With
   the right constraints around, you know, how we treat people and so
   forth. And that’s why the issue you asked me about a moment ago—you
   know, the purpose of a corporation—that’s why this is so important.
   There has to be a virtuous cycle here. We have to see that a
   corporation has got the best interests of their employees and their
   communities and all of this in mind, because without that you can’t
   have the virtuous circle of profitability and reinvestment back into
   companies that invest in America. And so that’s a hard case to make.
   You know, I’ve sat up here twice today, tried to make it, and have not
   been very effective, obviously. But it doesn’t seem like it’s such a
   difficult concept to grasp if business—if business operates the way
   we’re talking about here. Now, all organizations have people who don’t,
   you know, exactly play by the same rulebook, and those companies need
   to be dealt with, and you need to have enforcement and regulation for
   those reasons. But by and large, large business in America does a
   pretty darn good job of taking care of the interests of the American
   worker. HAASS: I want to put one other question about Time Warner. When
   you—when you all acquired DirecTV, that was sort of a(n)
   engineering/hardware company taking over another engineering/hardware.
   But Time Warner is a creative company. How is that going in terms of
   merging cultures? Very, very different. And what have you learned? How
   is it—essentially, what’s been tougher than you thought, what’s going
   better than you thought? Where does that stand? STEPHENSON: So
   it’s—this is going to be an interesting case study one day because when
   we bought Time Warner and we tried to think about how do we—how do we
   manage this business, how do we preserve the creative culture that’s so
   critical to their success, you’re buying a business that every single
   night every asset drives home. And so how do you preserve the necessary
   culture of a creative company like that, but recognize that that
   industry is changing not on the margin, it’s changing radically? And I
   had this conversation yesterday, that as you think about how you run a
   company like that, you know, you would run Time Warner the way it was
   structured when we bought it one way with one type of person and
   leadership and so forth. But if you’re trying to take what I will call
   a legacy media company and transform it for the new era, would you
   think about organizing and managing it a little differently? Because
   this company, we got to get it pivoted. We got to take all this great,
   fabulous content and all this great talent and figure out how to get
   that content delivered digitally. Because while the amount of—amount of
   content people are consuming every day is actually growing, it’s not
   shrinking—you know, we hear about cord-cutting and oh my God, you know,
   people are not watching. No, people are watching more content, but all
   of the growth is happening on digital. So the pivot we have to run—and
   you know, we’ve done this not in creative cultures before, but we’ve
   done this a thousand times going from a legacy business to a new
   business, transitioning business models from wired line to wireless,
   you know, from old basic dialup to high-speed internet and fiber. You
   know, you run these transitions. Well, the media industry is having to
   run one of these transitions. And so how do you do that without
   breaking the culture that’s so important underlying all of this? And
   this is where we think we have a really unique advantage here if we can
   execute this play, because there are a lot of companies in media trying
   to run this transition and they’re pivoting to a digital model, but
   they don’t have distribution. Their distribution has been cable
   companies, satellite companies, and movie theaters. But what happens
   when that isn’t your primary distribution in the future? You better
   have some kind of direct relationship with the customer. And if there’s
   a media company that has a massive relationship with a massive number
   of customers, they would seem to have an advantage to me. Well, guess
   what? AT&T has 170 million customer relationships. That’s a pretty darn
   good starting point for if you can pivot a company to digital
   distribution. Now, we can take that and drive it through 170 million
   customer relationships. And I tell people we have a couple of early
   datapoints. They’re really early; we’re a year into this now. But HBO,
   in the course of one year, AT&T has been by order of magnitude the
   largest distributor of HBO in a very short period of time. In fact, if
   you look at the number-two distributor, we’re 67 percent larger than
   the number-two distributor. Think about it. It’s going through mobile
   now. It’s going through our broadband product. It’s going through our
   pay TV product. And it’s having an incredible impact in driving HBO
   volumes. And I told you DISH dropped HBO in the second quarter, just
   dropped them cold. (Snaps fingers.) A huge distributor of HBO. HBO grew
   3 percent in the second quarter. How? New distribution, right? And
   content is king. Distribution matters. You put the two together, we
   think there’s an opportunity to transform this media company to digital
   without having to compromise distribution in the interim. HAASS: Time
   for a few more questions. Yes, ma’am. Yeah. Q: Great, thank you. Molly
   Elgin-Cossart with Markle Foundation. STEPHENSON: Hi. Q: I wanted to
   come back to the education and training point. You talked about what
   AT&T has done, laudably, and I’m thinking there’s an entire ecosystem.
   There are other employers. There’s our K-12, which a speaker this
   morning said is actually our biggest national security threat, and
   other postsecondary education and training. And I’m thinking, what do
   you take away from that experience to inform the broader conversation
   about what policymakers should be thinking for education and training
   and for our talent pipeline, other employers? Sort of a slightly
   broader picture. I’d love to hear those insights. STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   this is an interesting question. And if you think about—you called it
   an ecosystem. That’s the right term. We built an ecosystem around
   employee development and reskilling our employee base. It seems to me
   so logical that this would work in a municipality. I mean, why can’t a
   city—pick it; Dallas, where we’re headquartered—why can’t Dallas
   inventory all the jobs in that community and, you know, they should be
   categorized. I mean, the world of AI, this stuff isn’t that hard
   anymore. It’s not that expensive to do anymore. But categorize all
   these jobs, directionally where are these types of jobs going—welders,
   HVAC. I mean, we’re relocating HVAC people into Dallas. Think about
   that, just people to work on air conditioners and heating systems. And
   these pay a lot of money, all right? There’s a demand for people who
   have HVAC skills. Why can we not have an inventory of these? Why can we
   not have very—for the broad base of jobs, what credentials are required
   for those jobs, and giving people access to the credentialing criteria
   to get those jobs? This seems like it would work in a—in a city, in a
   state, one could even argue in a federal environment. It’s not rocket
   science, really. It takes a lot of hard work and a lot of effort. But I
   think there are implications. Tom Friedman has come to me and
   challenged me, why don’t you just stand this up for Dallas, you know?
   And you know, you think about it, maybe there’s a business model here.
   But it just feels like something that could really move the needle in
   terms of getting people ready for the jobs that are growing, the jobs
   that are coming, rather than the jobs that have been. How do you
   reskill a community? HAASS: A little bit of a home-team advertisement:
   that was the subject of our previous task force report. STEPHENSON: Is
   that right? OK. HAASS: Yeah. No, it’s a—I think it’s big issue because
   if we don’t get it right this country’s not going to have—no pun—you
   know, the bandwidth to cope with a lot of things around the world
   unless we get this issue right. Yes, sir? Q: Hi. Eben Kaplan from
   CrowdStrike. You spoke about the tremendous opportunity that the 5G
   infrastructure will create. It also creates tremendous opportunity for
   abuse and destructive power of attacks if someone were to manipulate
   that infrastructure. I wonder where you see the role of the private
   sector versus the public sector in securing that. What’s the—what’s the
   right mix there in order to ensure that we reap those benefits without
   incurring some of the—some of the risks? STEPHENSON: They key word you
   used is “mix.” It’s a mix. And I think—I think we’re really good at
   network security. We invest a lot of money at it. We spend a lot of
   time at it. But you know, our government has a lot of information in
   terms of things that are going on, and they have insights into traffic
   and so forth that’s going over these networks. And putting the entities
   together in a way that protects, first of all, our consumers’ and our
   businesses’ information and data, but that—a lot of that, as you might
   well guess, does happen and does go on. I think as this gets more and
   more sophisticated, and more and more complex, and more and more
   aggressive—David Sanger is somewhere here in the room. If you haven’t
   read his book, go read it; it’ll scare the hell out of you in this
   regard. But we’re going to have to get better and better at partnering
   with government. And I would challenge that it’s got to be a two-way
   flow. Our government tends to like one-way flows, and for these things
   to work it will have to be two-way flows that are more fluid and so
   forth. But it’s going to be critical to partner on this. And David
   Sanger’s book makes the point that it’s hard to get people energized
   and to take action on this if they don’t recognize how significant the
   threat is. And the threat is significant. I mean, think about the
   implications of somebody taking down a significant portion of the
   internet. You could cripple financial communities. You could—you could
   stop a lot of things. And I try not to be too sensational in these
   things but, you know, some very targeted things could have significant
   implications on electric transmission, all right? And these are things
   that ought to be alarming. And we ought to have a bright light focused
   on this and making sure that government and business are working
   together. HAASS: Yes, sir. Q: Thank you. I’m Bob Perry with the
   Stevenson Group of International Consultants. You’ve given a very
   detailed and broad view of the 5G world, primarily in the U.S. and
   maybe other developed markets. My question goes to the developing
   world, specifically Africa. Go back to the year 2000, telephone
   penetration in Africa was maybe 1, 2 percent. Then came the cellphone.
   And now you have mobile use in villages of a hundred people, two
   hundred people. The question is, the opportunity and financial
   governance challenges if 5G move into that space. HAASS: Actually, when
   you answer that, also talk about low-density areas in this country. I
   had the same question, about rural areas. STEPHENSON: You know,
   something’s happened here in the United States that doesn’t get a lot
   of attention, but this is another one of those I believe there’s a
   model here for the world. And I’ve talked to the president of Mexico
   about this, in terms of how you achieve rural coverage in Mexico and
   connect everybody not to wireless telephony, but to connectivity, the
   internet. This is an internet device now, right? And so after 9/11,
   none of the emergency responders could interact and communicate. I
   mean, communications were a disaster after 9/11. Everybody was on
   different protocols. And firemen from Pennsylvania came to New York,
   and they could communicate with New York firemen, and the police
   couldn’t communicate with the fire, and the EMS couldn’t communicate.
   And it was just really, really bad. And so Congress passed legislation
   that instructed that a nationwide network—wireless network—be built for
   the first responder community. It was a big deal. It was called
   FirstNet. And so the government finally came out and did a big bid in
   2016—put out a big bid. We went in hard on this. And this bid said:
   Whoever wins this thing must build out all of America this network for
   first responders. And whoever wins it gets this big block of spectrum,
   airwaves, to build it in. But you got to build out the whole country.
   So very detailed requirements, and specifications, and so forth on
   this. We, AT&T, went in hard, and we won this thing. And we’re building
   out this nationwide network. We’re 60-some-odd percent complete now.
   This is really an amazing thing, because you’re getting this first
   responder network that is truly—it’s a high-performance network.
   Really, really impressive. When the first responders aren’t using it,
   we’re allowed to commercialize it for anybody else. But what’s
   happening? We’re building our rural America for the first responders,
   but the network’s available for rural America. We and the United States
   government are funding this. And you know how it’s funded? It’s
   funded—I told you, we spent $40 billion over the last ten years on
   wireless airwaves at auctions. In one of those auctions, the government
   carved off a few billion dollars of the proceeds and said: This is
   going to be used to help build this network out into rural America. And
   that’s what’s happening here. And I tell you, I watch this and I just—I
   expected this to be big and significant. It’s exceeding all of my
   expectations. And I do—when I talk to government officials around the
   world, I tell them: You need to watch this. This is really important.
   In Africa, in these communities, somebody has to buy the wireless
   airwaves. They’re either releasing those airwaves or they’re paying a
   check to get those airwaves. I think governments should be thinking
   about, how do I set some of that money aside now to take and put back
   into connectivity for our communities that would not otherwise have
   connectivity. So this is a model that I think has a lot of legs could
   be used elsewhere. HAASS: Randall, we’ve only got about a minute left.
   One of the very few principles we try to keep here is that we begin and
   end meetings on time. So many of us are enthralled with the HBO show
   Succession. And after having read the letter from Elliot, what we
   really want to know is to what extent does that tell us what we need to
   know about succession at AT&T? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Well, first of
   all, I have no sons that I can name as my successor. I don’t think that
   would be allowed at all, anyway. But I do love that show. I hope
   everybody’s watching that show. So please, tune in this Sunday night to
   Succession. (Laughter.) OK. HAASS: Thank you very much. STEPHENSON:
   Thank you, Richard. (Applause.) Thanks a lot. (END)

   Event with Randall Stephenson September 18, 2019 CEO Speaker Series

   Europe

   C. Peter McColough Series on International Economics With Sabine
   Lautenschläger
   Sabine Lautenschläger discusses Eurozone conditions and the European
   Central Bank's economic tools, as well as the effects of U.S. trade
   policy on the global economy. The C. Peter McColough Series on
   International Economics brings the world's foremost economic
   policymakers and scholars to address members on current topics in
   international economics and U.S. monetary policy. This meeting series
   is presented by the Maurice R. Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic
   Studies.

   Event with Sabine Lautenschläger September 19, 2019 C. Peter McColough
   Series on International Economics
   View All

   Expert Spotlight
   Robert D. Blackwill Robert D. Blackwill

   Henry A. Kissinger Senior Fellow for U.S. Foreign Policy

   U.S. Foreign Policy Europe and Eurasia Russia

   War by Other Means

   Book February 11, 2016 Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic Studies
   Follow Jamille Bigio Jamille Bigio

   Senior Fellow for Women and Foreign Policy

   Women and Women's Rights Peacekeeping Conflict Prevention

   Controversy Over Sexual Violence in Conflict at the UN Security Council

   Blog Post May 3, 2019 Women Around the World
   Follow Elizabeth C. Economy Elizabeth C. Economy

   C. V. Starr Senior Fellow and Director for Asia Studies

   Asia China Energy and Environment

   The Third Revolution

   Book May 2, 2018 Asia Program
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Explainers

   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs

   1
     __________________________________________________________________

   4
   China Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen

   Pollution Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities

   China Belt and Road Tracker

   This tracker shows how the Belt and Road Initiative has changed
   countries’ bilateral economic relationships with China over time.
   Trade The Truth About Tariffs

   Tariffs have been applied over the years to protect homegrown
   industries and target competitors who are seen as using unfair trade
   practices. They impose costs on both importers and exporters and had
   been in decline until the recent U.S.-China trade spat.
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Experts in the News

   Benn Steil

   Steil: Trade War With China Will Be Factor in the Fed’s Decision-Making
   on Interest Rates

   Via CNBC September 21, 2019
   Steven A. Cook

   Cook: United States Is Prepared to Apply Further Sanctions on Iran And
   Not More

   Via CNN September 18, 2019
   Amy Myers Jaffe

   Myers Jaffe: India and China Should Decrease Their Use of Coal to Be a
   Climate-Neutral Economy

   Via Bloomberg Markets September 17, 2019
   View All

Featured Publications

   China

   The Third Revolution
   The Third Revolution argues that Xi Jinping’s dual-reform
   trajectories—a more authoritarian system at home and a more ambitious
   foreign policy abroad—provide Beijing with new levers of influence that
   the United States must learn to exploit to protect its own interests.

   Book by Elizabeth C. Economy May 2, 2018 Asia Program

   Japan

   Japan Rearmed
   Japan’s United States–imposed postwar constitution renounced the use of
   offensive military force, but, Sheila A. Smith shows, a nuclear North
   Korea and an increasingly assertive China have the Japanese rethinking
   that commitment—and their reliance on U.S. security.

   Book by Sheila A. Smith April 8, 2019 Asia Program

   U.S. Foreign Policy

   The Road Not Taken
   In chronicling the adventurous life of legendary CIA operative Edward
   Lansdale, The Road Not Taken definitively reframes our understanding of
   the Vietnam War.

   Book by Max Boot April 2, 2019
   View All

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

The Rohingya Crisis

   A group of Rohingya refugees after crossing the Bangladesh-Myanmar
   border, September 1, 2017. Mohammad Ponir Hossain/Reuters

   Hundreds of thousands of Rohingya, a Muslim ethnic minority group, are
   fleeing persecution in Myanmar’s western Rakhine State, fueling a
   historic migration crisis.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert and Andrew Chatzky

   Last updated December 5, 2018
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print
   A group of Rohingya refugees after crossing the Bangladesh-Myanmar
   border, September 1, 2017. Mohammad Ponir Hossain/Reuters

   Backgrounder
          Current political and economic issues succinctly explained.

Introduction

   Discriminatory policies of Myanmar’s government since the late 1970s
   have compelled hundreds of thousands of Muslim Rohingya to flee their
   homes in the predominantly Buddhist country. Most have crossed by land
   into Bangladesh, while others have taken to the sea to reach Indonesia,
   Malaysia, and Thailand.
   More From Our Experts
   Shannon K. O'Neil
   China’s Manufacturing Loss Should Be Mexico’s Gain
   Edward Alden
   The Next Stage of the U.S.-China Trade War Will Be Much Worse
   Meighan Stone
   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries

   Beginning in 2017, renewed violence, including reported rape, murder,
   and arson, triggered an exodus of Rohingya amid charges of ethnic
   cleansing against Myanmar’s security forces. Those forces claim they
   are carrying out a campaign to reinstate stability in the western
   region of Myanmar, but international pressure on the country’s elected
   leaders to rein in violence continues to rise.

Who are the Rohingya?

   More on:

   Myanmar

   Rohingya

   Refugees and Displaced Persons

   Aung San Suu Kyi

   Humanitarian Crises

   The Rohingya are an ethnic Muslim minority who practice a
   Sufi-inflected variation of Sunni Islam. There are an estimated 3.5
   million Rohingya dispersed worldwide. Before August 2017, the majority
   of the estimated one million Rohingya in Myanmar resided in Rakhine
   State, where they accounted for nearly a third of the population. They
   differ from Myanmar’s dominant Buddhist groups ethnically,
   linguistically, and religiously.

   The Rohingya trace their origins in the region to the fifteenth
   century, when thousands of Muslims came to the former Arakan Kingdom.
   Many others arrived during the nineteenth and early twentieth
   centuries, when Rakhine was governed by colonial rule as part of
   British India. Since independence in 1948, successive governments in
   Burma, renamed Myanmar in 1989, have refuted the Rohingya’s historical
   claims and denied the group recognition as one of the country’s 135
   official ethnic groups. The Rohingya are considered illegal immigrants
   from Bangladesh, even though many trace their roots in Myanmar back
   centuries.

   Neither the central government nor Rakhine’s dominant ethnic Buddhist
   group, known as the Rakhine, recognize the label “Rohingya,”
   a self-identifying term that surfaced in the 1950s, which experts say
   provides the group with a collective political identity. Though the
   etymological root of the word is disputed, the most widely accepted
   theory is that Rohang derives from the word “Arakan” in the Rohingya
   dialect and ga or gya means “from.” By identifying as Rohingya, the
   ethnic Muslim group asserts its ties to land that was once under the
   control of the Arakan Kingdom, according to Chris Lewa, director of the
   Arakan Project, a Thailand-based advocacy group.
   More From Our Experts
   Shannon K. O'Neil
   China’s Manufacturing Loss Should Be Mexico’s Gain
   Edward Alden
   The Next Stage of the U.S.-China Trade War Will Be Much Worse
   Meighan Stone
   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries
   Map of Rohingya migration routes
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Share Share

What is the legal status of the Rohingya?

   The government refuses to grant the Rohingya citizenship, and as a
   result most of the group’s members have no legal documentation,
   effectively making them stateless. Myanmar’s 1948 citizenship law was
   already exclusionary, and the military junta, which seized power in
   1962, introduced another law twenty years later that stripped the
   Rohingya of access to full citizenship. Until recently, the Rohingya
   had been able to register as temporary residents with identification
   cards, known as white cards, which the junta began issuing to many
   Muslims, both Rohingya and non-Rohingya, in the 1990s. The white
   cards conferred limited rights but were not recognized as proof of
   citizenship. Still, Lewa says that they did provide some recognition of
   temporary stay for the Rohingya in Myanmar.

   In 2014 the government held a UN-backed national census, its first in
   thirty years. The Muslim minority group was initially permitted to
   identify as Rohingya, but after Buddhist nationalists threatened to
   boycott the census, the government decided Rohingya could only register
   if they identified as Bengali instead.

   More on:

   Myanmar

   Rohingya

   Refugees and Displaced Persons

   Aung San Suu Kyi

   Humanitarian Crises

   Similarly, under pressure from Buddhist nationalists protesting the
   Rohingya’s right to vote in a 2015 constitutional referendum, then
   President Thein Sein canceled the temporary identity cards in February
   2015, effectively revoking their newly gained right to vote. (White
   card holders were allowed to vote in Myanmar’s 2008 constitutional
   referendum and 2010 general elections.) In the 2015 elections, which
   were widely touted by international monitors as free and fair, no
   parliamentary candidate was of the Muslim faith.
   “Country-wide anti-Muslim sentiment makes it politically difficult for
   the government to take steps seen as supportive of Muslim rights,”
   writes the International Crisis Group.

   Muslim minorities continue to “consolidate under one Rohingya
   identity,” says Lewa, despite documentation by rights groups and
   researchers of systematic disenfranchisement, violence, and instances
   of anti-Muslim campaigns [PDF].

Why are the Rohingya fleeing Myanmar?

     Rakhine State is Myanmar’s least developed state, with a poverty
     rate of 78 percent.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   The Myanmar government has effectively institutionalized discrimination
   against the ethnic group through restrictions on marriage, family
   planning, employment, education, religious choice, and freedom of
   movement. For example, Rohingya couples in the northern towns of
   Maungdaw and Buthidaung are only allowed to have two children [PDF].
   Rohingya must also seek permission to marry, which may require them to
   bribe authorities and provide photographs of the bride without a
   headscarf and the groom with a clean-shaven face, practices that
   conflict with Muslim customs. To move to a new home or travel outside
   their townships, Rohingya must gain government approval.

   Moreover, Rakhine State is Myanmar’s least developed state, with a
   poverty rate of 78 percent, compared to the 37.5 percent national
   average, according to World Bank estimates. Widespread poverty, poor
   infrastructure, and a lack of employment opportunities in Rakhine have
   exacerbated the cleavage between Buddhists and Muslim Rohingya. This
   tension is deepened by religious differences that have at times erupted
   into conflict.
   slideshow

The Rohingya Crisis: Expulsion and Exodus

   (BUTTON) View slideshow
   Anjuman Para

What’s caused the recent exodus?

   Clashes in Rakhine broke out in August 2017, after a militant group
   known as the Arakan Rohingya Salvation Army (ARSA) claimed
   responsibility for attacks on police and army posts. The government
   declared ARSA a terrorist organization and the military mounted
   a brutal campaign that destroyed hundreds of Rohingya villages and
   forced nearly seven hundred thousand Rohingya to leave Myanmar. At
   least 6,700 Rohingya were killed in the first month of attacks, between
   August 25 and September 24, 2017, according to the international
   medical charity Doctors Without Borders. Myanmar’s security forces also
   allegedly opened fire on fleeing civilians and planted land mines near
   border crossings used by Rohingya to flee to Bangladesh.

   Since the start of 2018, Myanmar authorities have reportedly cleared
   abandoned Rohingya villages [PDF] and farmlands to build homes,
   security bases, and infrastructure. The government says this
   development is in preparation for the repatriation of refugees, but
   rights activists have expressed concern these moves could be intended
   to accommodate other populations in Rakhine State. Furthermore, some
   have raised doubts that the government’s tactics have been in response
   to ARSA attacks, with reports showing that the military began
   implementing its policies nearly a year before ARSA struck.

     Security campaigns in the past five years, notably in 2012 and 2016,
     also resulted in the flight of tens of thousands of Rohingya from
     their homes.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   UN Secretary-General Antonio Guterres has described the violence as
   ethnic cleansing and the humanitarian situation as catastrophic. Rights
   groups and other UN leaders suspect acts of genocide have taken place.
   At an emergency UN Security Council meeting, U.S. Ambassador to the
   United Nations Nikki Haley said Myanmar authorities have carried out a
   “brutal, sustained campaign to cleanse the country of an ethnic
   minority,” and she called on members to suspend weapons provisions to
   the military. Other Security Council members, including Russia and
   China, have resisted increasing pressure on Myanmar’s government
   because they say it is trying to restore stability.

   Sectarian violence is not new to Rakhine State. Security campaigns in
   the past five years, notably in 2012 and 2016, also resulted in the
   flight of tens of thousands of Rohingya from their homes.

Where are the Rohingya migrating?

     * Bangladesh: Most Rohingya have sought refuge in nearby Bangladesh,
       which has limited resources and land to host refugees. More than
       1.1 million people are refugees in the country, according to
       Bangladeshi authorities. The World Health Organization projects
       the birth of sixty thousand babies in Bangladesh’s crowded camps in
       2018. Meanwhile, the risk of disease outbreak in camps is high,
       with health organizations warning of possible outbreaks of measles,
       tetanus, diphtheria, and acute jaundice syndrome. Moreover, more
       than 60 percent of the available water supply in refugee camps is
       contaminated, increasing the risk of spread of communicable and
       water-borne diseases. Vulnerable refugees have turned to smugglers,
       paying for transport out of Bangladesh and Myanmar and risking
       exploitation, including sexual enslavement. In November 2017,
       Myanmar and Bangladesh signed a deal for the possible repatriation
       of hundreds of thousands of refugees, though details remained vague
       and the plan was postponed. Planned repatriations were delayed
       repeatedly throughout 2018.
     * Malaysia: As of October 2018, eighty thousand Rohingya were in
       Malaysia, according to the United Nations, though tens of thousands
       of others are in the country unregistered. Rohingya who arrive
       safely in Malaysia have no legal status and are unable to work,
       leaving their families cut off from access to education and health
       care.
     * Thailand: Thailand is a hub for regional human smuggling and serves
       as a common transit point for Rohingya. Migrants often arrive there
       by boat from Bangladesh or Myanmar before continuing on foot to
       Malaysia or by boat to Indonesia or Malaysia. The military-led Thai
       government has cracked down on smuggling rings after the discovery
       of mass graves in alleged camps where gangs held hostages. But some
       experts say that while punishing traffickers disrupts the networks,
       it does not dismantle them.
     * Indonesia: The Rohingya have also sought refuge in Indonesia,
       although the number of refugees from Myanmar there remains
       relatively small because they are treated as illegal immigrants.
       Indonesia has rescued migrant boats off its shores and dispatched
       humanitarian aid and supplies to Bangladesh’s camps. Indonesian
       President Joko Widodo pledged more help during a visit to refugee
       camps in Bangladesh in January 2018.

Has civilian leadership changed the Myanmar government’s policies?

   In 2016, Myanmar’s first democratically elected government in a
   generation came to power, but critics say it has been reluctant to
   advocate for Rohingya and other Muslims for fear of alienating Buddhist
   nationalists and threatening the power-sharing agreement the civilian
   government maintains with the military.

   Some observers saw the establishment in August 2016 of an advisory
   commission on ethnic strife led by former UN Secretary-General Kofi
   Annan as a positive development. However, subsequent outbreaks of
   violence and several long-simmering conflicts between other ethnically
   based insurgent groups and the government have curbed this optimism.

   Aung San Suu Kyi, Myanmar’s de facto leader, has denied that ethnic
   cleansing is taking place and dismissed international criticism of her
   handling of the crisis, accusing critics of fueling resentment between
   Buddhists and Muslims in the country. In September 2017, the Nobel
   Peace Prize laureate said her government had “already started
   defending all the people in Rakhine in the best way possible.” That
   December, the Myanmar government denied access to the UN special
   rapporteur on human rights in Myanmar, Yanghee Lee, and suspended
   cooperation for the remainder of her term. Nevertheless, in September
   2018 the UN’s fact-finding panel released a report recommending
   Myanmar’s army leaders be referred to the International Criminal Court
   (ICC) and urging the UN Security Council to impose arms embargoes and
   sanctions.

How is the region responding?

   Protesters have at times gathered in cities in Pakistan,
   India, Thailand, Indonesia, and Bangladesh to condemn the killing and
   persecution of Rohingya. Bangladesh’s foreign minister condemned the
   violence in Rakhine as “genocide” in September 2017 and Indonesia and
   Malaysia called on the Myanmar authorities to halt their campaign and
   bring an end to the violence. Bangladesh and Myanmar have held
   bilateral discussions aimed at repatriating the Rohingya and
   guaranteeing their rights in Myanmar, but these have been ad hoc and
   have yet to produce a breakthrough.

   In October 2018, authorities in Bangladesh and Myanmar agreed to
   repatriate several thousand Rohingya but offered few specifics on how
   those refugees would be selected. Human Rights Watch suggested that
   those slated for repatriation had not volunteered, but rather were
   chosen at random by Bangladeshi authorities. Moreover, Myanmar
   officials did not specify whether returning refugees would be granted
   full citizenship rights, including freedom of movement.

   Alongside criticism of the plan from the United States and human rights
   groups, the United Nations urged a cancelation and warned that
   conditions in Myanmar were still unsafe for Rohingya. Ultimately, the
   Rohingya in Bangladesh refused to return until their citizenship rights
   were guaranteed. Experts say the Bangladeshi government must decide
   whether to continue to struggle to provide shelter for so many refugees
   or expel them and draw the ire of Western governments and aid
   organizations.

   Other governments in Southeast Asia generally lack established legal
   frameworks to protect refugees’ rights, and the ten members of the
   Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) have not coordinated a
   response to the deepening crisis. Indonesia, Malaysia, Myanmar, and
   Thailand—all ASEAN members—have yet to ratify the UN refugee convention
   or its protocol. ASEAN itself has been mostly silent on the plight of
   the Rohingya and on the growing numbers of asylum seekers in member
   countries, largely because of its members’ commitment to the principle
   of noninterference in each other’s internal affairs. “They aren’t going
   to take collective action on Myanmar, with Myanmar as one of its
   members,” says CFR’s Joshua Kurlantzick.

How has the rest of the world responded?

   In December 2016, U.S. President Barack Obama lifted sanctions against
   Myanmar, saying it had made strides in improving human rights. The move
   came amid a crackdown on Rohingya and was criticized by some as
   premature. A year later, new U.S. sanctions were imposed against a
   Myanmar general for his alleged role in the military’s attacks in
   Rakhine, and the U.S. government has continued to widen its sanctions
   regime on Myanmar military commanders in 2018, as evidence of the
   military’s atrocities mounts.

   Meanwhile, countries including the United States, Canada, Norway,
   and South Korea, as well as international donors, have upped their
   humanitarian assistance as the flow of Rohingya to Bangladesh has
   grown, and in early 2018 a team of UK medics led an emergency
   response to help stem the spread of disease in camps. The United
   Nations has requested $951 million in immediate relief funds [PDF] for
   2018. At the November 2018 ASEAN summit, U.S. Vice President Mike Pence
   ramped up pressure on Suu Kyi, saying that Myanmar’s “violence and
   persecution” toward the Rohingya were inexcusable.

   Advocacy groups including Human Rights Watch, Amnesty International,
   the Arakan Project, and Fortify Rights continue to appeal for
   international pressure on Myanmar’s government. In November 2018,
   Amnesty International stripped Suu Kyi of the Ambassador of Conscience
   Award it had conferred on her during her fifteen-year house arrest.
   Earlier in the year, the ICC’s chief prosecutor launched an
   investigation into alleged war crimes that forced the exodus of
   Rohingya.

   Still, resentment of the minority group has run deep for generations.
   Without overhauling “a culture of pervasive prejudice” and ensuring
   that Rohingya are treated as human beings, the situation in Rakhine
   State is unlikely to improve, says journalist and author Francis Wade.

Resources

   This 2018 Amnesty International report documents infrastructure
   development [PDF] on land abandoned by the Rohingya.

   This New York Times interactive demonstrates the exodus of Rohingya
   from Myanmar to Bangladesh.

   Francis Wade discusses the division of power in Myanmar between the
   civilian government and military in a CFR interview.

   Reuters illustrates the ballooning of camps along the
   Bangladesh-Myanmar border.

   A CFR Backgrounder charts Myanmar’s political evolution.

Explore More on Myanmar

   Southeast Asia

   While Bangladesh and Myanmar Plan Rohingya Repatriation, Rohingya in
   Myanmar Remain at Grave Risk

   Blog Post by Joshua Kurlantzick September 26, 2019 Asia Unbound

   Southeast Asia

   What Happens if Rohingya Stay in Bangladesh Forever?

   Blog Post by Joshua Kurlantzick September 4, 2019 Asia Unbound

   Southeast Asia

   The United Nations’ Failures in Myanmar: Lessons Learned?

   Blog Post by Joshua Kurlantzick July 10, 2019 Asia Unbound

Top Stories on CFR

   Sanctions

   What Are Economic Sanctions?
   For many policymakers, economic sanctions have become the tool of
   choice to respond to major geopolitical challenges such as terrorism
   and conflict.

   Backgrounder by Jonathan Masters August 12, 2019

   China

   Is China Manipulating Its Currency?
   The Trump administration has declared China a currency manipulator, but
   what that means for the ongoing trade war is far from clear.

   In Brief by Brad W. Setser August 8, 2019

   Women and Economic Growth

   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries
   The education gender gap costs the world between $15 trillion and $30
   trillion in human capital. U.S. aid programs need to equip girls and
   women to participate in the modern digital economy.

   Policy Innovation Memorandum by Meighan Stone and Rachel B. Vogelstein
   August 7, 2019 Women and Foreign Policy Program

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

   Public Health
   Daniel Becerril/Reuters

   Public Health Threats and Pandemics

   The E-cigarette Backlash
   An outbreak of a lung illness linked to vaping is raising concern
   worldwide and putting pressure on countries to rein in the booming
   e-cigarette industry.

   In Brief by Claire Felter October 2, 2019


   Vaping on the Rise in U.S., Especially Among Young People

   via Pew Research Center September 26, 2019


   The Mysterious Vaping Illness That’s ‘Becoming an Epidemic’

   via New York Times September 11, 2019
   Central America
   John Moore/Getty Images

   El Salvador

   The Troubled Northern Triangle
   The United States is struggling to respond to the latest wave of
   migrants fleeing poverty, violence, and corruption in El Salvador,
   Guatemala, and Honduras.

   Backgrounder by Amelia Cheatham October 1, 2019


   Congress Can Hold Trump Accountable on Honduras

   by Paul J. Angelo via The Hill September 18, 2019


   American Cities Reduced Violence—Will the Same Strategies Work in the
   Northern Triangle?

   by Steven Dudley via Foreign Affairs August 22, 2019
   Hong Kong

   Hong Kong

   An Economic Solution for Hong Kong
   After months of large-scale protests in Hong Kong, the city’s future as
   a bridge between mainland China and the outside world is in serious
   jeopardy. Fortunately, all sides share an interest in pursuing more
   inclusive growth within the “one country, two systems” framework that
   has been critical to Hong Kong’s success.

   by A. Michael Spence September 30, 2019

   China

   Democracy in Hong Kong
   As China’s power continues to grow, some fear that the considerable
   autonomy Hong Kong has enjoyed over the last three decades could slip
   away.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert September 30, 2019


   How China Sees the Hong Kong Crisis

   by Andrew J. Nathan via Foreign Affairs September 30, 2019
   China

   China

   Communist China’s Painful Human Rights Story
   The Chinese Communist Party has used arbitrary detention to maintain
   power since the People’s Republic of China was founded seventy years
   ago.

   by Jerome A. Cohen September 26, 2019


   The Problem With Xi’s China Model

   by Elizabeth C. Economy via Foreign Affairs March 6, 2019

   China

   The Chinese Communist Party
   The Chinese Communist Party faces a host of pressing domestic and
   international policy challenges as it transitions to a new generation
   of leaders.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert and Beina Xu September 27, 2019
   United States

   Politics and Government

   The Impeachment Inquiry: What to Know

   Blog Post by James M. Lindsay September 25, 2019 The Water's Edge


   Read the Released Whistleblower Complaint

   via U.S. House Intelligence Committee September 26, 2019


   The Other Ukraine Scandal: Trump’s Threats to Our Ambassador Who
   Wouldn’t Bend

   by Philip H. Gordon and Daniel Fried via Washington Post September 29,
   2019
   United Nations

   Donald Trump

   Stressing ‘Nation’ at UN General Assembly
   Though Trump’s tone was solemn and even-keeled, the overall thrust of
   his UN General Assembly speech was of transactional nationalism,
   emphasizing the importance of pursuing national interests and combating
   globalism.

   Blog Post by Stewart M. Patrick September 24, 2019 The Internationalist


   ‘America First’ Means a Retreat From Foreign Conflicts

   by Charles A. Kupchan via Foreign Affairs September 26, 2019


   Read President Trump’s Remarks at the UN General Assembly

   via White House September 25, 2019

CFR on the Record

   View All

   United Nations

   A Conversation With Minister Adel al-Jubeir of Saudi Arabia
   For further reading, please see the CFR In Brief “Trump’s Iran-Saudi
   Arabia Dilemma” by Philip H. Gordon, the CFR blog post “Scale and
   Nature of Attacks on Saudi Oil Makes This One Different” by Amy M.
   Jaffe, and the CFR quiz “See How Much You Know About Saudi Arabia.”

   Event with Adel al-Jubeir September 24, 2019

   Pakistan

   A Conversation With Prime Minister Imran Khan of Pakistan
   Prime Minister Imran Khan discusses the current state of U.S.-Pakistan
   relations, recent developments in the disputed region of Kashmir, and
   Pakistan’s relationship with India, Afghanistan, and other neighboring
   countries.

   Event with Imran Khan September 23, 2019

   United States

   CEO Speaker Series With Randall Stephenson
   Randall Stephenson discusses his business strategy and lessons learned
   from leading AT&T. The CEO Speaker Series is a unique forum for leading
   global CEOs to share their insights on issues at the center of commerce
   and foreign policy, and to discuss the changing role of business
   globally. HAASS: Well, good afternoon. Welcome to the Council on
   Foreign Relations. I’m Richard Haass, president of the Council, and
   today we have one of our meetings in the series on CEO speakers. It is
   on the record. Anything you say can and will be used against you.
   STEPHENSON: I didn’t know that. I want to dismiss myself. (Laughter.)
   HAASS: Do you want to leave now? We are pleased to welcome Randall
   Stephenson of AT&T to the Council for a conversation. He has been
   chairman and CEO for more than a decade now, twelve years give or take.
   STEPHENSON: Sounds like fifteen minutes underwater. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Well, hopefully this won’t. He’s, obviously, been involved directly and
   personally in any number of consequential decisions, most recently with
   the acquisition of Time Warner. I should also say that AT&T’s been
   generous, committing over a billion dollars over his years to a variety
   of education, retraining, and diversity initiatives, some within the
   company, some beyond the company. Full disclosure—important to give
   that—they’re a corporate member here at the Council on Foreign
   Relations, as was Time Warner in its—when it was an independent
   company. What we are going to do is Mr. Stephenson and I are going to
   have a conversation for a few minutes. Then we’ll open it up to you,
   our members, to ask the tough questions that I didn’t have the wit to
   ask. Let me just—thirty-second plug for the Council on Foreign
   Relations. Just this morning we issued our most recent task force
   report, Innovation and National Security: Keeping Our Edge. And I
   commend it to anyone in this room and beyond because it’s a real
   emphasis on what we need to do here at home, and that one can’t ask
   everything of our diplomats or our military. There are certain things
   we have to do as a society in order to put ourselves in a position
   where we can do what we need to to look after all aspects of our
   national security. So again, I really recommend it to you. Thanks for
   coming today. STEPHENSON: Good to be here. Thanks for having me. Happy
   to. HAASS: So let’s begin with China. I’ve been in this business a
   while, and I can’t think of another major relationship with the United
   States that has changed, and to give a sense of directionality,
   deteriorated as quickly and as dramatically as the U.S.-China
   relationship has in the last couple of years. And everyone decries the
   lack of bipartisanship in Washington; this is actually fairly
   bipartisan. If you listened to the Democratic debate the other night,
   the anti-China rhetoric was pretty—was pretty robust. What has been
   your experience with China? I mean, for example, a couple of questions
   come to mind. One, do you—are you aware that they’ve taken your
   technology? Have you—have you had a problem with that with China? I
   know you’re doing business with Huawei in places like Mexico. What
   has—what has been your experience with them? Have they been essentially
   a good partner or something less? STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) One of the
   companies over in China that’s a large-scale creator of—builder of
   telecommunication equipment, one of the first products they ever put
   out, and did quite well with, was a very close replica of a PBX back in
   the old days, in the 1960s, that was made by AT&T. (Laughs.) HAASS:
   What a coincidence. STEPHENSON: It was, probably coincidental.
   (Laughter.) So in terms of firsthand experience, you know, we’ve had
   our share of, you know, challenges and concerns in that regard. In
   terms of, you know, implications to AT&T specifically, we’ve had few
   issues because by and large we’re not allowed to do business there. We
   are prohibited from doing business. Now, we do have some points of
   presence and so forth. We’re allowed to do some things, carry traffic
   for customers. But we’ve had very little, little experience doing
   business within China. Now that has changed, obviously, with the
   acquisition of Time Warner. You know, Aquaman did $600 million before
   it got to the shores of the United States, and so that’s changing a
   little bit with this acquisition. But you know, my main thoughts as it
   relates to China is just what’s happening just domestically
   economically here in the United States as a result of what’s recently
   transpired, because I was one of the zealots, biggest supporters in
   terms of some of the economic policies of this administration. But all
   of these positives that have been generated over the last couple of
   years—predominantly business investment, which had been growing 6, 7
   percent year over year just consecutively like clockwork since the tax
   reform went in on corporations—we’re now in a manufacturing recession.
   And it’s—if you had to point your finger at, you know, something, it
   would be one of two things. It would be the Chinese situation and the
   Mexico situation. HAASS: Because it’s probably not that interest rates
   are not low enough. STEPHENSON: I don’t think anybody’s having trouble
   accessing capital right now, yeah. HAASS: (Laughs.) STEPHENSON:
   Accessing capital is not an issue. HAASS: If we end up in a world where
   we have, if not divorce, separation from China, and fairly separate
   supply lines and markets, and a lack of technology sharing, how much
   more difficult does that make business for you, or not? I mean, like if
   we end up in a slightly bifurcated world, what does it mean for a large
   company like yours? STEPHENSON: Yeah, I— HAASS: Does it make a
   difference? STEPHENSON: Yeah, it makes a heck of a difference. I think
   it makes a heck of a difference just on the United States, and a
   company like ours is dependent upon the health and vibrancy of the
   United States economy. And if you end up in a place where it’s—I don’t
   believe it’s China and the rest of the world; I think it’s China and
   others and the rest of the world, one could argue maybe some—to some
   extent it’s East versus West. And when you think about where is the
   growth in the global economy, you know, Asia is where the growth is.
   HAASS: Where the people are. STEPHENSON: And so if you’re a U.S.
   economy—and we just had this conversation; 5 percent of the population,
   20, 25 percent of the world’s economy—you’re kind of dependent upon
   trade if you want to keep growing your 25 percent share. And so a world
   where you are cut off from a significant amount of global growth, from
   our standpoint that’s a problem. And so where do you have to look, you
   know, Africa? Well, China’s doing a lot in Africa. I don’t know how
   this bifurcation happens. Perhaps Latin America we could do well with.
   But yeah, it’s disconcerting for a company that’s dependent upon U.S.
   growth. HAASS: One last thing that’s related to China. If there’s a
   trade deal with China, I think it’s possible to include things like
   market access and the Chinese will make certain commitments, again, on
   technology and the rest. The one area I can’t see a trade deal really
   accomplishing is a—is anything that would have a major reduction in
   Chinese subsidies from the state to their state-owned enterprises. And
   one of the areas that would, obviously, have consequences for would be
   things like 5G. Would you be happy with a trade deal that didn’t tackle
   the state subsidy issue, or do you just assume it won’t? STEPHENSON:
   I’m skeptical that a trade deal could be reached that would
   address—you’ve termed state subsidy. Let me just term—use the
   terminology just subsidy in general, because I don’t know how you
   enforce it. So, for example, the way some of the subsidies seem to work
   in China—everybody’s familiar with our industry and Huawei and what
   they do in China. And to put this into perspective, if Huawei could
   achieve in China a 90 percent share of Chinese communications, market
   share, they by definition have 30 to 40 percent global share. That’s a
   big deal. Now, if they could get another 10, 20 percent outside of
   China and start to get 40, 50 percent global share, this is a problem.
   This is a problem for the West. This is a problem for Western supply
   chain. How could they get that other 10 to 20 percent share around the
   globe? You talk about subsidies. I mean, it’s real easy to conceive of
   a situation where a Chinese communications company puts out a bid,
   Huawei bids at a premium to what everybody else bids, and Huawei wins
   it. They have 90 percent share in China. Now they go bid in Europe,
   what do you think happens? The flip. They bid at 20, 30 percent
   discounts to everybody else, and so as a result they start taking
   significant share outside of China. You go to Latin America, these
   shares are really high. Go to Africa; Huawei shares are really high.
   Europe, I mean, for heaven’s sake, there are many countries in Europe
   where they have 40 and 50 percent share. And so this company is gaining
   significant share in mobile technology around the world. And this is—if
   you don’t mind me just kind of bridging real briefly, they’ve gained
   this share in a world of 4G, fourth-generation technology. You go,
   well, OK, fine, but what about 5G? They’ve been very smart. They do not
   allow interoperability of their 4G equipment to their 5G equipment. So
   if you get 40 to 50 percent global share of 4G technology, guess what
   you’ve ensured yourself for 5G? Forty to 50 percent 5G market share.
   This is something that we in the West need to be conscious of and aware
   of. And while I don’t always endorse the approaches of our
   administration, I think the mindset, the thought process, the concern
   is probably on target. HAASS: Let me return to that in a few minutes,
   but let me—I want to touch on a couple of other subjects before we open
   it up. I want to talk about corporate America for a second. I assume
   many people in the room saw the Business Roundtable statement. I think
   you were one of the signatories. Essentially, the message was
   shareholder return can’t be our only preoccupation; we’ve got to have a
   wider sense of constituencies and stakeholders. But how do you
   navigate—it’s one thing to say that, but then you’ve got your quarterly
   reports. You’ve got something called Mr. Market that’s looking at you
   on a regular basis. How do you navigate a world where on one hand
   people are saying you’ve got to be sensitive to multiple
   constituencies, but—it’s a big “but”—we still care about your bottom
   line as shareholders? Is this an impossible dual mandate? STEPHENSON:
   No, I don’t—I don’t think it is at all. I mean, a lot of the media—the
   Wall Street Journal hyperventilated over it, and—that how can this be
   the case. I would represent that this is not anything new. If you
   really want to have a sustainable business model, sustainable what I’ll
   call free markets, you better be mindful and you better be cautious
   about things like supply chains, diversity, communities, and so forth.
   I just believe that if you’re not you have fracturing in a society, if
   corporations just run oblivious to that. You have to be mindful about
   your employees. I mean, how can you possibly expect to have a
   sustainable, profitable business over time if you’re ignoring all of
   these other variables? And so to me it’s the most logical thing in the
   world to think that the purpose of a corporation is to serve all those
   constituencies if you want to have a true sustainable model. HAASS:
   Keep moving around. AI, robotics, autonomous vehicles, this is the
   world we’re living in. You’ve established yourself—you being AT&T—as
   one of the leaders in the corporate world with reskilling, with
   training, education. If I’ve got it right, you basically go to your
   workforce in some cases and say you’re in a job, you’re doing great;
   the problem is this job is not going to exist in a year. What have—what
   have you learned from this? What’s working and what’s not working in
   terms of transitioning your workforce from today to tomorrow? What’s
   been your—what’s been your experience? STEPHENSON: What works is, first
   of all, making sure your employees understand how the world is
   changing. I mean, there has to be an awareness among your employees in
   terms of what is happening. Where are the jobs going? What jobs are
   going to be relevant three, five years from now, and what jobs are
   disappearing? And the one thing that—I wish I could take credit for
   this—our HR folks did was that starting point is out in our HR systems,
   when you go look at a particular job opening, it shows you what
   direction are those jobs going. Are they going up or are they going
   down? And if it’s a job where the number—the demands for the job are
   actually increasing, that’s heightening. That’s an awareness. That’s a
   really important thing. And so that’s a really important variable. And
   it seems basic, but a lot of people miss this. And so the employee
   understands this is where this thing is going. And you could think of
   the kind of areas; if I’m a telephone repairman, you know, and I go and
   click on for an opening, they’re going to see that that thing is doing
   this. You probably ought to be aware that’s not a kind of job that you
   want to be moving into. HAASS: Where does the CEO fit on that?
   (Laughter.) Sorry, cheap shot. (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, I don’t
   know that most people want it, to be honest with you. (Laughter.) But
   the other thing is, do you make it really, really easy for the
   employees to know what is required for the jobs they want to seek? And
   that sounds easy too, but you know, here are the certifications that
   are required, and if you want these certifications here’s where you go
   to get those certifications. Click this, this, this, take these
   classes, do this training, and now you are qualified for this job. And
   you can begin to truly move people—it doesn’t happen overnight, but you
   can truly begin to move people into the new world and into the new
   jobs, and it takes a period of time. I would say—we started this seven
   years ago and we said this is probably one of the most difficult
   logistical things we’ve ever tackled. And we build big networks and,
   you know, we do big logistical challenges, and this was one of the more
   difficult ones we took on. And I reflect back over seven years, and I
   have to say this is one of the areas that I take most satisfaction in
   over the last seven years, is how this has moved and transformed a
   workforce. HAASS: Let’s talk about healthcare for a second. You know,
   this country spends roughly—close to a fifth of its GDP in the area of
   healthcare. I don’t know the details of your program. STEPHENSON:
   Five-and-a-half billion dollars. HAASS: OK. So, again talking about the
   recent Democratic debates, a large number of the Democratic candidates
   are talking about some version of a large public option, in some cases
   taking away a private option. As someone who is spending this, you have
   hundreds of thousands of employees, what is your sense of where you
   want the government to go with healthcare? STEPHENSON: You know, look,
   if I were just saying purely financially motivated, government just
   takes over healthcare? Wow. I mean, five-and-a-half billion dollars a
   year we spend on it, right? That seems like an unlikely scenario, and I
   don’t think that it’s a scenario that is in the best interests of our
   employees. I do think we have to have a really vibrant, good, healthy
   safety net and access for people who are in areas of the economy where
   they can’t get healthcare. I’m all in and I’m all-in supportive of
   that. But the idea that the government is going to take over providing
   health care for—we insure I think somewhere around a million-and-a-half
   lives between retirees and actives. And taking that and dumping into a
   government system—that’s just one company—feels like a really, really
   big deal. And you know I don’t know. Some would say it’s too
   paternalistic, but I worry about the healthcare for our employees. We
   do a lot not just to control costs; we do a lot to ensure that our
   employees live healthy lifestyles—productivity, just their own
   longevity, et cetera. And once you start kind of abdicating that
   responsibility from companies, where does that lead you in terms of the
   general health of your employee body? I think it’s important that we as
   CEOs and companies have a vested interest in the health of our people.
   I think it’s a good thing. I think it’s a productive thing for society.
   HAASS: We actually practice that here, so we feel good about it. One of
   the—another area of emerging bipartisanship is hostility or
   questioning—I’ll make—I’ll dial it down a bit—towards big technology
   companies. Motivations may be different between the left and the right,
   but we see—whether it’s antitrust-based or regulation-based, we see the
   environment in which technology companies are operating in, clearly the
   temperature’s changing on that. STEPHENSON: Oh, boy. HAASS: What’s your
   reading of that, whether this would be welcome, or in some areas it
   might, in some areas it wouldn’t? To what extent are you concerned or
   potentially relieved that the government may be moving in this
   direction? STEPHENSON: I’m never one to wave a flag say go regulate or
   take on antitrust efforts on other companies. It’s just kind of against
   my nature. But it’s—it is interesting, and probably even ironic, that
   for twenty years the government seemed to have—didn’t seem to have; the
   government, the United States government, even state governments had a
   deliberate policy of light-touch oversight and regulation of the
   internet companies, and it was for good reason. They wanted to see
   these technologies flourish. It was good for America, get technological
   leadership. And so there has been a very, very light touch and
   hands-off approach to a lot of these companies, and mission
   accomplished. These companies have thrived, and we now have a lot of
   these companies who have a very significant share in the—in the domains
   where they operate. And you know, you think about AT&T, you know, back
   in the day we were regulated heavily as a monopoly until our market
   share fell below about 50 percent. We now have these companies that are
   now operating in domains where they’re having 60, 70 percent share of
   the particular areas where they operate. It probably should not be a
   surprise that people—attention is being heightened in terms of
   antitrust concerns. And are they legitimate, are they, you know,
   appropriate? I’ll let the authorities worry about that. But nobody
   should be surprised when you start getting 50, 60 percent market shares
   in these areas that the government starts looking closely at the
   behaviors. HAASS: And your sector is also an example where antitrust
   was applied, and after some degree of disruption quite a lot of
   companies did just fine. STEPHENSON: A lot of—AT&T, I would suggest.
   HAASS: Just to mention one, yes. (Laughs.) STEPHENSON: Company has done
   quite well in a—in a deregulated environment, and it is
   hypercompetitive. It’s a fun industry, but yeah, it took a little
   government intervention to get us to that place as well. HAASS: OK. Net
   Neutrality, let’s raise that—put that on the—I expect you got some
   opinions on— STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) HAASS: —on that, about what ought to
   be government policy in that area and how we ought to price it.
   STEPHENSON: I always start a conversation with Net Neutrality out with
   what does it mean, because if I were to just ask various tables to give
   me a definition of Net Neutrality, I— HAASS: You can’t ask this table,
   by the way. (Laughter.) I don’t care what they think. (Laughs.)
   STEPHENSON: I would—I would get multiple definitions of what it
   actually means. And if what we’re talking about is that there should be
   unfettered access to the content on the internet, and that, you know,
   companies like ours should not be able to block anybody from getting to
   certain content, or throttle you in terms of your use of content—we
   can’t treat AT&T’s HBO Max streaming better than Netflix’s
   streaming—and somebody ought to be able to develop a device that would
   connect to the internet and it ought to work as well as anybody else’s
   device, if you say that’s Net Neutrality, then by all means I think
   that’s important. I think it’s important to the growth, the
   development—the continued development of the internet. I think, in
   fact, that it is so important people in Congress ought to step up and
   do something about it, and actually ought to legislate what I just
   said. Instead, what we do is we have—we write the worst legislation in
   the world anymore. We write just kind of frameworks as legislation. We
   hand it off to a bunch of bureaucrats to regulate it. And depending on
   who is president one interprets it this way over here, and so companies
   orient themselves, they set up their business models over here. And
   then there’s an election, new president comes in, and we’re swinging
   all the way back over here, and you’re oriented over here, and your
   business practices are changing, and you don’t know how to invest in
   ten-, fifteen-year-horizon networks and so forth based on this kind of
   phenomenon. And so this is one of these areas that people need to step
   up and do their job and pass some legislation on this. This is a—this
   is chaotic for businesses who are trying to keep the U.S. in the
   leadership position on the internet. HAASS: So your view is almost
   whatever you decide just decide it and stick with it? STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   and I think there are some really broad frameworks that people can
   agree on. And it’s not too dissimilar from what I just articulated. I
   mean, there will be some—look, we’re all rent-seekers. You start this
   process and everybody’s going to be in there trying to get this thing
   and that thing. We just got to keep focused. And I will give credit on
   some of the recent legislation passed by Congress on tax reform on the
   corporate side—not the individual, but the corporate side. There were
   some big, broad principles that said get those competitive U.S. tax
   rate. There are some big, broad principles on Net Neutrality we should
   be able to legislate and get done. HAASS: I want to return just for one
   minute to 5G. And you know, given the way you’ve now—you know, where
   your company is with the acquisitions, you’ve got content, you’ve got
   distribution. The question is, given what we’ve said about China, given
   some of the European companies— STEPHENSON: Right. HAASS: —given
   Verizon, whether you think AT&T can be competitive in the 5G space.
   STEPHENSON: Oh yeah, I think we’ll be very—I think we’ll be leaders in
   the 5G space. We already are. When you think about, you know, what kind
   of determines how 5G rolls out, the first step is, how do you set
   standards so that you can get everybody manufacturing gear and
   equipment that guys like us go out and deploy? The standards are
   everything. And so AT&T was the leader in the standards-setting
   process. Now, something you should be aware of, for the first time in
   my career the Chinese got very aggressive in this, and they were all
   over the standards-setting process. But we got everything in the
   standards we wanted, that we thought the U.S. needed to have a shot at
   maintaining a leadership position. So standards are set right. We,
   AT&T, in anticipation of this, have been buying up, spending billions
   of dollars on acquiring wireless licenses, because when you think about
   5G, you got to have a lot of airwaves to pump all of these volumes
   through. We’ve spent over $40 billion over the last ten years on
   acquiring the licenses so that you can have the bandwidth to pump all
   this through. I will tell you AT&T is as in good a shape as anybody in
   the world. I think we’re in the best position in the United States and
   as good as anybody in the world. So mission accomplished there. We have
   a balance sheet that we’re committing to this and we’re investing in
   it. So I feel really good about that. We have great technology. We’ve
   done a good job on getting the technology ready. Here’s where we have a
   problem. If you’re thinking about your competition, you said Europe. I
   don’t think anybody in Europe has even issued an RFP for 5G yet, truly.
   So I set Europe aside. They have gone from first to worst in the—in the
   world of mobility for—you can debate why. But Europe is not in play
   right now. It’s China. If we want a leadership position, it’s vis-à-vis
   China. You want to deploy 5G, what are the big barriers? I’ve talked
   about some of the barriers, which we’ve now broken through. We’re past
   those, spectrum and standards and the equipment and so forth. Now you
   got to go out and put this stuff up. You got to go out and deploy
   thousands upon thousands of cell sites. Now, I don’t think in
   China—they’re spending three years trying to get San Francisco to
   approve a cell site. I suspect in China, when they want a cell site
   they go put up a cell site where they want it, and they’re putting up
   millions upon millions of cell sites while we’re over here kind of
   debating and thrashing through local/municipal regulations, state
   regulations, federal regulations trying just to get the infrastructure
   permits to put this stuff in place. And so if there’s a place where
   we’re going to fall behind, China is going to be able to go much faster
   in that regard than the U.S. will. And I’m not saying their approach is
   better. I get the environmental concerns, aesthetics, appearance. But
   we have people wearing aluminum-foil suits because they’re afraid of
   5G, right, and fighting deployment of 5G. I don’t think they’re dealing
   with that in China. HAASS: What about the regulatory side or the—so
   much of the spectrum is reserved for the military. Do you basically
   feel that the government has to change policies so you can do what you
   want to do with 5G? STEPHENSON: No, if there’s one area I have to tip
   my hat to the government, both the Obama administration and this
   administration, it is getting spectrum out into the marketplace. And
   there have been numerous auctions conducted. I told you we spent forty
   billion (dollars). The lion’s share of that have been in government
   auctions, acquiring airwaves. There have been already a handful of
   auctions on these really-high-frequency airwaves, which will make this
   stuff really hum. We’ve participated in a couple of those. There’s
   another one coming up this year. So I think our government is doing a
   really good job of getting the airwaves out into the hands of the
   market and the people who will deploy these networks. And that—we’re
   not lagging behind the Chinese in that regard. HAASS: You know, this is
   the Council on Foreign Relations. For a second I’m going to make it the
   Council on Financial Relations. One of my many joys in recent days was
   reading a twenty-plus page letter from Mr. Singer and company, from
   Elliott, sent you all advising you. So the criticisms or reactions
   about the idea that you’ve put together through acquisition rather than
   organic growth where you are, content and distribution, that
   essentially this is an old-fashioned conglomerate and that’s not a good
   idea anymore, how do you—how do you take that, other than not well?
   STEPHENSON: Look, I—the letter was—you know, I didn’t take the letter
   poorly. It was interesting to me the letter laid out some
   recommendations, and the recommendations seemed to be supportive of the
   strategy, the importance of Time Warner, the acquisition, and the
   importance of 5G which we have been talking about here, and the—and the
   power of the assets. You know, they actually talk about it in those
   terms. So, look, I read the letter, and candidly there were some areas
   that I just read and I thought, you know what, they make some good
   points. And we’ll engage with them on those points. It was a mixed bag,
   though. There were some that I read and I go, I’m not sure that’s so
   clear to me. And so those are areas we’ll also want to get some more
   detail. I mean, say what you will about Paul Singer’s organization,
   they’re smart people. They’ve got some really smart people. And so if
   they have some good ideas, I’m dying to sit down and we’ll grind
   through them and see what makes sense for all of our shareholders—not
   just one, but all of our shareholders. HAASS: One last question, then
   I’m going to open it up. When you went through the hoops of the merger,
   there were all sorts of questions about whether you would advantage
   your own content in your own distribution systems and disadvantage
   those of others. Where does that stand now? Because you now have all
   this content coming out of HBO and other places, and you’ve got your
   pipes so to speak. To what extent do others who want to get into your
   distribution system, other streaming services, how do they compete? How
   is—how is all this going to play out? STEPHENSON: It’s playing out
   exactly as we said it would play out in the courts. And I—it’s—there is
   not a whit difference between what we established as our position in
   the courts, and that is as a media company—I see Wolf and the team down
   here, CNN—I can’t even begin to fathom the motivation that would say we
   want to limit CNN’s distribution just to AT&T’s platforms. That is a
   mindless proposition. You develop and you spend a lot of money on
   developing great premium content, and how do you make money on it? Wide
   and broad distribution. You want to distribute it everywhere. And it’s
   the same with HBO. We want HBO distributed as broadly and as widely as
   we possibly can. That’s the way you create value out of franchises like
   HBO. And you know, we recently had a drop from Charlie Ergen on DISH
   Networks. He dropped HBO. You know, we didn’t stand up at home and
   start doing high-fives that DISH is not carrying HBO. You know, that’s
   a lot of distribution to lose. That’s how you make money. I see Sam
   Feist back there. Do you want more or less distribution for CNN, Sam?
   Q: I’ll take more. STEPHENSON: You’ll take more. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Good answer. STEPHENSON: And so I always felt like the government’s
   lawsuit felt a bit nonsensical. And I think what we’re seeing play out
   in the marketplace since the deal closed is affirming that, and I’m
   having a hard time conceiving of a—of a time where we have said, hold
   that content back from Comcast or hold it back from Charter. No, we’re
   saying how do we get it deployed and distributed on Comcast and
   Charter. HAASS: OK. I’ve already asked more than I know, so let me open
   it up to our members. Again, it’s on the record. Wait for a microphone.
   We’ll recognize you. Let us know who you are and keep it succinct. No
   speeches, just a question. Only Mr. Stephenson gets to give speeches
   today. STEPHENSON: I’ll try to be succinct. HAASS: Ray? Q: Ray Tanter
   of the American Committee on Human Rights and the Iran Policy
   Committee. STEPHENSON: Hi, Ray. Q: Sir, do you think that Huawei is
   playing chess while we are playing checkers? STEPHENSON: Who? HAASS:
   Huawei. Q: (Off mic)—the other day. STEPHENSON: Oh, Huawei? Q: Huawei.
   HAASS: They actually played go, not chess. But anyhow. (Laughter.) Just
   a technical fix here. STEPHENSON: Well, I think they’re really smart,
   and I’ve—as you heard me articulate, I think they’ve made some very
   smart strategic plays. And this issue of disallowing interoperability
   between 4G and 5(G)—I don’t want to get technical, but that’s a big
   deal. And you know, if you’ve got the 4G layer and you can’t
   interoperate to 5G, then you are beholden to Huawei for 5G. So— HAASS:
   Isn’t that kind of what Apple does when they basically tell you that
   your charger that worked with one generation doesn’t work with the next
   generation? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, but changing out a
   thousand-dollar smartphone is different than—if you—if you don’t want
   to use Huawei for 5G, then you have to go rip and replace your
   fourth-generation network and put in another player. So, look, this is
   a really big deal. We, AT&T, have led the effort on something—I’ll try
   to make this as simple as possible, but virtualization of networks,
   putting as much of the electronics out on the edge as possible, but
   more importantly I refer to open source—open-source software. So we’ve
   developed—worked with the industry to develop a software layer that is
   the operating system for 5G. This is the software layer. It makes all
   the stuff talk to each other, if you will. We developed a software
   platform here and we contributed it into the open-source community.
   It’s out there. And guess what this thing is? It facilitates
   interoperability. And a significant amount of the players around the
   world have said that is the software layer we want in our 5G
   deployment. It’s a really big deal. It will take a while to get this
   scaled to both—to all levels of the network, but as you get open source
   out there it enhances security—because you got everybody out there
   auditing this software and identifying bugs and so forth and you fix
   it—but it creates the opportunity for interoperability, and what it
   does is says nobody sells a box with software just embedded in it. No,
   you have the software up here in a layer and any box can run that
   software. Why is that important? Because suddenly you have had a
   technological solution for this locking in people to a certain
   technology, if you know what I’m saying. So if you’re wanting to buy
   Huawei equipment, it’s a box with software in it. We don’t need that.
   We’ve got our software; we just need boxes. We need more what I’ll
   commodity-type boxes. This is a technological revolution that I think
   can be our fix in the long run for how we ensure that the Western
   supply chains are not dismantled by virtue of a Huawei strategy here.
   So it’s—we’re going to have to be smart. I take my hat off to the
   administration on some of the things they’re doing, the entity list and
   so forth. But I think these kind of solutions are technological
   solutions that ensure we have a level playing field for everybody who
   wants to use something other than Huawei. HAASS: Shane Green.
   STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick. Q: Hi. I’m with a personal data platform called—
   STAFF: (Off mic.) Q: Shane Green. Sorry, I wasn’t sure if that was
   redundant. (Laughs.) Another area that China has a big advantage given
   their approach to technology is around data and privacy. Some people
   are calling it surveillance state and they’re actively exporting it. I
   think Freedom House has listed about thirty-five countries that are
   actively deploying their approach to surveilling their own
   people—creating a citizenship score, there’s all these sorts of things.
   Europe’s taking a pretty big or different approach with GDPR, and there
   were, you know, serious sensitivities around privacy. I’m curious how
   you see that, especially given that you’re both in the role of, you
   know, infrastructure and telecom, but also in the content business
   where, you know, collecting data and using it in advertising and the
   like is really important. So I’m curious about your thoughts on that.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah, this is—this is a big issue, and I’m going to back up
   a little before I just get to the core of your question. But, look, the
   beginning of your question is very relevant, and the paper that McRaven
   and the folks wrote here at CFR, I browsed it this morning, but it
   talks about the technologies that China has established as areas they
   want to advance and be in the leadership in: AI, quantum, and 5G. Those
   are not independent; those are interdependent. And if you think about
   all of these—and they have established them as the premise for economic
   as well as military leadership. And when you think about AI, what is
   the—what is the fuel that makes AI relevant? It’s data—data, data,
   data, data, data. That’s what AI is all about. As I said, the Chinese
   aren’t spending a lot of cycles and a lot of time, you know, permitting
   cell sites. They’re not spending a lot of cycles and time on privacy
   policies, and what data can we use, and what data can we collect. 5G is
   going to allow sensors all over the—all over the place. 4G networks, in
   a square mile you can connect thousands of devices. 5G, millions of
   devices per square mile, much lower power, much lower compute
   requirements. So data is going to be thrown off of this stuff. They
   have no issues with collecting data and using data, which will power
   AI, which will make their AI much more advanced and much more powerful.
   To make that AI relevant, you’re going to have to have different
   compute algorithms, quantum. Quantum is critical for all of this. And
   if you’re going to have great data, AI, great quantum, what are you
   going to need? You need to move this data around in real time. That’s
   why 5G is so critical. These all fit together, OK? Now, in the United
   States we are headed down a path, unless—here I go again—Congress acts.
   We’re headed down a path where California now has a data privacy rule,
   you have I believe Washington—I’m looking at my guys over here. Maine
   has a different privacy rule. There are multiple states working on
   their own privacy rules. They will all be different. If you’re a
   consumer, you’re not going to know what the rules are for how one
   company handles your data versus another. If you’re a company, it’s
   going to be hard to kind of manage this across fifty different states,
   while the Chinese are over there doing this. (Snaps fingers.) We need
   privacy legislation at the federal level. It needs to be robust. It
   needs to be a really good privacy bill where everybody is treated the
   same. But we need to have a privacy bill—this is going to be another
   one of those areas where we’re handicapped in the U.S. because we just
   don’t have rules and a framework that allows us companies—(snaps
   fingers)—to innovate and to move and to—and to really lead in these
   areas. So your question is a very important question. And it’s one that
   if we don’t get right it’s another area where we fall behind. HAASS:
   Well, I’ll just take one minute. Just I want to make sure everybody
   gets it about why 5G is so significant. What will—the speed, the
   capacity, and the rest, but just take a second to say why 5G is not
   just a linear increase, it’s something qualitatively different.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah. So when you talk 5G everybody goes, oh, it’s faster,
   right? And it is. It’s faster. It’s lower latency as well. I mean,
   you’re talking about really low latency, meaning from the time you
   issue a command from a machine or you push a smartphone or
   whatnot—(snaps fingers)—instantaneous reaction to the command. So it’s
   real-time networking. That’s important, but that’s not the gig. It’s
   what does that facilitate. And you heard me already say in a world of
   4G you can connect thousands of devices on a cell site within a square
   mile. (Holds up smartphone.) This. I can have my watch. You can have
   your car that’s connected to it, and you can have devices, thousands of
   them per square mile. 5G, that becomes millions—millions of devices per
   square mile. This becomes the most connected society we have ever
   conceived of. This is really game changing. Now, combine this with in a
   world of 4G you can locate this device—(holds up phone)—or this
   device—(points to watch)—or whatever device, a sensor, to within
   meters. But it’s GPS kind of stuff and it’s not very precise. In a
   world of 5G, you can locate devices within a couple of centimeters. It
   becomes very, very precise in terms of your ability to locate something
   that is connected to this network. Now, think of what—about what that
   means in the world of security. That wigs some people out. Me? Oh, this
   is new security level. This is great security. The idea that I can
   locate where is this relative to a transaction that’s taking place; am
   I within centimeters of a terminal, or can I set up geofence locations
   to say that only people within a very specific location can access
   data? I mean, this allows us to take security to a whole different
   place. That’s really important. Then the last—and these all fit
   together—but it allows what I call hyper-miniaturization. We have these
   big devices. You know, it’s got a big screen. But there’s a lot going
   on inside here. There’s a lot of compute power in here. There’s a lot
   of storage capacity in here. There’s a lot of power requirements to
   make all of that work. And so you have some form factors that are—that
   could be rather large. When the networks are this fast, this
   instantaneous, that compute, that storage, and even the power
   requirements could be pushed out of here back into the network. This
   fundamentally changes form factors over time. Google had the glasses we
   all talked about. This can conceivably become the form factor. You
   don’t need all of the horsepower in these devices. This could become
   your screen to the world. It truly can. You can now think of sensors
   that rather this size they become miniaturized, and they can have power
   that will last ten years because it doesn’t require that much power to
   keep them going. Now you can begin to have all of your
   infrastructure—traffic management, utilities, pipelines—you can begin
   to conceive of how much of a society’s infrastructure is underpinned by
   this kind of technology. Now, as I think about that, that is when I say
   it makes a lot of sense to ask what companies should be underlying the
   development of the equipment underlying this infrastructure? And if
   you’re ever going to be at a place where you’re worried about the
   relationship of a particular company or country, then you ought to be
   mindful as to who’s manufacturing this stuff. And so this is how it
   fits together in my mind and why I think we’re all wise to be
   thoughtful and prudent about how we pursue this. HAASS: What everybody
   also wants to know is whether they’re going to be able to find the
   television remote and—(laughter)— STEPHENSON: There will be no remote
   because you’ll say “turn on CNN” and it’ll just come on, OK? HAASS:
   That’s good. That’s good. Yes, sir. Q: Richard— STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick.
   HAASS: Just wait for a microphone. We all want to hear you. Q: Richard
   Adkerson from Freeport-McMoRan, a copper mining company. Randall—
   STEPHENSON: So you could tell us a thing or two about China here. Q: He
   said I couldn’t give a speech. (Laughter.) I’ve got one to give. But—
   Q: Another time. Q: Another time. Randall, I want to talk to you about
   the role you’ve played representing your own company and business in
   general through The Business Roundtable and other initiatives you’ve
   had. It seems to me we’ve had two administrations now where we’ve had
   real challenges in communicating business interests to government. We
   had some success, as you said, with taxes, but we— STEPHENSON: You’re
   telling me I’ve been an abject failure. Is that what you’re trying to
   say? Yeah. (Laughter.) Q: No, no, no, no, no. It’s a challenge for all
   of us and a challenge for our country—company because our of our impact
   on international relations. But I’d be interested in your comment on it
   just broadly. How do you think it’s—we know the challenges, but do you
   think—are you frustrated by it, encouraged by it? Do you—do you have
   observations of how we might do it better? STEPHENSON: Look, we’re
   dealing with elected officials, and that’s always a different
   environment to be in, right? I mean, these are people who are trying to
   address the interests of very specific constituencies. And so we
   always, I think, as business have to figure out how we make the
   case—and it happens to be the right case—that what we do has virtue,
   what we do has nobility; and what we do does create investment, it does
   create jobs, it does create the opportunity to provide healthcare. We
   educate our workforces. I’m talking people that—with us in the BRT. We
   educate our workforces like nobody else. And so I just—I’ve never been
   able to figure out, Richard, this formula for why is it so hard to
   convey that, you know, with the appropriate regulatory oversight and
   freedom of the press monitoring all of us and making sure we’re doing
   the right thing, but why is it so important or so difficult to convey
   that what is in the broader best interest of American business is in
   the best interest of the American consumer, the American worker? With
   the right constraints around, you know, how we treat people and so
   forth. And that’s why the issue you asked me about a moment ago—you
   know, the purpose of a corporation—that’s why this is so important.
   There has to be a virtuous cycle here. We have to see that a
   corporation has got the best interests of their employees and their
   communities and all of this in mind, because without that you can’t
   have the virtuous circle of profitability and reinvestment back into
   companies that invest in America. And so that’s a hard case to make.
   You know, I’ve sat up here twice today, tried to make it, and have not
   been very effective, obviously. But it doesn’t seem like it’s such a
   difficult concept to grasp if business—if business operates the way
   we’re talking about here. Now, all organizations have people who don’t,
   you know, exactly play by the same rulebook, and those companies need
   to be dealt with, and you need to have enforcement and regulation for
   those reasons. But by and large, large business in America does a
   pretty darn good job of taking care of the interests of the American
   worker. HAASS: I want to put one other question about Time Warner. When
   you—when you all acquired DirecTV, that was sort of a(n)
   engineering/hardware company taking over another engineering/hardware.
   But Time Warner is a creative company. How is that going in terms of
   merging cultures? Very, very different. And what have you learned? How
   is it—essentially, what’s been tougher than you thought, what’s going
   better than you thought? Where does that stand? STEPHENSON: So
   it’s—this is going to be an interesting case study one day because when
   we bought Time Warner and we tried to think about how do we—how do we
   manage this business, how do we preserve the creative culture that’s so
   critical to their success, you’re buying a business that every single
   night every asset drives home. And so how do you preserve the necessary
   culture of a creative company like that, but recognize that that
   industry is changing not on the margin, it’s changing radically? And I
   had this conversation yesterday, that as you think about how you run a
   company like that, you know, you would run Time Warner the way it was
   structured when we bought it one way with one type of person and
   leadership and so forth. But if you’re trying to take what I will call
   a legacy media company and transform it for the new era, would you
   think about organizing and managing it a little differently? Because
   this company, we got to get it pivoted. We got to take all this great,
   fabulous content and all this great talent and figure out how to get
   that content delivered digitally. Because while the amount of—amount of
   content people are consuming every day is actually growing, it’s not
   shrinking—you know, we hear about cord-cutting and oh my God, you know,
   people are not watching. No, people are watching more content, but all
   of the growth is happening on digital. So the pivot we have to run—and
   you know, we’ve done this not in creative cultures before, but we’ve
   done this a thousand times going from a legacy business to a new
   business, transitioning business models from wired line to wireless,
   you know, from old basic dialup to high-speed internet and fiber. You
   know, you run these transitions. Well, the media industry is having to
   run one of these transitions. And so how do you do that without
   breaking the culture that’s so important underlying all of this? And
   this is where we think we have a really unique advantage here if we can
   execute this play, because there are a lot of companies in media trying
   to run this transition and they’re pivoting to a digital model, but
   they don’t have distribution. Their distribution has been cable
   companies, satellite companies, and movie theaters. But what happens
   when that isn’t your primary distribution in the future? You better
   have some kind of direct relationship with the customer. And if there’s
   a media company that has a massive relationship with a massive number
   of customers, they would seem to have an advantage to me. Well, guess
   what? AT&T has 170 million customer relationships. That’s a pretty darn
   good starting point for if you can pivot a company to digital
   distribution. Now, we can take that and drive it through 170 million
   customer relationships. And I tell people we have a couple of early
   datapoints. They’re really early; we’re a year into this now. But HBO,
   in the course of one year, AT&T has been by order of magnitude the
   largest distributor of HBO in a very short period of time. In fact, if
   you look at the number-two distributor, we’re 67 percent larger than
   the number-two distributor. Think about it. It’s going through mobile
   now. It’s going through our broadband product. It’s going through our
   pay TV product. And it’s having an incredible impact in driving HBO
   volumes. And I told you DISH dropped HBO in the second quarter, just
   dropped them cold. (Snaps fingers.) A huge distributor of HBO. HBO grew
   3 percent in the second quarter. How? New distribution, right? And
   content is king. Distribution matters. You put the two together, we
   think there’s an opportunity to transform this media company to digital
   without having to compromise distribution in the interim. HAASS: Time
   for a few more questions. Yes, ma’am. Yeah. Q: Great, thank you. Molly
   Elgin-Cossart with Markle Foundation. STEPHENSON: Hi. Q: I wanted to
   come back to the education and training point. You talked about what
   AT&T has done, laudably, and I’m thinking there’s an entire ecosystem.
   There are other employers. There’s our K-12, which a speaker this
   morning said is actually our biggest national security threat, and
   other postsecondary education and training. And I’m thinking, what do
   you take away from that experience to inform the broader conversation
   about what policymakers should be thinking for education and training
   and for our talent pipeline, other employers? Sort of a slightly
   broader picture. I’d love to hear those insights. STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   this is an interesting question. And if you think about—you called it
   an ecosystem. That’s the right term. We built an ecosystem around
   employee development and reskilling our employee base. It seems to me
   so logical that this would work in a municipality. I mean, why can’t a
   city—pick it; Dallas, where we’re headquartered—why can’t Dallas
   inventory all the jobs in that community and, you know, they should be
   categorized. I mean, the world of AI, this stuff isn’t that hard
   anymore. It’s not that expensive to do anymore. But categorize all
   these jobs, directionally where are these types of jobs going—welders,
   HVAC. I mean, we’re relocating HVAC people into Dallas. Think about
   that, just people to work on air conditioners and heating systems. And
   these pay a lot of money, all right? There’s a demand for people who
   have HVAC skills. Why can we not have an inventory of these? Why can we
   not have very—for the broad base of jobs, what credentials are required
   for those jobs, and giving people access to the credentialing criteria
   to get those jobs? This seems like it would work in a—in a city, in a
   state, one could even argue in a federal environment. It’s not rocket
   science, really. It takes a lot of hard work and a lot of effort. But I
   think there are implications. Tom Friedman has come to me and
   challenged me, why don’t you just stand this up for Dallas, you know?
   And you know, you think about it, maybe there’s a business model here.
   But it just feels like something that could really move the needle in
   terms of getting people ready for the jobs that are growing, the jobs
   that are coming, rather than the jobs that have been. How do you
   reskill a community? HAASS: A little bit of a home-team advertisement:
   that was the subject of our previous task force report. STEPHENSON: Is
   that right? OK. HAASS: Yeah. No, it’s a—I think it’s big issue because
   if we don’t get it right this country’s not going to have—no pun—you
   know, the bandwidth to cope with a lot of things around the world
   unless we get this issue right. Yes, sir? Q: Hi. Eben Kaplan from
   CrowdStrike. You spoke about the tremendous opportunity that the 5G
   infrastructure will create. It also creates tremendous opportunity for
   abuse and destructive power of attacks if someone were to manipulate
   that infrastructure. I wonder where you see the role of the private
   sector versus the public sector in securing that. What’s the—what’s the
   right mix there in order to ensure that we reap those benefits without
   incurring some of the—some of the risks? STEPHENSON: They key word you
   used is “mix.” It’s a mix. And I think—I think we’re really good at
   network security. We invest a lot of money at it. We spend a lot of
   time at it. But you know, our government has a lot of information in
   terms of things that are going on, and they have insights into traffic
   and so forth that’s going over these networks. And putting the entities
   together in a way that protects, first of all, our consumers’ and our
   businesses’ information and data, but that—a lot of that, as you might
   well guess, does happen and does go on. I think as this gets more and
   more sophisticated, and more and more complex, and more and more
   aggressive—David Sanger is somewhere here in the room. If you haven’t
   read his book, go read it; it’ll scare the hell out of you in this
   regard. But we’re going to have to get better and better at partnering
   with government. And I would challenge that it’s got to be a two-way
   flow. Our government tends to like one-way flows, and for these things
   to work it will have to be two-way flows that are more fluid and so
   forth. But it’s going to be critical to partner on this. And David
   Sanger’s book makes the point that it’s hard to get people energized
   and to take action on this if they don’t recognize how significant the
   threat is. And the threat is significant. I mean, think about the
   implications of somebody taking down a significant portion of the
   internet. You could cripple financial communities. You could—you could
   stop a lot of things. And I try not to be too sensational in these
   things but, you know, some very targeted things could have significant
   implications on electric transmission, all right? And these are things
   that ought to be alarming. And we ought to have a bright light focused
   on this and making sure that government and business are working
   together. HAASS: Yes, sir. Q: Thank you. I’m Bob Perry with the
   Stevenson Group of International Consultants. You’ve given a very
   detailed and broad view of the 5G world, primarily in the U.S. and
   maybe other developed markets. My question goes to the developing
   world, specifically Africa. Go back to the year 2000, telephone
   penetration in Africa was maybe 1, 2 percent. Then came the cellphone.
   And now you have mobile use in villages of a hundred people, two
   hundred people. The question is, the opportunity and financial
   governance challenges if 5G move into that space. HAASS: Actually, when
   you answer that, also talk about low-density areas in this country. I
   had the same question, about rural areas. STEPHENSON: You know,
   something’s happened here in the United States that doesn’t get a lot
   of attention, but this is another one of those I believe there’s a
   model here for the world. And I’ve talked to the president of Mexico
   about this, in terms of how you achieve rural coverage in Mexico and
   connect everybody not to wireless telephony, but to connectivity, the
   internet. This is an internet device now, right? And so after 9/11,
   none of the emergency responders could interact and communicate. I
   mean, communications were a disaster after 9/11. Everybody was on
   different protocols. And firemen from Pennsylvania came to New York,
   and they could communicate with New York firemen, and the police
   couldn’t communicate with the fire, and the EMS couldn’t communicate.
   And it was just really, really bad. And so Congress passed legislation
   that instructed that a nationwide network—wireless network—be built for
   the first responder community. It was a big deal. It was called
   FirstNet. And so the government finally came out and did a big bid in
   2016—put out a big bid. We went in hard on this. And this bid said:
   Whoever wins this thing must build out all of America this network for
   first responders. And whoever wins it gets this big block of spectrum,
   airwaves, to build it in. But you got to build out the whole country.
   So very detailed requirements, and specifications, and so forth on
   this. We, AT&T, went in hard, and we won this thing. And we’re building
   out this nationwide network. We’re 60-some-odd percent complete now.
   This is really an amazing thing, because you’re getting this first
   responder network that is truly—it’s a high-performance network.
   Really, really impressive. When the first responders aren’t using it,
   we’re allowed to commercialize it for anybody else. But what’s
   happening? We’re building our rural America for the first responders,
   but the network’s available for rural America. We and the United States
   government are funding this. And you know how it’s funded? It’s
   funded—I told you, we spent $40 billion over the last ten years on
   wireless airwaves at auctions. In one of those auctions, the government
   carved off a few billion dollars of the proceeds and said: This is
   going to be used to help build this network out into rural America. And
   that’s what’s happening here. And I tell you, I watch this and I just—I
   expected this to be big and significant. It’s exceeding all of my
   expectations. And I do—when I talk to government officials around the
   world, I tell them: You need to watch this. This is really important.
   In Africa, in these communities, somebody has to buy the wireless
   airwaves. They’re either releasing those airwaves or they’re paying a
   check to get those airwaves. I think governments should be thinking
   about, how do I set some of that money aside now to take and put back
   into connectivity for our communities that would not otherwise have
   connectivity. So this is a model that I think has a lot of legs could
   be used elsewhere. HAASS: Randall, we’ve only got about a minute left.
   One of the very few principles we try to keep here is that we begin and
   end meetings on time. So many of us are enthralled with the HBO show
   Succession. And after having read the letter from Elliot, what we
   really want to know is to what extent does that tell us what we need to
   know about succession at AT&T? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Well, first of
   all, I have no sons that I can name as my successor. I don’t think that
   would be allowed at all, anyway. But I do love that show. I hope
   everybody’s watching that show. So please, tune in this Sunday night to
   Succession. (Laughter.) OK. HAASS: Thank you very much. STEPHENSON:
   Thank you, Richard. (Applause.) Thanks a lot. (END)

   Event with Randall Stephenson September 18, 2019 CEO Speaker Series

   Europe

   C. Peter McColough Series on International Economics With Sabine
   Lautenschläger
   Sabine Lautenschläger discusses Eurozone conditions and the European
   Central Bank's economic tools, as well as the effects of U.S. trade
   policy on the global economy. The C. Peter McColough Series on
   International Economics brings the world's foremost economic
   policymakers and scholars to address members on current topics in
   international economics and U.S. monetary policy. This meeting series
   is presented by the Maurice R. Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic
   Studies.

   Event with Sabine Lautenschläger September 19, 2019 C. Peter McColough
   Series on International Economics
   View All

   Expert Spotlight
   Robert D. Blackwill Robert D. Blackwill

   Henry A. Kissinger Senior Fellow for U.S. Foreign Policy

   U.S. Foreign Policy Europe and Eurasia Russia

   War by Other Means

   Book February 11, 2016 Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic Studies
   Robert E. Rubin Robert E. Rubin

   Chairman Emeritus; Former Secretary of the U.S. Treasury

   A Secret to Better Health Care

   Via New York Times May 28, 2019
   Michael Froman Michael Froman

   Distinguished Fellow

   Trade Globalization Economics

   Former Obama Administration Official: Trump Is Addressing
   'Longstanding' Trade Issues

   Via CNBC September 16, 2018
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Explainers

   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs

   1
     __________________________________________________________________

   4
   China Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen

   Pollution Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities

   China Belt and Road Tracker

   This tracker shows how the Belt and Road Initiative has changed
   countries’ bilateral economic relationships with China over time.
   Trade The Truth About Tariffs

   Tariffs have been applied over the years to protect homegrown
   industries and target competitors who are seen as using unfair trade
   practices. They impose costs on both importers and exporters and had
   been in decline until the recent U.S.-China trade spat.
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Experts in the News

   Benn Steil

   Steil: Trade War With China Will Be Factor in the Fed’s Decision-Making
   on Interest Rates

   Via CNBC September 21, 2019
   Steven A. Cook

   Cook: United States Is Prepared to Apply Further Sanctions on Iran And
   Not More

   Via CNN September 18, 2019
   Amy Myers Jaffe

   Myers Jaffe: India and China Should Decrease Their Use of Coal to Be a
   Climate-Neutral Economy

   Via Bloomberg Markets September 17, 2019
   View All

Featured Publications

   China

   The Third Revolution
   The Third Revolution argues that Xi Jinping’s dual-reform
   trajectories—a more authoritarian system at home and a more ambitious
   foreign policy abroad—provide Beijing with new levers of influence that
   the United States must learn to exploit to protect its own interests.

   Book by Elizabeth C. Economy May 2, 2018 Asia Program

   Japan

   Japan Rearmed
   Japan’s United States–imposed postwar constitution renounced the use of
   offensive military force, but, Sheila A. Smith shows, a nuclear North
   Korea and an increasingly assertive China have the Japanese rethinking
   that commitment—and their reliance on U.S. security.

   Book by Sheila A. Smith April 8, 2019 Asia Program

   U.S. Foreign Policy

   The Road Not Taken
   In chronicling the adventurous life of legendary CIA operative Edward
   Lansdale, The Road Not Taken definitively reframes our understanding of
   the Vietnam War.

   Book by Max Boot April 2, 2019
   View All

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

   from Digital and Cyberspace Policy Program

Protecting Data Privacy With User-Friendly Software

Cyber Brief

   February 18, 2016
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print
   Download PDF

   Report

   Sara "Scout" Sinclair Brody

   Executive Director, Simply Secure

   Protecting the privacy of user data from unauthorized access is
   essential for business executives, policymakers, and users themselves.
   The pace of targeted attacks and massive data breaches is only
   increasing. Each new incident hurts organizations' bottom lines,
   undermines users' trust in the products they use every day, and can
   have dire consequences for public safety.
   Sara "Scout" Sinclair Brody

   Executive Director, Simply Secure

   The problem is multifaceted. Technologists are rushing to fix software
   vulnerabilities. Regulators are trying to keep pace with the realities
   of a complex ecosystem. Market-based approaches, such as cybersecurity
   insurance, remain immature. In addition, consumers are still learning
   what options they have, and what options they should be asking for.

   More on:

   Privacy

   Cybersecurity

   Digital Policy

   Technology and Innovation

   Currently, end users can use software that provides strong privacy
   protection with a high degree of certainty. Unfortunately, adoption
   rates for such software are low, largely because of how hard it is for
   nonexperts to use. This does not have to be the case. Software
   developers in the open-source community—who are generally the first to
   build encryption and privacy tools—need to improve the design of their
   tools to make them more user-friendly and useful. In turn, corporate
   and government purchasers should begin promoting the value of
   open-source software, particularly as it offers best-in-class security.
   These steps would go a long way toward improving privacy online.

Background: Cryptography and User Experience

   Tools that provide strong privacy guarantees have historically been
   niche products, requiring a special understanding of the underlying
   security mechanisms in order to operate them. However, many of the
   basic concepts are straightforward. For example, encryption allows the
   contents of a message to be scrambled so that third parties cannot read
   it. Users apply an encryption key—similar to a long, complex
   password—to scramble data, and a decryption key to unscramble it. If
   the encryption of messages passing between users Alice and Bob occurs
   on their respective computers, and the decryption keys are under their
   sole control, it is called end-to-end encryption. This form of
   encryption is the gold standard in privacy preservation, because it
   prevents would-be eavesdroppers from intercepting the conversation.

     Many software companies live and die by their UX and employ a host
     of designers and researchers to improve it.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   Software tools for end-to-end encryption have been available to users
   since the early 1990s, when Phil Zimmerman created a program called
   Pretty Good Privacy (PGP) and released it to the public free of charge.
   However, nonexpert users have faced a number of challenges with these
   tools from the beginning. In a 1998 paper, "Why Johnny Can't Encrypt,"
   Alma Whitten and J. D. Tygar documented problems facing users of PGP.
   The authors found that participants had difficulty performing even
   basic tasks like encrypting and decrypting messages. Further studies
   have replicated these results with a variety of software programs.

   The integration of software into daily life—from workplace desks to
   phones tucked in pockets—has led to tremendous professionalization of
   user-experience (UX) design. From big firms to small app developers,
   many software companies live and die on the quality of their UX and
   employ a host of designers and researchers to improve it. Not
   surprisingly, end-to-end encryption tools are derided when they are
   hard to use, whether these tools are for playing games or talking
   confidentially about sensitive material. Given this industry focus on
   UX design, it may seem odd that privacy tools still have a reputation
   for being hard to understand and use. Several factors contribute to
   these apparent shortcomings, which limit the development and adoption
   of user-friendly privacy tools.

     Nonexpert users have a hard time distinguishing strong security
     properties from their snake-oil alternatives.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

Challenges

   One fundamental challenge to both the usability and adoption of
   privacy-preserving tools is that privacy is considered a secondary
   task, as demonstrated through user-experience research. A secondary
   task is always subservient in users' minds to the primary task, which
   is whatever core activity the software is meant to enable: sending
   emails in an email client, exchanging instant messages in a chat
   program, or collaborating on documents in a file-sharing application.
   Many security features have this second-class status: users describe
   talking to their friend not as "secure messaging" but simply
   "messaging," with the need for security as an ancillary requirement.
   This is problematic for software designers because users will readily
   abandon success on the secondary task if it becomes too onerous, or if
   they perceive it to be in conflict with the primary task.

   More on:

   Privacy

   Cybersecurity

   Digital Policy

   Technology and Innovation

   Privacy-preserving tools seeking mass appeal face another significant
   challenge: nonexpert users have a hard time distinguishing strong
   security properties from their snake-oil alternatives. It is easy to
   call a tool "secure," but it is hard to communicate the nuances without
   going into overwhelming details in an app-store listing. There have
   been efforts over the years to create a third-party seal of approval
   for secure tools, but these attempts have either foundered in obscurity
   or lacked credibility by allowing developers to purchase approval after
   a cursory self-evaluation.

   Creating well-designed privacy-preserving tools with mass appeal also
   faces a variety of ecosystem hurdles. First, most tools in this space
   are developed as open-source products, which means that the authors
   publish the source code for anyone to read. This is good for security
   because the transparency of the open-source development model makes it
   possible to conduct independent reviews of the software (reducing the
   probability of critical vulnerabilities). It is bad for sustainability
   because few open-source projects are profitable, and many derive their
   funding from unsteady sources of income such as donations or grants.

     A multitude of conflicting requirements around cryptography loom on
     the horizon in different jurisdictions.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   Second, the majority of nonexpert users are unlikely to transfer their
   digital lives to niche security tools, and prefer to prioritize their
   primary tasks by choosing the convenience of popular cloud platforms.
   End-to-end encryption is in direct conflict with the business model
   most platforms have adopted, because it prevents the data mining and ad
   targeting that these services have monetized. A service provider such
   as Google cannot serve targeted ads if it cannot read the contents of
   an email.

   Finally, a recent resurgence of a decades-old debate around the
   propriety of encryption technologies—particularly as they relate to
   law-enforcement efforts to thwart terrorism or investigate crimes—is
   creating tremendous uncertainty for software developers. Apple and
   Google have both made upgrades to support user-controlled encryption by
   default in strategic products (iMessage's encrypted chat, Android's
   encrypted file system). However, these nascent investments are unlikely
   to be followed by large-scale integration of privacy-preserving
   technologies, given that a multitude of conflicting requirements around
   cryptography loom on the horizon in different jurisdictions. For the
   United States, it is especially unfortunate that this debate emerges at
   a time when confidence in technology companies' ability to protect user
   data is still suffering from the fallout of the Edward Snowden
   revelations.

     Cryptography cannot distinguish good people from bad, so a backdoor
     for one is a backdoor for all.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

Recommendations

   First and most urgent, the current debate over the use of encryption
   undermines the promotion of privacy tools. The U.S. government proposed
   a technological backdoor with the Clipper Chip in the early 1990s,
   using the same arguments heard today. It failed spectacularly. Although
   technology has evolved since, the fundamentals of encryption have not.
   Policymakers in the United States and other countries should recognize
   that anything less than intact cryptography puts all users at risk.
   Developers cannot build software that allows law enforcement to access
   encrypted communications but prevents malicious actors from exploiting
   that access. Cryptography cannot distinguish good people from bad, so a
   backdoor for one is a backdoor for all. Undermining the encryption used
   by U.S. companies would place the average consumer at risk of attack by
   malicious third parties, and merely motivate criminals and terrorists
   to use one of many alternative options. Powerful cryptography tools can
   easily be built outside the United States; as the self-declared Islamic
   State's use of German messaging service Telegram demonstrates, software
   rarely respects borders.

     It is time to professionalize the practice of open-source
     development.

   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email

   In addition, technology decision-makers, including chief information
   security officers and others with purchasing power, need to promote the
   value of open-source tools throughout their organizations. This can be
   done by authorizing in-house engineers to contribute to open-source
   projects during work hours and explicitly seeking technology
   consultants experienced in the open-source world. Open-source
   development can span geopolitical barriers to create technologies that
   offer best-in-class security, but all too often such projects are
   viewed as half-baked or risky by decision-makers. The volunteer
   authorship of many projects contributes to this reputation, but the
   lack of polish in the user experience design does greater damage.
   Changing a company's culture from one of client ("software is an
   expense, what do I get for my money?") to one of community ("software
   is an investment, how can we contribute strategically for long-term
   benefit?") can help organizations and projects find innovative, secure,
   and affordable solutions.

   Open-source developers, in turn, need to prioritize user-experience
   research and design, as well as to optimize their tools for large
   organizations. The focus of too many projects has long been on users
   who resemble the developers themselves. It is time to professionalize
   the practice of open-source development, recruit designers and
   usability researchers to the cause, and take a human-centered approach
   to software design. In particular, project leaders should make the
   development process more accessible to new participants by including
   explicit instructions to user-experience experts in their
   documentation. Although this change in focus will require a cultural
   shift within the open-source community, it will allow projects to
   attract more users and more donations, and ultimately result in more
   useful tools.

   Digital and Cyberspace Update

A bimonthly newsletter featuring expert commentary from the Digital and
Cyberspace Policy program on cybersecurity, digital trade, internet
governance, and online privacy.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   To support these efforts, technology-focused foundations and software
   companies' research and development wings should shift funding
   priorities toward more applied research on crafting and communicating
   about security-related features. Much of the work in this area examines
   the reasons a tool is hard to use—not ways to improve it—or focuses on
   toy refinements (e.g., "this custom interface is better than the
   standard"). As an example of such research, WhatsApp recently
   incorporated end-to-end encryption into its mobile messaging platform,
   without changing the user experience of its product. However, it
   accomplished this by hiding all privacy-specific features and tasks
   from its users, which in turn introduces vulnerability to certain kinds
   of attacks. Instead, researchers should work to identify factors that
   make privacy features successful across tools, and examine how such
   features might be added to popular products without harming user
   satisfaction.

   Taken together, these recommendations would both incentivize and
   facilitate organizations and individuals in their efforts to adopt
   stronger protections of user data from unauthorized access.
   Easier-to-use privacy tools and greater consumer confidence, in turn,
   will support continued growth, innovation, and financial stability in
   the digital era.
   Sara "Scout" Sinclair Brody

   Executive Director, Simply Secure

Explore More on Privacy

   Cybersecurity

   Cyber Week in Review: July 12, 2019
   France approves a 3 percent Digital Services Tax on large tech
   companies; the UK fines British Airways and Marriott for data breaches
   under the GDPR; United States and UK signal relaxation of Huawei
   hardline; trade tensions drive tech companies out of China; and U.S.
   mayors unite against paying ransom to hackers.

   Blog Post by Adam Segal July 11, 2019 Net Politics

   Cybersecurity

   Will the Future Bring Digital Trench Warfare Between the EU and China?
   Four scenarios for the future of digital geopolitical conflicts

   Blog Post by Guest Blogger for Net Politics June 26, 2019 Net Politics

   Digital Policy

   Cyber Week in Review: May 31, 2019
   This week: House Speaker Pelosi takes on Facebook; a new global pact on
   AI; tech industry stakeholders criticize UK security agency proposal;
   U.S.-Huawei legal saga continues; and, Google issues new privacy
   standards for its extensions.

   Blog Post by Adam Segal May 31, 2019 Net Politics

Top Stories on CFR

   Sanctions

   What Are Economic Sanctions?
   For many policymakers, economic sanctions have become the tool of
   choice to respond to major geopolitical challenges such as terrorism
   and conflict.

   Backgrounder by Jonathan Masters August 12, 2019

   China

   Is China Manipulating Its Currency?
   The Trump administration has declared China a currency manipulator, but
   what that means for the ongoing trade war is far from clear.

   In Brief by Brad W. Setser August 8, 2019

   Women and Economic Growth

   Investing in Girls’ STEM Education in Developing Countries
   The education gender gap costs the world between $15 trillion and $30
   trillion in human capital. U.S. aid programs need to equip girls and
   women to participate in the modern digital economy.

   Policy Innovation Memorandum by Meighan Stone and Rachel B. Vogelstein
   August 7, 2019 Women and Foreign Policy Program

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Climate Change
     * China
     * Asylum
     * Afghanistan
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

   Public Health
   Daniel Becerril/Reuters

   Public Health Threats and Pandemics

   The E-cigarette Backlash
   An outbreak of a lung illness linked to vaping is raising concern
   worldwide and putting pressure on countries to rein in the booming
   e-cigarette industry.

   In Brief by Claire Felter October 2, 2019


   Vaping on the Rise in U.S., Especially Among Young People

   via Pew Research Center September 26, 2019


   The Mysterious Vaping Illness That’s ‘Becoming an Epidemic’

   via New York Times September 11, 2019
   Central America
   John Moore/Getty Images

   El Salvador

   The Troubled Northern Triangle
   The United States is struggling to respond to the latest wave of
   migrants fleeing poverty, violence, and corruption in El Salvador,
   Guatemala, and Honduras.

   Backgrounder by Amelia Cheatham October 1, 2019


   Congress Can Hold Trump Accountable on Honduras

   by Paul J. Angelo via The Hill September 18, 2019


   American Cities Reduced Violence—Will the Same Strategies Work in the
   Northern Triangle?

   by Steven Dudley via Foreign Affairs August 22, 2019
   Hong Kong

   Hong Kong

   An Economic Solution for Hong Kong
   After months of large-scale protests in Hong Kong, the city’s future as
   a bridge between mainland China and the outside world is in serious
   jeopardy. Fortunately, all sides share an interest in pursuing more
   inclusive growth within the “one country, two systems” framework that
   has been critical to Hong Kong’s success.

   by A. Michael Spence September 30, 2019

   China

   Democracy in Hong Kong
   As China’s power continues to grow, some fear that the considerable
   autonomy Hong Kong has enjoyed over the last three decades could slip
   away.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert September 30, 2019


   How China Sees the Hong Kong Crisis

   by Andrew J. Nathan via Foreign Affairs September 30, 2019
   China

   China

   Communist China’s Painful Human Rights Story
   The Chinese Communist Party has used arbitrary detention to maintain
   power since the People’s Republic of China was founded seventy years
   ago.

   by Jerome A. Cohen September 26, 2019


   The Problem With Xi’s China Model

   by Elizabeth C. Economy via Foreign Affairs March 6, 2019

   China

   The Chinese Communist Party
   The Chinese Communist Party faces a host of pressing domestic and
   international policy challenges as it transitions to a new generation
   of leaders.

   Backgrounder by Eleanor Albert and Beina Xu September 27, 2019
   United States

   Politics and Government

   The Impeachment Inquiry: What to Know

   Blog Post by James M. Lindsay September 25, 2019 The Water's Edge


   Read the Released Whistleblower Complaint

   via U.S. House Intelligence Committee September 26, 2019


   The Other Ukraine Scandal: Trump’s Threats to Our Ambassador Who
   Wouldn’t Bend

   by Philip H. Gordon and Daniel Fried via Washington Post September 29,
   2019
   United Nations

   Donald Trump

   Stressing ‘Nation’ at UN General Assembly
   Though Trump’s tone was solemn and even-keeled, the overall thrust of
   his UN General Assembly speech was of transactional nationalism,
   emphasizing the importance of pursuing national interests and combating
   globalism.

   Blog Post by Stewart M. Patrick September 24, 2019 The Internationalist


   ‘America First’ Means a Retreat From Foreign Conflicts

   by Charles A. Kupchan via Foreign Affairs September 26, 2019


   Read President Trump’s Remarks at the UN General Assembly

   via White House September 25, 2019

CFR on the Record

   View All

   United Nations

   A Conversation With Minister Adel al-Jubeir of Saudi Arabia
   For further reading, please see the CFR In Brief “Trump’s Iran-Saudi
   Arabia Dilemma” by Philip H. Gordon, the CFR blog post “Scale and
   Nature of Attacks on Saudi Oil Makes This One Different” by Amy M.
   Jaffe, and the CFR quiz “See How Much You Know About Saudi Arabia.”

   Event with Adel al-Jubeir September 24, 2019

   Pakistan

   A Conversation With Prime Minister Imran Khan of Pakistan
   Prime Minister Imran Khan discusses the current state of U.S.-Pakistan
   relations, recent developments in the disputed region of Kashmir, and
   Pakistan’s relationship with India, Afghanistan, and other neighboring
   countries.

   Event with Imran Khan September 23, 2019

   United States

   CEO Speaker Series With Randall Stephenson
   Randall Stephenson discusses his business strategy and lessons learned
   from leading AT&T. The CEO Speaker Series is a unique forum for leading
   global CEOs to share their insights on issues at the center of commerce
   and foreign policy, and to discuss the changing role of business
   globally. HAASS: Well, good afternoon. Welcome to the Council on
   Foreign Relations. I’m Richard Haass, president of the Council, and
   today we have one of our meetings in the series on CEO speakers. It is
   on the record. Anything you say can and will be used against you.
   STEPHENSON: I didn’t know that. I want to dismiss myself. (Laughter.)
   HAASS: Do you want to leave now? We are pleased to welcome Randall
   Stephenson of AT&T to the Council for a conversation. He has been
   chairman and CEO for more than a decade now, twelve years give or take.
   STEPHENSON: Sounds like fifteen minutes underwater. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Well, hopefully this won’t. He’s, obviously, been involved directly and
   personally in any number of consequential decisions, most recently with
   the acquisition of Time Warner. I should also say that AT&T’s been
   generous, committing over a billion dollars over his years to a variety
   of education, retraining, and diversity initiatives, some within the
   company, some beyond the company. Full disclosure—important to give
   that—they’re a corporate member here at the Council on Foreign
   Relations, as was Time Warner in its—when it was an independent
   company. What we are going to do is Mr. Stephenson and I are going to
   have a conversation for a few minutes. Then we’ll open it up to you,
   our members, to ask the tough questions that I didn’t have the wit to
   ask. Let me just—thirty-second plug for the Council on Foreign
   Relations. Just this morning we issued our most recent task force
   report, Innovation and National Security: Keeping Our Edge. And I
   commend it to anyone in this room and beyond because it’s a real
   emphasis on what we need to do here at home, and that one can’t ask
   everything of our diplomats or our military. There are certain things
   we have to do as a society in order to put ourselves in a position
   where we can do what we need to to look after all aspects of our
   national security. So again, I really recommend it to you. Thanks for
   coming today. STEPHENSON: Good to be here. Thanks for having me. Happy
   to. HAASS: So let’s begin with China. I’ve been in this business a
   while, and I can’t think of another major relationship with the United
   States that has changed, and to give a sense of directionality,
   deteriorated as quickly and as dramatically as the U.S.-China
   relationship has in the last couple of years. And everyone decries the
   lack of bipartisanship in Washington; this is actually fairly
   bipartisan. If you listened to the Democratic debate the other night,
   the anti-China rhetoric was pretty—was pretty robust. What has been
   your experience with China? I mean, for example, a couple of questions
   come to mind. One, do you—are you aware that they’ve taken your
   technology? Have you—have you had a problem with that with China? I
   know you’re doing business with Huawei in places like Mexico. What
   has—what has been your experience with them? Have they been essentially
   a good partner or something less? STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) One of the
   companies over in China that’s a large-scale creator of—builder of
   telecommunication equipment, one of the first products they ever put
   out, and did quite well with, was a very close replica of a PBX back in
   the old days, in the 1960s, that was made by AT&T. (Laughs.) HAASS:
   What a coincidence. STEPHENSON: It was, probably coincidental.
   (Laughter.) So in terms of firsthand experience, you know, we’ve had
   our share of, you know, challenges and concerns in that regard. In
   terms of, you know, implications to AT&T specifically, we’ve had few
   issues because by and large we’re not allowed to do business there. We
   are prohibited from doing business. Now, we do have some points of
   presence and so forth. We’re allowed to do some things, carry traffic
   for customers. But we’ve had very little, little experience doing
   business within China. Now that has changed, obviously, with the
   acquisition of Time Warner. You know, Aquaman did $600 million before
   it got to the shores of the United States, and so that’s changing a
   little bit with this acquisition. But you know, my main thoughts as it
   relates to China is just what’s happening just domestically
   economically here in the United States as a result of what’s recently
   transpired, because I was one of the zealots, biggest supporters in
   terms of some of the economic policies of this administration. But all
   of these positives that have been generated over the last couple of
   years—predominantly business investment, which had been growing 6, 7
   percent year over year just consecutively like clockwork since the tax
   reform went in on corporations—we’re now in a manufacturing recession.
   And it’s—if you had to point your finger at, you know, something, it
   would be one of two things. It would be the Chinese situation and the
   Mexico situation. HAASS: Because it’s probably not that interest rates
   are not low enough. STEPHENSON: I don’t think anybody’s having trouble
   accessing capital right now, yeah. HAASS: (Laughs.) STEPHENSON:
   Accessing capital is not an issue. HAASS: If we end up in a world where
   we have, if not divorce, separation from China, and fairly separate
   supply lines and markets, and a lack of technology sharing, how much
   more difficult does that make business for you, or not? I mean, like if
   we end up in a slightly bifurcated world, what does it mean for a large
   company like yours? STEPHENSON: Yeah, I— HAASS: Does it make a
   difference? STEPHENSON: Yeah, it makes a heck of a difference. I think
   it makes a heck of a difference just on the United States, and a
   company like ours is dependent upon the health and vibrancy of the
   United States economy. And if you end up in a place where it’s—I don’t
   believe it’s China and the rest of the world; I think it’s China and
   others and the rest of the world, one could argue maybe some—to some
   extent it’s East versus West. And when you think about where is the
   growth in the global economy, you know, Asia is where the growth is.
   HAASS: Where the people are. STEPHENSON: And so if you’re a U.S.
   economy—and we just had this conversation; 5 percent of the population,
   20, 25 percent of the world’s economy—you’re kind of dependent upon
   trade if you want to keep growing your 25 percent share. And so a world
   where you are cut off from a significant amount of global growth, from
   our standpoint that’s a problem. And so where do you have to look, you
   know, Africa? Well, China’s doing a lot in Africa. I don’t know how
   this bifurcation happens. Perhaps Latin America we could do well with.
   But yeah, it’s disconcerting for a company that’s dependent upon U.S.
   growth. HAASS: One last thing that’s related to China. If there’s a
   trade deal with China, I think it’s possible to include things like
   market access and the Chinese will make certain commitments, again, on
   technology and the rest. The one area I can’t see a trade deal really
   accomplishing is a—is anything that would have a major reduction in
   Chinese subsidies from the state to their state-owned enterprises. And
   one of the areas that would, obviously, have consequences for would be
   things like 5G. Would you be happy with a trade deal that didn’t tackle
   the state subsidy issue, or do you just assume it won’t? STEPHENSON:
   I’m skeptical that a trade deal could be reached that would
   address—you’ve termed state subsidy. Let me just term—use the
   terminology just subsidy in general, because I don’t know how you
   enforce it. So, for example, the way some of the subsidies seem to work
   in China—everybody’s familiar with our industry and Huawei and what
   they do in China. And to put this into perspective, if Huawei could
   achieve in China a 90 percent share of Chinese communications, market
   share, they by definition have 30 to 40 percent global share. That’s a
   big deal. Now, if they could get another 10, 20 percent outside of
   China and start to get 40, 50 percent global share, this is a problem.
   This is a problem for the West. This is a problem for Western supply
   chain. How could they get that other 10 to 20 percent share around the
   globe? You talk about subsidies. I mean, it’s real easy to conceive of
   a situation where a Chinese communications company puts out a bid,
   Huawei bids at a premium to what everybody else bids, and Huawei wins
   it. They have 90 percent share in China. Now they go bid in Europe,
   what do you think happens? The flip. They bid at 20, 30 percent
   discounts to everybody else, and so as a result they start taking
   significant share outside of China. You go to Latin America, these
   shares are really high. Go to Africa; Huawei shares are really high.
   Europe, I mean, for heaven’s sake, there are many countries in Europe
   where they have 40 and 50 percent share. And so this company is gaining
   significant share in mobile technology around the world. And this is—if
   you don’t mind me just kind of bridging real briefly, they’ve gained
   this share in a world of 4G, fourth-generation technology. You go,
   well, OK, fine, but what about 5G? They’ve been very smart. They do not
   allow interoperability of their 4G equipment to their 5G equipment. So
   if you get 40 to 50 percent global share of 4G technology, guess what
   you’ve ensured yourself for 5G? Forty to 50 percent 5G market share.
   This is something that we in the West need to be conscious of and aware
   of. And while I don’t always endorse the approaches of our
   administration, I think the mindset, the thought process, the concern
   is probably on target. HAASS: Let me return to that in a few minutes,
   but let me—I want to touch on a couple of other subjects before we open
   it up. I want to talk about corporate America for a second. I assume
   many people in the room saw the Business Roundtable statement. I think
   you were one of the signatories. Essentially, the message was
   shareholder return can’t be our only preoccupation; we’ve got to have a
   wider sense of constituencies and stakeholders. But how do you
   navigate—it’s one thing to say that, but then you’ve got your quarterly
   reports. You’ve got something called Mr. Market that’s looking at you
   on a regular basis. How do you navigate a world where on one hand
   people are saying you’ve got to be sensitive to multiple
   constituencies, but—it’s a big “but”—we still care about your bottom
   line as shareholders? Is this an impossible dual mandate? STEPHENSON:
   No, I don’t—I don’t think it is at all. I mean, a lot of the media—the
   Wall Street Journal hyperventilated over it, and—that how can this be
   the case. I would represent that this is not anything new. If you
   really want to have a sustainable business model, sustainable what I’ll
   call free markets, you better be mindful and you better be cautious
   about things like supply chains, diversity, communities, and so forth.
   I just believe that if you’re not you have fracturing in a society, if
   corporations just run oblivious to that. You have to be mindful about
   your employees. I mean, how can you possibly expect to have a
   sustainable, profitable business over time if you’re ignoring all of
   these other variables? And so to me it’s the most logical thing in the
   world to think that the purpose of a corporation is to serve all those
   constituencies if you want to have a true sustainable model. HAASS:
   Keep moving around. AI, robotics, autonomous vehicles, this is the
   world we’re living in. You’ve established yourself—you being AT&T—as
   one of the leaders in the corporate world with reskilling, with
   training, education. If I’ve got it right, you basically go to your
   workforce in some cases and say you’re in a job, you’re doing great;
   the problem is this job is not going to exist in a year. What have—what
   have you learned from this? What’s working and what’s not working in
   terms of transitioning your workforce from today to tomorrow? What’s
   been your—what’s been your experience? STEPHENSON: What works is, first
   of all, making sure your employees understand how the world is
   changing. I mean, there has to be an awareness among your employees in
   terms of what is happening. Where are the jobs going? What jobs are
   going to be relevant three, five years from now, and what jobs are
   disappearing? And the one thing that—I wish I could take credit for
   this—our HR folks did was that starting point is out in our HR systems,
   when you go look at a particular job opening, it shows you what
   direction are those jobs going. Are they going up or are they going
   down? And if it’s a job where the number—the demands for the job are
   actually increasing, that’s heightening. That’s an awareness. That’s a
   really important thing. And so that’s a really important variable. And
   it seems basic, but a lot of people miss this. And so the employee
   understands this is where this thing is going. And you could think of
   the kind of areas; if I’m a telephone repairman, you know, and I go and
   click on for an opening, they’re going to see that that thing is doing
   this. You probably ought to be aware that’s not a kind of job that you
   want to be moving into. HAASS: Where does the CEO fit on that?
   (Laughter.) Sorry, cheap shot. (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, I don’t
   know that most people want it, to be honest with you. (Laughter.) But
   the other thing is, do you make it really, really easy for the
   employees to know what is required for the jobs they want to seek? And
   that sounds easy too, but you know, here are the certifications that
   are required, and if you want these certifications here’s where you go
   to get those certifications. Click this, this, this, take these
   classes, do this training, and now you are qualified for this job. And
   you can begin to truly move people—it doesn’t happen overnight, but you
   can truly begin to move people into the new world and into the new
   jobs, and it takes a period of time. I would say—we started this seven
   years ago and we said this is probably one of the most difficult
   logistical things we’ve ever tackled. And we build big networks and,
   you know, we do big logistical challenges, and this was one of the more
   difficult ones we took on. And I reflect back over seven years, and I
   have to say this is one of the areas that I take most satisfaction in
   over the last seven years, is how this has moved and transformed a
   workforce. HAASS: Let’s talk about healthcare for a second. You know,
   this country spends roughly—close to a fifth of its GDP in the area of
   healthcare. I don’t know the details of your program. STEPHENSON:
   Five-and-a-half billion dollars. HAASS: OK. So, again talking about the
   recent Democratic debates, a large number of the Democratic candidates
   are talking about some version of a large public option, in some cases
   taking away a private option. As someone who is spending this, you have
   hundreds of thousands of employees, what is your sense of where you
   want the government to go with healthcare? STEPHENSON: You know, look,
   if I were just saying purely financially motivated, government just
   takes over healthcare? Wow. I mean, five-and-a-half billion dollars a
   year we spend on it, right? That seems like an unlikely scenario, and I
   don’t think that it’s a scenario that is in the best interests of our
   employees. I do think we have to have a really vibrant, good, healthy
   safety net and access for people who are in areas of the economy where
   they can’t get healthcare. I’m all in and I’m all-in supportive of
   that. But the idea that the government is going to take over providing
   health care for—we insure I think somewhere around a million-and-a-half
   lives between retirees and actives. And taking that and dumping into a
   government system—that’s just one company—feels like a really, really
   big deal. And you know I don’t know. Some would say it’s too
   paternalistic, but I worry about the healthcare for our employees. We
   do a lot not just to control costs; we do a lot to ensure that our
   employees live healthy lifestyles—productivity, just their own
   longevity, et cetera. And once you start kind of abdicating that
   responsibility from companies, where does that lead you in terms of the
   general health of your employee body? I think it’s important that we as
   CEOs and companies have a vested interest in the health of our people.
   I think it’s a good thing. I think it’s a productive thing for society.
   HAASS: We actually practice that here, so we feel good about it. One of
   the—another area of emerging bipartisanship is hostility or
   questioning—I’ll make—I’ll dial it down a bit—towards big technology
   companies. Motivations may be different between the left and the right,
   but we see—whether it’s antitrust-based or regulation-based, we see the
   environment in which technology companies are operating in, clearly the
   temperature’s changing on that. STEPHENSON: Oh, boy. HAASS: What’s your
   reading of that, whether this would be welcome, or in some areas it
   might, in some areas it wouldn’t? To what extent are you concerned or
   potentially relieved that the government may be moving in this
   direction? STEPHENSON: I’m never one to wave a flag say go regulate or
   take on antitrust efforts on other companies. It’s just kind of against
   my nature. But it’s—it is interesting, and probably even ironic, that
   for twenty years the government seemed to have—didn’t seem to have; the
   government, the United States government, even state governments had a
   deliberate policy of light-touch oversight and regulation of the
   internet companies, and it was for good reason. They wanted to see
   these technologies flourish. It was good for America, get technological
   leadership. And so there has been a very, very light touch and
   hands-off approach to a lot of these companies, and mission
   accomplished. These companies have thrived, and we now have a lot of
   these companies who have a very significant share in the—in the domains
   where they operate. And you know, you think about AT&T, you know, back
   in the day we were regulated heavily as a monopoly until our market
   share fell below about 50 percent. We now have these companies that are
   now operating in domains where they’re having 60, 70 percent share of
   the particular areas where they operate. It probably should not be a
   surprise that people—attention is being heightened in terms of
   antitrust concerns. And are they legitimate, are they, you know,
   appropriate? I’ll let the authorities worry about that. But nobody
   should be surprised when you start getting 50, 60 percent market shares
   in these areas that the government starts looking closely at the
   behaviors. HAASS: And your sector is also an example where antitrust
   was applied, and after some degree of disruption quite a lot of
   companies did just fine. STEPHENSON: A lot of—AT&T, I would suggest.
   HAASS: Just to mention one, yes. (Laughs.) STEPHENSON: Company has done
   quite well in a—in a deregulated environment, and it is
   hypercompetitive. It’s a fun industry, but yeah, it took a little
   government intervention to get us to that place as well. HAASS: OK. Net
   Neutrality, let’s raise that—put that on the—I expect you got some
   opinions on— STEPHENSON: (Laughs.) HAASS: —on that, about what ought to
   be government policy in that area and how we ought to price it.
   STEPHENSON: I always start a conversation with Net Neutrality out with
   what does it mean, because if I were to just ask various tables to give
   me a definition of Net Neutrality, I— HAASS: You can’t ask this table,
   by the way. (Laughter.) I don’t care what they think. (Laughs.)
   STEPHENSON: I would—I would get multiple definitions of what it
   actually means. And if what we’re talking about is that there should be
   unfettered access to the content on the internet, and that, you know,
   companies like ours should not be able to block anybody from getting to
   certain content, or throttle you in terms of your use of content—we
   can’t treat AT&T’s HBO Max streaming better than Netflix’s
   streaming—and somebody ought to be able to develop a device that would
   connect to the internet and it ought to work as well as anybody else’s
   device, if you say that’s Net Neutrality, then by all means I think
   that’s important. I think it’s important to the growth, the
   development—the continued development of the internet. I think, in
   fact, that it is so important people in Congress ought to step up and
   do something about it, and actually ought to legislate what I just
   said. Instead, what we do is we have—we write the worst legislation in
   the world anymore. We write just kind of frameworks as legislation. We
   hand it off to a bunch of bureaucrats to regulate it. And depending on
   who is president one interprets it this way over here, and so companies
   orient themselves, they set up their business models over here. And
   then there’s an election, new president comes in, and we’re swinging
   all the way back over here, and you’re oriented over here, and your
   business practices are changing, and you don’t know how to invest in
   ten-, fifteen-year-horizon networks and so forth based on this kind of
   phenomenon. And so this is one of these areas that people need to step
   up and do their job and pass some legislation on this. This is a—this
   is chaotic for businesses who are trying to keep the U.S. in the
   leadership position on the internet. HAASS: So your view is almost
   whatever you decide just decide it and stick with it? STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   and I think there are some really broad frameworks that people can
   agree on. And it’s not too dissimilar from what I just articulated. I
   mean, there will be some—look, we’re all rent-seekers. You start this
   process and everybody’s going to be in there trying to get this thing
   and that thing. We just got to keep focused. And I will give credit on
   some of the recent legislation passed by Congress on tax reform on the
   corporate side—not the individual, but the corporate side. There were
   some big, broad principles that said get those competitive U.S. tax
   rate. There are some big, broad principles on Net Neutrality we should
   be able to legislate and get done. HAASS: I want to return just for one
   minute to 5G. And you know, given the way you’ve now—you know, where
   your company is with the acquisitions, you’ve got content, you’ve got
   distribution. The question is, given what we’ve said about China, given
   some of the European companies— STEPHENSON: Right. HAASS: —given
   Verizon, whether you think AT&T can be competitive in the 5G space.
   STEPHENSON: Oh yeah, I think we’ll be very—I think we’ll be leaders in
   the 5G space. We already are. When you think about, you know, what kind
   of determines how 5G rolls out, the first step is, how do you set
   standards so that you can get everybody manufacturing gear and
   equipment that guys like us go out and deploy? The standards are
   everything. And so AT&T was the leader in the standards-setting
   process. Now, something you should be aware of, for the first time in
   my career the Chinese got very aggressive in this, and they were all
   over the standards-setting process. But we got everything in the
   standards we wanted, that we thought the U.S. needed to have a shot at
   maintaining a leadership position. So standards are set right. We,
   AT&T, in anticipation of this, have been buying up, spending billions
   of dollars on acquiring wireless licenses, because when you think about
   5G, you got to have a lot of airwaves to pump all of these volumes
   through. We’ve spent over $40 billion over the last ten years on
   acquiring the licenses so that you can have the bandwidth to pump all
   this through. I will tell you AT&T is as in good a shape as anybody in
   the world. I think we’re in the best position in the United States and
   as good as anybody in the world. So mission accomplished there. We have
   a balance sheet that we’re committing to this and we’re investing in
   it. So I feel really good about that. We have great technology. We’ve
   done a good job on getting the technology ready. Here’s where we have a
   problem. If you’re thinking about your competition, you said Europe. I
   don’t think anybody in Europe has even issued an RFP for 5G yet, truly.
   So I set Europe aside. They have gone from first to worst in the—in the
   world of mobility for—you can debate why. But Europe is not in play
   right now. It’s China. If we want a leadership position, it’s vis-à-vis
   China. You want to deploy 5G, what are the big barriers? I’ve talked
   about some of the barriers, which we’ve now broken through. We’re past
   those, spectrum and standards and the equipment and so forth. Now you
   got to go out and put this stuff up. You got to go out and deploy
   thousands upon thousands of cell sites. Now, I don’t think in
   China—they’re spending three years trying to get San Francisco to
   approve a cell site. I suspect in China, when they want a cell site
   they go put up a cell site where they want it, and they’re putting up
   millions upon millions of cell sites while we’re over here kind of
   debating and thrashing through local/municipal regulations, state
   regulations, federal regulations trying just to get the infrastructure
   permits to put this stuff in place. And so if there’s a place where
   we’re going to fall behind, China is going to be able to go much faster
   in that regard than the U.S. will. And I’m not saying their approach is
   better. I get the environmental concerns, aesthetics, appearance. But
   we have people wearing aluminum-foil suits because they’re afraid of
   5G, right, and fighting deployment of 5G. I don’t think they’re dealing
   with that in China. HAASS: What about the regulatory side or the—so
   much of the spectrum is reserved for the military. Do you basically
   feel that the government has to change policies so you can do what you
   want to do with 5G? STEPHENSON: No, if there’s one area I have to tip
   my hat to the government, both the Obama administration and this
   administration, it is getting spectrum out into the marketplace. And
   there have been numerous auctions conducted. I told you we spent forty
   billion (dollars). The lion’s share of that have been in government
   auctions, acquiring airwaves. There have been already a handful of
   auctions on these really-high-frequency airwaves, which will make this
   stuff really hum. We’ve participated in a couple of those. There’s
   another one coming up this year. So I think our government is doing a
   really good job of getting the airwaves out into the hands of the
   market and the people who will deploy these networks. And that—we’re
   not lagging behind the Chinese in that regard. HAASS: You know, this is
   the Council on Foreign Relations. For a second I’m going to make it the
   Council on Financial Relations. One of my many joys in recent days was
   reading a twenty-plus page letter from Mr. Singer and company, from
   Elliott, sent you all advising you. So the criticisms or reactions
   about the idea that you’ve put together through acquisition rather than
   organic growth where you are, content and distribution, that
   essentially this is an old-fashioned conglomerate and that’s not a good
   idea anymore, how do you—how do you take that, other than not well?
   STEPHENSON: Look, I—the letter was—you know, I didn’t take the letter
   poorly. It was interesting to me the letter laid out some
   recommendations, and the recommendations seemed to be supportive of the
   strategy, the importance of Time Warner, the acquisition, and the
   importance of 5G which we have been talking about here, and the—and the
   power of the assets. You know, they actually talk about it in those
   terms. So, look, I read the letter, and candidly there were some areas
   that I just read and I thought, you know what, they make some good
   points. And we’ll engage with them on those points. It was a mixed bag,
   though. There were some that I read and I go, I’m not sure that’s so
   clear to me. And so those are areas we’ll also want to get some more
   detail. I mean, say what you will about Paul Singer’s organization,
   they’re smart people. They’ve got some really smart people. And so if
   they have some good ideas, I’m dying to sit down and we’ll grind
   through them and see what makes sense for all of our shareholders—not
   just one, but all of our shareholders. HAASS: One last question, then
   I’m going to open it up. When you went through the hoops of the merger,
   there were all sorts of questions about whether you would advantage
   your own content in your own distribution systems and disadvantage
   those of others. Where does that stand now? Because you now have all
   this content coming out of HBO and other places, and you’ve got your
   pipes so to speak. To what extent do others who want to get into your
   distribution system, other streaming services, how do they compete? How
   is—how is all this going to play out? STEPHENSON: It’s playing out
   exactly as we said it would play out in the courts. And I—it’s—there is
   not a whit difference between what we established as our position in
   the courts, and that is as a media company—I see Wolf and the team down
   here, CNN—I can’t even begin to fathom the motivation that would say we
   want to limit CNN’s distribution just to AT&T’s platforms. That is a
   mindless proposition. You develop and you spend a lot of money on
   developing great premium content, and how do you make money on it? Wide
   and broad distribution. You want to distribute it everywhere. And it’s
   the same with HBO. We want HBO distributed as broadly and as widely as
   we possibly can. That’s the way you create value out of franchises like
   HBO. And you know, we recently had a drop from Charlie Ergen on DISH
   Networks. He dropped HBO. You know, we didn’t stand up at home and
   start doing high-fives that DISH is not carrying HBO. You know, that’s
   a lot of distribution to lose. That’s how you make money. I see Sam
   Feist back there. Do you want more or less distribution for CNN, Sam?
   Q: I’ll take more. STEPHENSON: You’ll take more. (Laughter.) HAASS:
   Good answer. STEPHENSON: And so I always felt like the government’s
   lawsuit felt a bit nonsensical. And I think what we’re seeing play out
   in the marketplace since the deal closed is affirming that, and I’m
   having a hard time conceiving of a—of a time where we have said, hold
   that content back from Comcast or hold it back from Charter. No, we’re
   saying how do we get it deployed and distributed on Comcast and
   Charter. HAASS: OK. I’ve already asked more than I know, so let me open
   it up to our members. Again, it’s on the record. Wait for a microphone.
   We’ll recognize you. Let us know who you are and keep it succinct. No
   speeches, just a question. Only Mr. Stephenson gets to give speeches
   today. STEPHENSON: I’ll try to be succinct. HAASS: Ray? Q: Ray Tanter
   of the American Committee on Human Rights and the Iran Policy
   Committee. STEPHENSON: Hi, Ray. Q: Sir, do you think that Huawei is
   playing chess while we are playing checkers? STEPHENSON: Who? HAASS:
   Huawei. Q: (Off mic)—the other day. STEPHENSON: Oh, Huawei? Q: Huawei.
   HAASS: They actually played go, not chess. But anyhow. (Laughter.) Just
   a technical fix here. STEPHENSON: Well, I think they’re really smart,
   and I’ve—as you heard me articulate, I think they’ve made some very
   smart strategic plays. And this issue of disallowing interoperability
   between 4G and 5(G)—I don’t want to get technical, but that’s a big
   deal. And you know, if you’ve got the 4G layer and you can’t
   interoperate to 5G, then you are beholden to Huawei for 5G. So— HAASS:
   Isn’t that kind of what Apple does when they basically tell you that
   your charger that worked with one generation doesn’t work with the next
   generation? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Yeah, but changing out a
   thousand-dollar smartphone is different than—if you—if you don’t want
   to use Huawei for 5G, then you have to go rip and replace your
   fourth-generation network and put in another player. So, look, this is
   a really big deal. We, AT&T, have led the effort on something—I’ll try
   to make this as simple as possible, but virtualization of networks,
   putting as much of the electronics out on the edge as possible, but
   more importantly I refer to open source—open-source software. So we’ve
   developed—worked with the industry to develop a software layer that is
   the operating system for 5G. This is the software layer. It makes all
   the stuff talk to each other, if you will. We developed a software
   platform here and we contributed it into the open-source community.
   It’s out there. And guess what this thing is? It facilitates
   interoperability. And a significant amount of the players around the
   world have said that is the software layer we want in our 5G
   deployment. It’s a really big deal. It will take a while to get this
   scaled to both—to all levels of the network, but as you get open source
   out there it enhances security—because you got everybody out there
   auditing this software and identifying bugs and so forth and you fix
   it—but it creates the opportunity for interoperability, and what it
   does is says nobody sells a box with software just embedded in it. No,
   you have the software up here in a layer and any box can run that
   software. Why is that important? Because suddenly you have had a
   technological solution for this locking in people to a certain
   technology, if you know what I’m saying. So if you’re wanting to buy
   Huawei equipment, it’s a box with software in it. We don’t need that.
   We’ve got our software; we just need boxes. We need more what I’ll
   commodity-type boxes. This is a technological revolution that I think
   can be our fix in the long run for how we ensure that the Western
   supply chains are not dismantled by virtue of a Huawei strategy here.
   So it’s—we’re going to have to be smart. I take my hat off to the
   administration on some of the things they’re doing, the entity list and
   so forth. But I think these kind of solutions are technological
   solutions that ensure we have a level playing field for everybody who
   wants to use something other than Huawei. HAASS: Shane Green.
   STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick. Q: Hi. I’m with a personal data platform called—
   STAFF: (Off mic.) Q: Shane Green. Sorry, I wasn’t sure if that was
   redundant. (Laughs.) Another area that China has a big advantage given
   their approach to technology is around data and privacy. Some people
   are calling it surveillance state and they’re actively exporting it. I
   think Freedom House has listed about thirty-five countries that are
   actively deploying their approach to surveilling their own
   people—creating a citizenship score, there’s all these sorts of things.
   Europe’s taking a pretty big or different approach with GDPR, and there
   were, you know, serious sensitivities around privacy. I’m curious how
   you see that, especially given that you’re both in the role of, you
   know, infrastructure and telecom, but also in the content business
   where, you know, collecting data and using it in advertising and the
   like is really important. So I’m curious about your thoughts on that.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah, this is—this is a big issue, and I’m going to back up
   a little before I just get to the core of your question. But, look, the
   beginning of your question is very relevant, and the paper that McRaven
   and the folks wrote here at CFR, I browsed it this morning, but it
   talks about the technologies that China has established as areas they
   want to advance and be in the leadership in: AI, quantum, and 5G. Those
   are not independent; those are interdependent. And if you think about
   all of these—and they have established them as the premise for economic
   as well as military leadership. And when you think about AI, what is
   the—what is the fuel that makes AI relevant? It’s data—data, data,
   data, data, data. That’s what AI is all about. As I said, the Chinese
   aren’t spending a lot of cycles and a lot of time, you know, permitting
   cell sites. They’re not spending a lot of cycles and time on privacy
   policies, and what data can we use, and what data can we collect. 5G is
   going to allow sensors all over the—all over the place. 4G networks, in
   a square mile you can connect thousands of devices. 5G, millions of
   devices per square mile, much lower power, much lower compute
   requirements. So data is going to be thrown off of this stuff. They
   have no issues with collecting data and using data, which will power
   AI, which will make their AI much more advanced and much more powerful.
   To make that AI relevant, you’re going to have to have different
   compute algorithms, quantum. Quantum is critical for all of this. And
   if you’re going to have great data, AI, great quantum, what are you
   going to need? You need to move this data around in real time. That’s
   why 5G is so critical. These all fit together, OK? Now, in the United
   States we are headed down a path, unless—here I go again—Congress acts.
   We’re headed down a path where California now has a data privacy rule,
   you have I believe Washington—I’m looking at my guys over here. Maine
   has a different privacy rule. There are multiple states working on
   their own privacy rules. They will all be different. If you’re a
   consumer, you’re not going to know what the rules are for how one
   company handles your data versus another. If you’re a company, it’s
   going to be hard to kind of manage this across fifty different states,
   while the Chinese are over there doing this. (Snaps fingers.) We need
   privacy legislation at the federal level. It needs to be robust. It
   needs to be a really good privacy bill where everybody is treated the
   same. But we need to have a privacy bill—this is going to be another
   one of those areas where we’re handicapped in the U.S. because we just
   don’t have rules and a framework that allows us companies—(snaps
   fingers)—to innovate and to move and to—and to really lead in these
   areas. So your question is a very important question. And it’s one that
   if we don’t get right it’s another area where we fall behind. HAASS:
   Well, I’ll just take one minute. Just I want to make sure everybody
   gets it about why 5G is so significant. What will—the speed, the
   capacity, and the rest, but just take a second to say why 5G is not
   just a linear increase, it’s something qualitatively different.
   STEPHENSON: Yeah. So when you talk 5G everybody goes, oh, it’s faster,
   right? And it is. It’s faster. It’s lower latency as well. I mean,
   you’re talking about really low latency, meaning from the time you
   issue a command from a machine or you push a smartphone or
   whatnot—(snaps fingers)—instantaneous reaction to the command. So it’s
   real-time networking. That’s important, but that’s not the gig. It’s
   what does that facilitate. And you heard me already say in a world of
   4G you can connect thousands of devices on a cell site within a square
   mile. (Holds up smartphone.) This. I can have my watch. You can have
   your car that’s connected to it, and you can have devices, thousands of
   them per square mile. 5G, that becomes millions—millions of devices per
   square mile. This becomes the most connected society we have ever
   conceived of. This is really game changing. Now, combine this with in a
   world of 4G you can locate this device—(holds up phone)—or this
   device—(points to watch)—or whatever device, a sensor, to within
   meters. But it’s GPS kind of stuff and it’s not very precise. In a
   world of 5G, you can locate devices within a couple of centimeters. It
   becomes very, very precise in terms of your ability to locate something
   that is connected to this network. Now, think of what—about what that
   means in the world of security. That wigs some people out. Me? Oh, this
   is new security level. This is great security. The idea that I can
   locate where is this relative to a transaction that’s taking place; am
   I within centimeters of a terminal, or can I set up geofence locations
   to say that only people within a very specific location can access
   data? I mean, this allows us to take security to a whole different
   place. That’s really important. Then the last—and these all fit
   together—but it allows what I call hyper-miniaturization. We have these
   big devices. You know, it’s got a big screen. But there’s a lot going
   on inside here. There’s a lot of compute power in here. There’s a lot
   of storage capacity in here. There’s a lot of power requirements to
   make all of that work. And so you have some form factors that are—that
   could be rather large. When the networks are this fast, this
   instantaneous, that compute, that storage, and even the power
   requirements could be pushed out of here back into the network. This
   fundamentally changes form factors over time. Google had the glasses we
   all talked about. This can conceivably become the form factor. You
   don’t need all of the horsepower in these devices. This could become
   your screen to the world. It truly can. You can now think of sensors
   that rather this size they become miniaturized, and they can have power
   that will last ten years because it doesn’t require that much power to
   keep them going. Now you can begin to have all of your
   infrastructure—traffic management, utilities, pipelines—you can begin
   to conceive of how much of a society’s infrastructure is underpinned by
   this kind of technology. Now, as I think about that, that is when I say
   it makes a lot of sense to ask what companies should be underlying the
   development of the equipment underlying this infrastructure? And if
   you’re ever going to be at a place where you’re worried about the
   relationship of a particular company or country, then you ought to be
   mindful as to who’s manufacturing this stuff. And so this is how it
   fits together in my mind and why I think we’re all wise to be
   thoughtful and prudent about how we pursue this. HAASS: What everybody
   also wants to know is whether they’re going to be able to find the
   television remote and—(laughter)— STEPHENSON: There will be no remote
   because you’ll say “turn on CNN” and it’ll just come on, OK? HAASS:
   That’s good. That’s good. Yes, sir. Q: Richard— STEPHENSON: Hi, Dick.
   HAASS: Just wait for a microphone. We all want to hear you. Q: Richard
   Adkerson from Freeport-McMoRan, a copper mining company. Randall—
   STEPHENSON: So you could tell us a thing or two about China here. Q: He
   said I couldn’t give a speech. (Laughter.) I’ve got one to give. But—
   Q: Another time. Q: Another time. Randall, I want to talk to you about
   the role you’ve played representing your own company and business in
   general through The Business Roundtable and other initiatives you’ve
   had. It seems to me we’ve had two administrations now where we’ve had
   real challenges in communicating business interests to government. We
   had some success, as you said, with taxes, but we— STEPHENSON: You’re
   telling me I’ve been an abject failure. Is that what you’re trying to
   say? Yeah. (Laughter.) Q: No, no, no, no, no. It’s a challenge for all
   of us and a challenge for our country—company because our of our impact
   on international relations. But I’d be interested in your comment on it
   just broadly. How do you think it’s—we know the challenges, but do you
   think—are you frustrated by it, encouraged by it? Do you—do you have
   observations of how we might do it better? STEPHENSON: Look, we’re
   dealing with elected officials, and that’s always a different
   environment to be in, right? I mean, these are people who are trying to
   address the interests of very specific constituencies. And so we
   always, I think, as business have to figure out how we make the
   case—and it happens to be the right case—that what we do has virtue,
   what we do has nobility; and what we do does create investment, it does
   create jobs, it does create the opportunity to provide healthcare. We
   educate our workforces. I’m talking people that—with us in the BRT. We
   educate our workforces like nobody else. And so I just—I’ve never been
   able to figure out, Richard, this formula for why is it so hard to
   convey that, you know, with the appropriate regulatory oversight and
   freedom of the press monitoring all of us and making sure we’re doing
   the right thing, but why is it so important or so difficult to convey
   that what is in the broader best interest of American business is in
   the best interest of the American consumer, the American worker? With
   the right constraints around, you know, how we treat people and so
   forth. And that’s why the issue you asked me about a moment ago—you
   know, the purpose of a corporation—that’s why this is so important.
   There has to be a virtuous cycle here. We have to see that a
   corporation has got the best interests of their employees and their
   communities and all of this in mind, because without that you can’t
   have the virtuous circle of profitability and reinvestment back into
   companies that invest in America. And so that’s a hard case to make.
   You know, I’ve sat up here twice today, tried to make it, and have not
   been very effective, obviously. But it doesn’t seem like it’s such a
   difficult concept to grasp if business—if business operates the way
   we’re talking about here. Now, all organizations have people who don’t,
   you know, exactly play by the same rulebook, and those companies need
   to be dealt with, and you need to have enforcement and regulation for
   those reasons. But by and large, large business in America does a
   pretty darn good job of taking care of the interests of the American
   worker. HAASS: I want to put one other question about Time Warner. When
   you—when you all acquired DirecTV, that was sort of a(n)
   engineering/hardware company taking over another engineering/hardware.
   But Time Warner is a creative company. How is that going in terms of
   merging cultures? Very, very different. And what have you learned? How
   is it—essentially, what’s been tougher than you thought, what’s going
   better than you thought? Where does that stand? STEPHENSON: So
   it’s—this is going to be an interesting case study one day because when
   we bought Time Warner and we tried to think about how do we—how do we
   manage this business, how do we preserve the creative culture that’s so
   critical to their success, you’re buying a business that every single
   night every asset drives home. And so how do you preserve the necessary
   culture of a creative company like that, but recognize that that
   industry is changing not on the margin, it’s changing radically? And I
   had this conversation yesterday, that as you think about how you run a
   company like that, you know, you would run Time Warner the way it was
   structured when we bought it one way with one type of person and
   leadership and so forth. But if you’re trying to take what I will call
   a legacy media company and transform it for the new era, would you
   think about organizing and managing it a little differently? Because
   this company, we got to get it pivoted. We got to take all this great,
   fabulous content and all this great talent and figure out how to get
   that content delivered digitally. Because while the amount of—amount of
   content people are consuming every day is actually growing, it’s not
   shrinking—you know, we hear about cord-cutting and oh my God, you know,
   people are not watching. No, people are watching more content, but all
   of the growth is happening on digital. So the pivot we have to run—and
   you know, we’ve done this not in creative cultures before, but we’ve
   done this a thousand times going from a legacy business to a new
   business, transitioning business models from wired line to wireless,
   you know, from old basic dialup to high-speed internet and fiber. You
   know, you run these transitions. Well, the media industry is having to
   run one of these transitions. And so how do you do that without
   breaking the culture that’s so important underlying all of this? And
   this is where we think we have a really unique advantage here if we can
   execute this play, because there are a lot of companies in media trying
   to run this transition and they’re pivoting to a digital model, but
   they don’t have distribution. Their distribution has been cable
   companies, satellite companies, and movie theaters. But what happens
   when that isn’t your primary distribution in the future? You better
   have some kind of direct relationship with the customer. And if there’s
   a media company that has a massive relationship with a massive number
   of customers, they would seem to have an advantage to me. Well, guess
   what? AT&T has 170 million customer relationships. That’s a pretty darn
   good starting point for if you can pivot a company to digital
   distribution. Now, we can take that and drive it through 170 million
   customer relationships. And I tell people we have a couple of early
   datapoints. They’re really early; we’re a year into this now. But HBO,
   in the course of one year, AT&T has been by order of magnitude the
   largest distributor of HBO in a very short period of time. In fact, if
   you look at the number-two distributor, we’re 67 percent larger than
   the number-two distributor. Think about it. It’s going through mobile
   now. It’s going through our broadband product. It’s going through our
   pay TV product. And it’s having an incredible impact in driving HBO
   volumes. And I told you DISH dropped HBO in the second quarter, just
   dropped them cold. (Snaps fingers.) A huge distributor of HBO. HBO grew
   3 percent in the second quarter. How? New distribution, right? And
   content is king. Distribution matters. You put the two together, we
   think there’s an opportunity to transform this media company to digital
   without having to compromise distribution in the interim. HAASS: Time
   for a few more questions. Yes, ma’am. Yeah. Q: Great, thank you. Molly
   Elgin-Cossart with Markle Foundation. STEPHENSON: Hi. Q: I wanted to
   come back to the education and training point. You talked about what
   AT&T has done, laudably, and I’m thinking there’s an entire ecosystem.
   There are other employers. There’s our K-12, which a speaker this
   morning said is actually our biggest national security threat, and
   other postsecondary education and training. And I’m thinking, what do
   you take away from that experience to inform the broader conversation
   about what policymakers should be thinking for education and training
   and for our talent pipeline, other employers? Sort of a slightly
   broader picture. I’d love to hear those insights. STEPHENSON: Yeah,
   this is an interesting question. And if you think about—you called it
   an ecosystem. That’s the right term. We built an ecosystem around
   employee development and reskilling our employee base. It seems to me
   so logical that this would work in a municipality. I mean, why can’t a
   city—pick it; Dallas, where we’re headquartered—why can’t Dallas
   inventory all the jobs in that community and, you know, they should be
   categorized. I mean, the world of AI, this stuff isn’t that hard
   anymore. It’s not that expensive to do anymore. But categorize all
   these jobs, directionally where are these types of jobs going—welders,
   HVAC. I mean, we’re relocating HVAC people into Dallas. Think about
   that, just people to work on air conditioners and heating systems. And
   these pay a lot of money, all right? There’s a demand for people who
   have HVAC skills. Why can we not have an inventory of these? Why can we
   not have very—for the broad base of jobs, what credentials are required
   for those jobs, and giving people access to the credentialing criteria
   to get those jobs? This seems like it would work in a—in a city, in a
   state, one could even argue in a federal environment. It’s not rocket
   science, really. It takes a lot of hard work and a lot of effort. But I
   think there are implications. Tom Friedman has come to me and
   challenged me, why don’t you just stand this up for Dallas, you know?
   And you know, you think about it, maybe there’s a business model here.
   But it just feels like something that could really move the needle in
   terms of getting people ready for the jobs that are growing, the jobs
   that are coming, rather than the jobs that have been. How do you
   reskill a community? HAASS: A little bit of a home-team advertisement:
   that was the subject of our previous task force report. STEPHENSON: Is
   that right? OK. HAASS: Yeah. No, it’s a—I think it’s big issue because
   if we don’t get it right this country’s not going to have—no pun—you
   know, the bandwidth to cope with a lot of things around the world
   unless we get this issue right. Yes, sir? Q: Hi. Eben Kaplan from
   CrowdStrike. You spoke about the tremendous opportunity that the 5G
   infrastructure will create. It also creates tremendous opportunity for
   abuse and destructive power of attacks if someone were to manipulate
   that infrastructure. I wonder where you see the role of the private
   sector versus the public sector in securing that. What’s the—what’s the
   right mix there in order to ensure that we reap those benefits without
   incurring some of the—some of the risks? STEPHENSON: They key word you
   used is “mix.” It’s a mix. And I think—I think we’re really good at
   network security. We invest a lot of money at it. We spend a lot of
   time at it. But you know, our government has a lot of information in
   terms of things that are going on, and they have insights into traffic
   and so forth that’s going over these networks. And putting the entities
   together in a way that protects, first of all, our consumers’ and our
   businesses’ information and data, but that—a lot of that, as you might
   well guess, does happen and does go on. I think as this gets more and
   more sophisticated, and more and more complex, and more and more
   aggressive—David Sanger is somewhere here in the room. If you haven’t
   read his book, go read it; it’ll scare the hell out of you in this
   regard. But we’re going to have to get better and better at partnering
   with government. And I would challenge that it’s got to be a two-way
   flow. Our government tends to like one-way flows, and for these things
   to work it will have to be two-way flows that are more fluid and so
   forth. But it’s going to be critical to partner on this. And David
   Sanger’s book makes the point that it’s hard to get people energized
   and to take action on this if they don’t recognize how significant the
   threat is. And the threat is significant. I mean, think about the
   implications of somebody taking down a significant portion of the
   internet. You could cripple financial communities. You could—you could
   stop a lot of things. And I try not to be too sensational in these
   things but, you know, some very targeted things could have significant
   implications on electric transmission, all right? And these are things
   that ought to be alarming. And we ought to have a bright light focused
   on this and making sure that government and business are working
   together. HAASS: Yes, sir. Q: Thank you. I’m Bob Perry with the
   Stevenson Group of International Consultants. You’ve given a very
   detailed and broad view of the 5G world, primarily in the U.S. and
   maybe other developed markets. My question goes to the developing
   world, specifically Africa. Go back to the year 2000, telephone
   penetration in Africa was maybe 1, 2 percent. Then came the cellphone.
   And now you have mobile use in villages of a hundred people, two
   hundred people. The question is, the opportunity and financial
   governance challenges if 5G move into that space. HAASS: Actually, when
   you answer that, also talk about low-density areas in this country. I
   had the same question, about rural areas. STEPHENSON: You know,
   something’s happened here in the United States that doesn’t get a lot
   of attention, but this is another one of those I believe there’s a
   model here for the world. And I’ve talked to the president of Mexico
   about this, in terms of how you achieve rural coverage in Mexico and
   connect everybody not to wireless telephony, but to connectivity, the
   internet. This is an internet device now, right? And so after 9/11,
   none of the emergency responders could interact and communicate. I
   mean, communications were a disaster after 9/11. Everybody was on
   different protocols. And firemen from Pennsylvania came to New York,
   and they could communicate with New York firemen, and the police
   couldn’t communicate with the fire, and the EMS couldn’t communicate.
   And it was just really, really bad. And so Congress passed legislation
   that instructed that a nationwide network—wireless network—be built for
   the first responder community. It was a big deal. It was called
   FirstNet. And so the government finally came out and did a big bid in
   2016—put out a big bid. We went in hard on this. And this bid said:
   Whoever wins this thing must build out all of America this network for
   first responders. And whoever wins it gets this big block of spectrum,
   airwaves, to build it in. But you got to build out the whole country.
   So very detailed requirements, and specifications, and so forth on
   this. We, AT&T, went in hard, and we won this thing. And we’re building
   out this nationwide network. We’re 60-some-odd percent complete now.
   This is really an amazing thing, because you’re getting this first
   responder network that is truly—it’s a high-performance network.
   Really, really impressive. When the first responders aren’t using it,
   we’re allowed to commercialize it for anybody else. But what’s
   happening? We’re building our rural America for the first responders,
   but the network’s available for rural America. We and the United States
   government are funding this. And you know how it’s funded? It’s
   funded—I told you, we spent $40 billion over the last ten years on
   wireless airwaves at auctions. In one of those auctions, the government
   carved off a few billion dollars of the proceeds and said: This is
   going to be used to help build this network out into rural America. And
   that’s what’s happening here. And I tell you, I watch this and I just—I
   expected this to be big and significant. It’s exceeding all of my
   expectations. And I do—when I talk to government officials around the
   world, I tell them: You need to watch this. This is really important.
   In Africa, in these communities, somebody has to buy the wireless
   airwaves. They’re either releasing those airwaves or they’re paying a
   check to get those airwaves. I think governments should be thinking
   about, how do I set some of that money aside now to take and put back
   into connectivity for our communities that would not otherwise have
   connectivity. So this is a model that I think has a lot of legs could
   be used elsewhere. HAASS: Randall, we’ve only got about a minute left.
   One of the very few principles we try to keep here is that we begin and
   end meetings on time. So many of us are enthralled with the HBO show
   Succession. And after having read the letter from Elliot, what we
   really want to know is to what extent does that tell us what we need to
   know about succession at AT&T? (Laughter.) STEPHENSON: Well, first of
   all, I have no sons that I can name as my successor. I don’t think that
   would be allowed at all, anyway. But I do love that show. I hope
   everybody’s watching that show. So please, tune in this Sunday night to
   Succession. (Laughter.) OK. HAASS: Thank you very much. STEPHENSON:
   Thank you, Richard. (Applause.) Thanks a lot. (END)

   Event with Randall Stephenson September 18, 2019 CEO Speaker Series

   Europe

   C. Peter McColough Series on International Economics With Sabine
   Lautenschläger
   Sabine Lautenschläger discusses Eurozone conditions and the European
   Central Bank's economic tools, as well as the effects of U.S. trade
   policy on the global economy. The C. Peter McColough Series on
   International Economics brings the world's foremost economic
   policymakers and scholars to address members on current topics in
   international economics and U.S. monetary policy. This meeting series
   is presented by the Maurice R. Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic
   Studies.

   Event with Sabine Lautenschläger September 19, 2019 C. Peter McColough
   Series on International Economics
   View All

   Expert Spotlight
   Robert D. Blackwill Robert D. Blackwill

   Henry A. Kissinger Senior Fellow for U.S. Foreign Policy

   U.S. Foreign Policy Europe and Eurasia Russia

   War by Other Means

   Book February 11, 2016 Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic Studies
   Follow Jamille Bigio Jamille Bigio

   Senior Fellow for Women and Foreign Policy

   Women and Women's Rights Peacekeeping Conflict Prevention

   Controversy Over Sexual Violence in Conflict at the UN Security Council

   Blog Post May 3, 2019 Women Around the World
   Follow Elizabeth C. Economy Elizabeth C. Economy

   C. V. Starr Senior Fellow and Director for Asia Studies

   Asia China Energy and Environment

   The Third Revolution

   Book May 2, 2018 Asia Program
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Explainers

   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs

   1
     __________________________________________________________________

   4
   China Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen

   Pollution Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities

   China Belt and Road Tracker

   This tracker shows how the Belt and Road Initiative has changed
   countries’ bilateral economic relationships with China over time.
   Trade The Truth About Tariffs

   Tariffs have been applied over the years to protect homegrown
   industries and target competitors who are seen as using unfair trade
   practices. They impose costs on both importers and exporters and had
   been in decline until the recent U.S.-China trade spat.
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Experts in the News

   Benn Steil

   Steil: Trade War With China Will Be Factor in the Fed’s Decision-Making
   on Interest Rates

   Via CNBC September 21, 2019
   Steven A. Cook

   Cook: United States Is Prepared to Apply Further Sanctions on Iran And
   Not More

   Via CNN September 18, 2019
   Amy Myers Jaffe

   Myers Jaffe: India and China Should Decrease Their Use of Coal to Be a
   Climate-Neutral Economy

   Via Bloomberg Markets September 17, 2019
   View All

Featured Publications

   China

   The Third Revolution
   The Third Revolution argues that Xi Jinping’s dual-reform
   trajectories—a more authoritarian system at home and a more ambitious
   foreign policy abroad—provide Beijing with new levers of influence that
   the United States must learn to exploit to protect its own interests.

   Book by Elizabeth C. Economy May 2, 2018 Asia Program

   Japan

   Japan Rearmed
   Japan’s United States–imposed postwar constitution renounced the use of
   offensive military force, but, Sheila A. Smith shows, a nuclear North
   Korea and an increasingly assertive China have the Japanese rethinking
   that commitment—and their reliance on U.S. security.

   Book by Sheila A. Smith April 8, 2019 Asia Program

   U.S. Foreign Policy

   The Road Not Taken
   In chronicling the adventurous life of legendary CIA operative Edward
   Lansdale, The Road Not Taken definitively reframes our understanding of
   the Vietnam War.

   Book by Max Boot April 2, 2019
   View All

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KFS3NQ

   Skip to main content

   Search ____________________
   (BUTTON) Search
   Popular Searches
     * Iran
     * North Korea
     * Turkey
     * Syria
     * China
     * Mexico
     * Russia
     * Venezuela
     * Iraq

Trending

     * Hong Kong
     * Ukraine
     * Immigration
     * China
     * Election 2020

     * Member Login

     * Topics
          + All Topics
          + Defense & Security
          + Diplomacy & International Institutions
          + Economics
          + Energy & Environment
          + Health
          + Human Rights
          + Politics & Government
          + Social Issues
     * Regions
          + All Regions
          + Americas
          + Asia
          + Europe & Eurasia
          + Global Commons
          + Middle East & North Africa
          + Oceania
          + Sub-Saharan Africa
     * Think Tank
          + More Think Tank
          + CFR Experts
          + Centers & Programs
          + Blogs
          + In the News
          + Publications
          + Fellowships
     * CFR Presents
          + CFR Presents
          + Events
          + Series
          + Explainers
          + Quizzes
          + Podcasts
          + Conference Calls
          + Independent Task Force Program
     * CFR Campus
          + All CFR Campus
          + Academic Programs
          + Teaching Notes
          + Model Diplomacy
          + World101
     * About CFR
          + All About CFR
          + Membership
          + Member Programs
          + Outreach
          + For Media
          + Careers
          + Support CFR
          + Contact

     * Member Login

   ForeignAffairs.com
   ForeignAffairs.com
   (BUTTON) Facebook (BUTTON) Twitter (BUTTON) LinkedIn (BUTTON) Email
   (BUTTON) Print (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Share

   Hong Kong
   Ivan Abreu/SOPA Images/LightRocket/Getty Images

   Hong Kong

   Will Congress Support the Protesters?
   As violent clashes escalate, members of Congress have pushed to pass a
   bill that would address human rights abuses and Hong Kong’s declining
   autonomy.

   In Brief by Lindsay Maizland November 18, 2019


   An Independent Inquiry Is the Only Way to End the Protests

   by Jerome A. Cohen via South China Morning Post November 15, 2019


   Six Months of Hong Kong Protests. How Did We Get Here?

   via New York Times November 18, 2019
   South Africa
   AFP/Getty Images

   South Africa

   What’s Behind South Africa’s Violence?
   Recent attacks appearing to target immigrants have underscored the
   government’s struggle to combat violence and confront poverty and
   unemployment.

   In Brief by John Campbell November 15, 2019


   Afrophobia Is Growing in South Africa. Why?

   via African Arguments October 8, 2019


   Monthlong Sit-In Ends in Violent Eviction

   via Al Jazeera November 17, 2019
   Public Health

   Public Health

   The End of Antibiotics?
   Less than a century after the discovery of antibiotics, the world is at
   risk of entering an era in which the life-saving drugs no longer work.

   Backgrounder by Claire Felter November 15, 2019


   CDC: 35,000 Americans Die of Antibiotic-Resistant Infections Each Year

   via STAT November 13, 2019


   How to Outsmart Superbugs

   via Scientific American October 24, 2019
   Turkey

   Turkey

   A Status Quo Summit
   Trump and Erdogan resolved few of the sharp U.S.-Turkish differences
   over defense and Middle East policy but the visit likely boosted
   Erdogan’s stature at home.

   In Brief by Steven A. Cook November 14, 2019


   Turkish President Plays Anti-Kurd Film at Summit

   via Axios November 14, 2019


   How Erdogan Stays in Power by Reinventing His Persona

   by Kaya Genc via Foreign Affairs October 1, 2019
   Bolivia

   Bolivia

   Bolivia’s Power Vacuum
   Election fraud allegations have prompted President Evo Morales to
   resign with no clear successor, plunging Bolivia into political
   uncertainty.

   In Brief by Paul J. Angelo November 13, 2019


   The Key to Evo Morales’s Political Longevity

   by Santiago Anria and Evelyne Huber via Foreign Affairs February 14,
   2018


   Who Will Lead Bolivia Out of Its Dangerous Power Vacuum?

   by Natalia Cote-Muñoz via Americas Quarterly November 14, 2019
   Ukraine

   Ukraine

   A Time of Troubles
   Ukraine has been dogged by corruption scandals, economic mismanagement,
   and Russian interference since it achieved independence in 1991. At the
   same time, it has cultivated relations with the United States and
   Europe.

   Timeline by Andrew Chatzky November 12, 2019


   Ukraine Needs More Than Lethal Aid From the United States

   via Foreign Affairs November 8, 2019

   Ukraine

   The History of U.S.-Ukraine Relations
   Ambassador Stephen Sestanovich, CFR’s George F. Kennan senior fellow
   for Russian and Eurasian studies, sits down with James M. Lindsay to
   discuss U.S.-Ukraine ties since the fall of the Soviet Union.

   Podcast with James M. Lindsay and Stephen Sestanovich October 8, 2019
   The President's Inbox

CFR on the Record

   View All

   Turkey

   U.S.-Turkey Relations: The Shifting Nature of Two NATO Allies

   Event with Henri J. Barkey, Naz Durakoglu and Gönül Tol October 25,
   2019

   Democracy

   Tenth Annual Back-to-School Event: Live! The World Next Week
   The 2019 CFR annual Back-to-School Event celebrated the tenth
   anniversary of the podcast The World Next Week with a live taping
   before a student audience. CFR Senior Vice President James M. Lindsay,
   CFR.org Managing Editor Robert McMahon, and Deborah S. Amos of NPR and
   Princeton University looked back at the last decade and discussed the
   decline of democracy, the Middle East, and U.S.-China relations.

   Event with Deborah Susan Amos, James M. Lindsay and Robert McMahon
   October 18, 2019

   Germany

   A Conversation With Minister Olaf Scholz of Germany
   German Finance Minister Olaf Scholz discusses fighting climate change
   in multilateral settings, European economic developments, and German
   economic policy. ALLEN: Good morning. Thank you all for being here
   today. And we welcome you to today’s Council on Foreign Relations
   meeting with Olaf Scholz, the finance minister from Germany. I’m Thad
   Allen, a member of CFR’s board of directors and a senior executive
   advisor at Booz Allen Hamilton. I’ll be presiding over today’s
   discussion. And at this point, I’d like to invite Mr. Scholz to the
   podium to give his remarks. SCHOLZ: Thank you. Thank you for the kind
   introduction. Ladies and gentlemen, I’m happy to be here at the Council
   on Foreign Relations today, and I look forward to be a frank and lively
   discussion with all of you. I want to use my opening remarks to address
   a topic that concerns all of us around the globe with increasing
   urgency, tackling climate change. This year, millions of people, young
   people in particular, have taken to the streets to remind us of the
   urgency of limiting global warming. But at the same time, we have seen
   pushback from those who refuse to grapple with the reality of climate
   change, who question the science, and who deny the need to take action
   because they find it inconvenient. I would like to respond to them by
   quoting one of your founding fathers, John Adams. “Facts are stubborn
   things. And whatever may be our wishes, they cannot alter the state of
   facts and evidence.” Manmade climate change is a fact. Another fact,
   the global community hasn’t done enough so far to limit global warming.
   None of us, including Germany. Speaking for Germany, I can say we want
   to change that. To this end, the federal government has recently laid
   out its multibillion-euro climate strategy for the next decade. As I
   like to point out, to those that always insist that Germany should be
   spending more to combat climate change, Germany is investing fifty-four
   billion euros in the period until 2023. And if you look at the next
   decade, until 2030 we are in the region of one hundred and fifty
   billion euros. When we undertake such a massive task, there is one
   central question that we need to answer: What’s the point? Why do we
   bother when at the same time new coal-fired power plants are being
   built in other parts of the globe? When, as in Germany’s case, our
   share of total global emissions is about 2 percent? My answer is
   threefold. Firstly, it is the right thing to do. As industrialized
   countries, we have emitted the bulk of mankind’s greenhouse gas
   emissions until now. Now we need to acknowledge our responsibility and
   start leading the fight against climate change. Secondly, we can do it.
   We have the necessary technological and financial capacity. Germany
   prides itself on its engineering. If we can show that it is possible to
   reduce emissions significantly, and be all the more successful for it
   economically, others will follow suit. We can lead the shift to a
   low-carbon global economy. And thirdly, it is an opportunity. Yes,
   making this transition requires a big effort now, but ultimately it
   will strengthen our industrial base. From battery-powered vehicles to
   hydrogen fuel cells, we are seeing climate- friendly technologies
   improve to the point where they are becoming commercially viable,
   similarly to what happened, for example, to wind energy. The fight
   against manmade climate change will become a business opportunity. And
   in a country which prides itself on its business instincts, in a
   country of dealmakers, I say if you do not join in the fight against
   climate change you are voluntarily forgoing a great deal. Ladies and
   gentlemen, the fight against climate change will be the defining issue
   of the coming decades for all of us. Climate policy will shape all
   policy areas, economic policy in particular. By the way, we are also
   seeing this trend at the IMF. Tomorrow, on the margins of the current
   IMF and World Bank Group meeting, we will be having a special meeting
   of the coalition of finance ministers for climate action. Increasingly,
   foreign policy will have to be climate policy. The need for coordinated
   action to reduce overall emissions is only one of the channels
   connecting climate change and foreign policy. We need to consider the
   link between migration and desertification, of flooding, between water
   scarcity and the potential for international conflicts.   We all know
   that climate change poses a global challenge. And so, in the fight
   against it, we will need international cooperation and strong
   international institutions. Here, at the Council on Foreign Relations,
   in the heart of the capital of the most powerful nation in the world, I
   do not have to stress the importance of international cooperation and
   strong international institutions. Everyone is aware of this, at least
   almost everyone. Let me put it this way: The future does not belong to
   those who deny reality and isolate themselves. The future belongs to
   those who take action together. Thank you. (Applause.) ALLEN: Thank
   you, Mr. Minister, for the remarks. If I could follow up on your
   remarks and have you comment on the economic impact in Germany, on
   their economy, of the proposed climate change package you put together
   and some of the pros and cons you’ve had to deal with in cobbling that
   agreement together. SCHOLZ: I would—so it is one hundred and fifty
   billion for the next ten years. This is quite a lot of extra impact for
   the economy. But it’s more important that it also helps to do the
   necessary investments into the infrastructure, for instance, in the
   railway system, in the infrastructure of our electricity grid, in the
   infrastructure which is necessary to have new battery companies and
   things like that. So I think it will be an aspect of future growth,
   which is coming from the investments we do now. And it will be even
   more important because if we are able to produce things without
   fossil—using fossil energy, this might be of big importance in ten or
   fifteen years when anyone is willing to look for a solution like that.
   ALLEN: One of the major tools in implementing this program will be a
   carbon tax. I know there was a lot of discussion on the level of carbon
   tax, what would actually allow you to achieve your goals. Can you
   comment on that? SCHOLZ: We have a strategy where we increase the price
   for using CO2 on different levels. And we are now implementing them
   step-by-step. One of them which is already decided now is to increase
   the tax on using airplanes. So there is a special tax we already
   implemented, and we will increase it. This will be extra benefits for
   financing what we are doing, but it helps that people use the railway,
   for instance, where there is a chance to do so. And this is why we, at
   the same time, reduce the value tax at this level for trains. Then we
   will have an increase in the car taxes we take if there is a big—if
   they are producing a lot of CO2. And so we changed the way how people
   buy cars. This is what we hope. And the third thing is we will have an
   increase in the road taxes, if you would call it like this, for trucks,
   if they have very high CO2 emissions. And the last thing is then to
   have a very special CO2 taxation, which is an extra model. We will
   organize it in a way that the people have to buy certificates. And we
   start with the low price, increasing it for the next years up to 2025.
   And afterwards, there will be a market which will be built because we
   have the agreed limit of CO2 emissions by Germany in the sectors of
   transport, of housing, of heating, of every culture and small
   businesses. And this is going down each year. And if enough investment
   into reducing CO2 emissions would have been done before, the price will
   increase. I think if nothing would happen it will increase up to a
   hundred euros per ton of CO2. And knowing this, I hope—and all of us
   hope—that this will have an impact on private—on decisions in the
   future. ALLEN: I think any great technological challenge, at least in
   this day in age, cannot be solved by an individual country or the
   private sector. There’s a large automobile manufacturing industry in
   Germany. Can you comment on the public-private conversation that goes
   on around an agreement like this, and how you actually interact with
   the private sector, specifically the automobile manufacturing sector?
   SCHOLZ: The first thing to understand is there is nothing—there is
   nothing like a German car industry. There is a European car industry.
   And this is a market of four hundred and fifty million people living
   there, if we expect that the United Kingdom will have left the European
   Union soon. But there is a common decision about CO2 emissions, which
   are allowed for cars in the next years, and a very strong aim for 2030.
   This is due for cars and for trucks. And it’s very similar what is
   happening in China, for instance. So big markets of the world are
   giving regulations, which are saying the production of CO2, the
   emission of CO2 should be reduced, otherwise you will have to pay a lot
   of extra money in this case to the European Union. And this is the
   field where all our activities are now taking part, because they are an
   environment where anyone knows there is a big market that asks for
   other cars, which will be battery electric cars, which will be plug-in
   hybrids, which will be in the end, especially for the big ones,
   hydrogen with—using hydrogen with—and all the things which are
   necessary for that. And I think that this is now going on. Because the
   market is big enough, what we now do is building the infrastructure.
   Our aim is now one hundred—one million charging points for electricity
   in the streets. ALLEN: Thank you. Since you mentioned Brexit, it looks
   like the outline of an agreement is coming together, at latest from the
   press reports. Can you comment on how this is actually moving along,
   and the potential economic impacts for not only Germany, but the
   European Union and specifically the euro? SCHOLZ: It’s a good message
   that there is, again, an agreement on how the Brexit could take part.
   It is much later than we expected, but in the end it is early enough if
   the House of Commons will accept it tomorrow. And I hope that they will
   do. It’s good for the U.K. economy, because they would suffer a lot if
   there would be a hard Brexit. It’s good also for Europe, because there
   is some uncertainty which is related to a hard Brexit. We are prepared
   for that. Mostly in the financial sector there will be no problems
   because anything is done, and it’s more virtual. You can do it easily.
   The bigger problems are coming from the supply chain of goods in
   Europe, because there is already something where a car that is produced
   is produced at forty places, and it’s going back and forth. And if you
   interrupt this supply chain, this has a negative impact on economic
   growth. So I would be very happy if we will not have to suffer from
   those problems. ALLEN: Thank you. One of the issues with introducing
   new technologies, and I think we see this globally, is the transition
   of workforces at new jobs. You have a very strong apprentice model in
   Germany. Any comments regarding how you’ve been able to adapt to
   changes in technology, some of the things that you just mentioned, and
   how you actually build the workforce to do that? SCHOLZ: The most
   important thing is that we have to invest in research and development.
   This is my—I’m absolutely sure about that. And if you look at what
   Germany is doing this is quite a lot. It’s more than 3 percent of GDP
   now, which is one of the reasons for the global competitiveness of the
   German economy. But the other part of skilled labor. And, yes, we have
   this model of apprenticeship which is working really well. The more
   important question is to convince young men and women leaving the
   schools that this is something they should use for their activities and
   for their—for their vocation, for their training. And the second is to
   convince the companies that they offer something like that, like an
   apprenticeship. And this should be changed due to the new needs. So now
   anyone is in the car industry, trying to figure out how to people could
   deal with electricity, which is not the case in this size today. My
   view is that we not—should be not just successful at university and at
   the vocational training schools to react to the changing request of the
   economy due to technical reasons. We also should be able to have a
   better chance for adult people to change their profession. So my view
   is something of an apprenticeship which is better financed than when
   you are seventeen years old or so, but with forty-six or fifty-one, to
   take a new job if the world changed. And I think this is one of the
   things that people expect from us for being safe in an always changing
   world. ALLEN: Thank you. As you know, we’re pretty occupied in this
   country right now with issues related to trade between the U.S. and
   China. I wonder if you want to comment on the impact that has on the
   European Union and Germany specifically, that maybe is not caught up in
   the discussion that we hear, which tends to be bilateral between the
   U.S. and China. SCHOLZ: We are very much looking at the trade conflict
   between the United States and China, because it has already an impact
   on the global economy. And this is not just because of tariffs. They
   have an impact, and anyone can find out that they will reduce growth,
   and they are already doing in United States, in China, and in the rest
   of the world. But the more important aspect of this conflict is that
   there is a growing uncertainty. And if those taking decisions in the
   companies all over the world are not sure what the future will be
   about, they postpone their decisions. And the lower growth in the
   global economy we face today is the—is the direct outcome of postponing
   decisions because no one is sure what will be the future about. And so
   this is one of the reasons why this conflict should end as soon as
   possible. And it would be a good message for world economy if this
   would happen. ALLEN: Thank you. Assuming that Brexit occurs and you’re
   not dealing with the British pound, just the euro community, there have
   been some stresses in the past, the—Greece and others. How do you see
   the European position to move forward and deal with those kind of
   challenges when they arise? SCHOLZ: When the U.K. will have left the
   European Union, 85 percent of GDP will be directly produced in Europe.
   There is—there are two countries now directly asking for participating
   in the euro system very soon. And I think that earlier than anyone
   expects, all the rest of the countries will follow. We don’t know yet
   if this will be in five or ten years, but it will be earlier than
   anyone thinks. And then the whole European Union will have one currency
   in the end. I’m sure about this. And we managed to be more effective in
   fighting crises. We did so with Ireland, with Spain, with Portugal,
   with Cyprus, and with Greece—especially the Greek program was the
   biggest program in the world to save a country that lost its contact
   with the world—to the financial markets—bigger than any program the IMF
   financed before. And this shows that there is a lot of strength in
   Europe to do things like that. And now we build the necessary
   institutions, and we are remodeling them now at this time to be more
   successful. Also, to act much—a long time before a real crisis appears
   on the scenery. And this will be one of the aspects of the changing
   agreements we are looking for in Europe. We did our political work the
   last year, and we are now doing the legal work to make it feasible.
   ALLEN: Moving beyond the euro, we live in a digital world and we’ve
   seen the rise of digital currency. Would appreciate any thoughts you
   might have on how that’s evolved. And recently Facebook indicated that
   they might launch their own digital currency. Your views? SCHOLZ:
   First, to be—frankly, there is a technical and economic question, which
   is related to this approach. And this is that there should be a better
   payment system. Cross-border payments should be faster and should cost
   less than they do today. And the payment systems within our countries
   need to improve as well. So there is something to do and to organize.
   But this is not the reason for building a new private-owned currency. I
   think this would be a danger for all democratic states, but in the end
   for all states, if the sovereignty on currency is moving from states to
   private-owned companies. And I would like to say directly, this should
   not happen. It was not the best model of developing the world to have
   this private companies, like the West Indies investment companies from
   London and from Amsterdam. We shouldn’t have something—like in a
   currency way—in our twenty-first century. ALLEN: Thank you. Interested
   in your views in the context of what we’ve just been discussing about
   the European Central Bank and the future of that institution moving
   forward. SCHOLZ: The European Central Bank was successful in fighting
   the last crisis. And President Draghi was really successful when he
   said that they will do whatever it takes. And I think this was the
   important sentence for making this a strong currency that is able to
   fight any difficult situation. And now, after all the reforms we have
   done and the reforms we are working on, I think the European Central
   Bank is stable. And with the new president, Madam Lagarde, who has a
   lot of experience and who made a very great job at the IMF, I’m sure
   that this institution will be able to do the right decisions, in all
   the different economic situations we will have to survive. ALLEN: Thank
   you. There’s been some discussion about the possibility or the
   potential for a larger European budget, the ability to do eurozone
   public bonds. Your views? SCHOLZ: These are two questions. I very much
   supported the idea of my French colleague that we should do something
   about the eurozone budget. And we made a common proposal to our friends
   in the European Union and the euro group. Now we succeeded to get
   consensus on a special model, which is not including any aspect that
   was in the discussion in the beginning, but in the end we will have it.
   It will have a small size in the beginning, but it is the model to
   enlarge it, if there is the time to enlarge it. And so the more
   important question is to have the institutional framework for acting,
   which is taking years to get it. And now when we will get it, we have
   it to use it for immediate action, if there is a need for it. And this
   is, I think, what is the best advantage from the proposal and from the
   agreements that we had in the last meeting of the finance ministers in
   Europe. My view on bonds is that we need to build something like really
   working banking union. And my idea is that we should very much look to
   the United States, because this is also—or, this is a federal state.
   They have some central institutions that work quite well. And so we
   have to understand how in a big continent like the United States is—in
   the end, it is feasible to have a united banking system. The FDIC is
   something we have to look at, and things like that. And if we do this,
   I think there will be more stability in the banking sector in Europe.
   It will be much more able to solve problems with—for financing we will
   have a better growth. But this is the next big task. And if we do so, I
   think sovereign bonds will be part of the banking sheets in the end.
   And they will have—they have to find out how they do it themselves.
   ALLEN: Across the range of topics we’ve talked about this morning
   you’ve emphasized multilateral institutions and cooperation as a way to
   move ahead. My last question, before we go to the fellows here in the
   room is, just your general view on multilateral institutions,
   transatlantic partnerships. And moving, and this world is getting more
   complex, and the tension between nationalist and populist movements,
   and where do you see all this headed? SCHOLZ: I think the only way for
   a good future is the multilateral approach. We will be not successful
   just to look at our own nations, because the world is getting closer.
   And it is better to cooperate. My view on the world of 2050, or of the
   world in hundred years is more or less that there will be big
   countries. The United States will be one of them, and obviously the
   strongest, as they are today. But there will be other strong countries
   or groups. Hopefully Europe will be one of them. There will be still
   Russia, there will be China, but there will be also India. And if you
   just look at India and China and their part of GDP they had two
   hundred, three hundred years ago, this is something which gives us an
   advice how the world will be in thirty-forty years. And knowing this,
   it is really wise now to work for a multilateral world that works and
   not to do the things which are more on the line to avoid situations
   with a lot of strong nations. ALLEN: Thank you. At this time, I’d like
   to invite members to join our conversation with their questions. Just a
   couple of reminders. This meeting is on the record. Please wait for the
   microphone and speak directly into it. And please stand and state your
   name and your affiliation. And if you can limit your request to one
   question and allow as many members as possible to speak. At this time,
   we’ll take your questions. Q: My name is Hattie Babbitt. I’m on the
   board of director of the World Resources Institute, which is a global
   environmental think tank, but based in Washington. And I’d like to get
   back to the climate change issue. One of the things that has happened
   in the environmental community in the past has been that we have been
   shuffled to the environment ministry in discussing climate change. You
   spoke very eloquently about the role that the finance ministers are now
   playing in this. And I wonder if you could talk about how you have been
   successful—those of you—those of you who are finance ministers and
   dealing with this—in bringing together the health ministries, the
   people involved within your governments on refugees, on what—those
   other issues that all feed into the climate change issue. It’s herding
   cats, in some cases. And I’d be grateful for your—to learn how. SCHOLZ:
   We should understand that climate change is one of the really big
   challenges we are facing, and that it is not—we will be not successful
   if we just act in the responsibility of the ministry that is
   responsible for climate, and environment, and things like that. So
   cooperation is necessary, and that we understand that all the different
   decisions we take are linked to each other. If we are not successful in
   fighting climate change, this will have deep impacts on the economy.
   This will have impacts on the situation of refugees, as you already
   mentioned. This will have impact on the natural resources we can use,
   and so on. And so I think this is absolutely key that we understand
   this is nothing we just let those who are directly responsible. We have
   to cooperate, and we have to think about the necessary steps. So my
   view is governments should have a common strategy to fight against
   climate change. And we should discuss on international levels with all
   those involved in the different views of the question. But we must go
   from literature, discussing, speeches and things like that. We must go
   to action. This is the real change that needs to happen now. ALLEN:
   I’ll come back over here. Q: Hi. My name is Charles Reynolds, State
   Department Foreign Service officer going out to Berlin for my next
   assignment. I’d like to know if you can talk about the shape of the
   state of Germany’s economy and if there is potentially a global
   slowdown how that may affect you, and what steps you’re taking to
   prepare for that. SCHOLZ: First, the economic situation in Germany is
   not that bad. We have the highest number of people employed we had
   ever. And there’s—all the forecasts say that there will be a continuous
   increase in labor, and people at the workforce. So in the dimensions of
   Germany, we are now—have more than 45 million people employed, which is
   really a lot. And we haven’t had that much ever in the past. And we
   have a lot of industries, not just but also construction, where they
   are desperately looking for better capacities because they are not able
   to work for all the requests which are there on the market. And we have
   quite a very stable situation in the inner market of Germany. So there
   is an increase in growth coming from that, which helps in the difficult
   situation we have due to the global economy. We had to support the
   situation with reducing taxes for low- and middle-income families. We
   increased the support for childs in the families. We will get mostly
   rid of a special tax we implemented after German unification for
   financing it. So there is a lot of impulses for growth coming from
   Germany itself. But in the end, if you are a really competitive economy
   that’s successful on the global market with goods and services, as
   lower growth in the world has an impact on your economy. There is
   no—nothing to avoid that. But if you understand that there is this
   slower growth, we are still having a quite—not a difficult situation.
   This is my view on that—on that aspect. And just referring to some of
   the public debates we sometimes have, we have the biggest figure of
   public investment financed by the federal budget we have had ever and
   this is how just supported also by these special decisions we took on
   climate change, and the investments related to that. ALLEN: Thank you.
   Q: So there is a growing view that monetary policy has been pushed too
   far, to the detriment of the economy. That emergency measures in the
   past have been regularly applied to non-urgent conditions. So how do
   member states, especially important ones like Germany, play a role to
   help steer a different course going forward? SCHOLZ: I think we did a
   lot to understand the situation. We have very good supervision
   institutions. Not just the European Central Bank, but many others. And
   they cooperate a lot in the world. So our knowledge about the
   difficulties in the financial system, problems that may come up, are
   much better than they had been before. And after the last crisis, we
   took a lot of decisions to have better regulations. I’m a bit afraid
   that now, at this stage, some people think they should get rid of them,
   which I think would be a mistake because they had good reasons for
   being implemented. And if we are working on this field very exactly and
   understand the development in the financial system well enough, we are
   able to act very soon if there—if a problem is coming up. And just for
   looking at the European Union, already mentioned that aside of the
   European Central Bank we built up the European Stability Mechanism,
   which is giving us the ability to support a country that has—that’s
   losing contact with the financial markets. We have the ability through
   this system to help a country out of a difficult structural crisis. And
   we now are remodeling it to have better instruments. This will be
   supported also by the eurozone budget we spoke about before. And we
   built up a system of how to deal with banks that are relevant for
   financial security. And there is a supervision or an authority that has
   been built in Europe. And we built a fund that is financed by the banks
   to the resolution of banks, if necessary. So there is a lot of activity
   that has been done to be much more prepared for a difficult situation
   than we were ten years ago. And this is a reason for being quite
   confident that we will be able to manage situations. ALLEN: Thank you.
   In the back. Q: Thanks. I’m Megan Greene. I’m a senior fellow at the
   Harvard Kennedy School. And some of my colleagues have put together
   this atlas of economic complexity. I’m not sure if you’ve seen it, but
   Germany is a terrifying outlier on it. So they basically look at
   countries and what they produce, and connectiveness of what they
   produce. So how easy is it, if you produce one thing, to jump into
   something else? And it turns out for Germany, it scores very low on
   connectiveness. It’s really easy for Germany to jump into other
   industries. They also look at complexity, so how easy is it for you to
   move up the value chain and boost your productivity. And there, Germany
   is actually already at the top, which suggests there’s really no more
   room for Germany to move up the value chain. And this suggests, you
   know, the common narrative is that Germany needs to provide fiscal
   stimulus, and that will solve everything. This actually suggests that
   won’t solve much of anything. So I’m just wondering if you have any
   plans at all for what to do about this connectivity, complexity
   problem. Because Germany really is an outlier here. SCHOLZ: So in a
   situation where the economy is running quite well and where we have a
   lot of people employed, and where a lot of Mittelstand companies are
   successful in the world market, it is quite—it is—I do not agree that
   there is not an ability to develop new technologies and to be
   successful in the future markets. I think many of them do. The main
   aspect of this is spending money for research and development, which is
   happening quite well. And we are increasing it right now. We are
   launching a new act which is dealing with the question of supporting
   research activities in private medium-sized companies to have it not
   just in the big corporates but also in many other activities in the
   business environment. So I believe that we would be able to react to
   different situations. And what is happening now is that the country is
   remodeling itself and becoming more independent from fossil energies.
   And this will help us to be successful in the future as well. My view
   is, just to give you the figure, that it is necessary to increase
   research and development as the aspect of getting the future, and not
   just having it in some companies, and not just having it at
   universities and research institutions—which is something the state can
   do—but also enabling the companies to do it all very broadly. And this
   was the mood of the past. Now they have to do the necessary decisions.
   My view is that if we make it, for instance, to have mobility that is
   not related on fossil energies, but working with batteries, with
   plug-in hybrids, with hydrogen, this will be something which will
   support the activities of many companies, not just big car producers
   but all the supplier industries around. And this is the same with the
   energy supply in the country. This is the same in investment into
   infrastructure for supporting the digital development. What is the
   things we have to do in Europe and in Germany? I think we have to make
   it more easy to have big digital companies that are able to be
   successful on the world market. Some of them occur, but they are not of
   the size they should have to—if you look at the dimension of the
   European Union. And working in this field, I think, not just on
   legislation but also on legislation, not just on research but also on
   research, and not just in business but also in business, I think is
   key. Q: Hi. Andrea Shalal. I just wanted to build on that question.
   ALLEN: Who are you with? Q: I’m with Reuters. Andrea Shalal with
   Reuters. I wanted to build on that question. So in—there is a lot of
   sense that China kind of won the artificial intelligence race, and a
   lot of the sort of development on higher-end technologies, and that
   Europe has waited too long to get into that game. You’ve just mentioned
   this lack of critical mass on companies. Do you anticipate any changes
   coming? I mean, are you able to convince the EU—the new EU Commission
   that perhaps there should be sort of mega-companies and mergers
   allowed? And then, just very quickly on the technology piece, where do
   you see opportunities for Germany and for Europe to get ahead or get
   into a sort of pull position to make a difference in the future
   technologies? SCHOLZ: Most things will depend on whether we are
   successful in continuing the building of the European Union and its
   market. The next step is the banking union. And this should have—and
   the capital market union—to make it more successful, as they are today.
   And one of the outcomes should be that there is a change in the way how
   we finance the business. If you compare the United States to Europe,
   you will find that 80 percent of financing the business is equity. In
   Europe, it’s 20 percent. And my view is that there should be a change.
   And building the banking union and the capital market union could be a
   way to get there, and to get further growth for those companies who are
   successful in inventing new technologies, which is happening all over
   Europe. But they should always understand that there is market that
   they can reach very soon, and which is not fragmented. And this must be
   the European Union, with its four hundred and fifty million
   inhabitants. And we should cooperate in questions like artificial
   intelligence, and increase our public research activities, which we are
   doing. This is happening in most of the countries. Germany is doing a
   lot. France is doing a lot. Many other also. And if we join our forces,
   I think there is a chance that this is the basis for then later
   business models coming from that. We are working in the question of
   some cooperation in this field. And if we continue to do things like
   that, it is not that difficult. Where we should have a better progress
   is better cooperation. And it must be necessary that the next
   commission is working how we can make it easier that two things are
   happening. First, new companies to become big very soon, and being
   supported by equity markets so that they can grow by this support. And
   looking at the whole European market as the first one to get. And
   second, the opportunity for those companies who could be successful in
   the world market if they get together. And I think there is something
   that should be changed. The third is that we are very successful in
   opening markets, especially our own, but we are not very successful in
   defending the markets. So we did a lot that big payment companies now
   can get into cooperation with any bank in Europe. But we did not make
   it feasible that these banks could cooperate with the payment companies
   and ask them to give them access to their technical opportunities for
   their clients. And this is just a big mistake, and I think it will stop
   very soon. Q: Hi. Rebecca Patterson from Bessemer Trust. I’m an
   investor. It seems to me that there’s a difficult challenge that Europe
   so far has been very successful with, which is managing or balancing
   national, economic and political priorities with the regional European
   monetary union and EU goals. And you talked about the importance of
   working across countries to succeed in the future, whether it’s banking
   union, et cetera. Do you think there’s enough leadership within the
   monetary union today to drive that forward at the speed that’s
   required? And do you think that the German population appreciates the
   need to be thinking not only domestically but also regionally? You’ve
   got a strong consumer in Germany. What’s pulling down Germany is broad.
   It’s not domestic. SCHOLZ: Yes, there is a need for leadership. And as
   I’m part of this leadership in Europe, I think we will be successful.
   (Laughter.) And to the second question, just to give you an idea, on
   the question of banking union we are working very hard. And I will also
   make my own proposals on those questions very soon, because I think it
   is not wise just to speak about it. As in the question of climate
   change, we have to go to action. We have to understand what is the
   right way to do. And this is why I said we have to look at the United
   States. They have their banking union, in a way. And learning from
   that, we could do something, which is then a European approach which
   would be successful. And the second question, about the people if they
   accept that it is better for them to be part of a strong European
   economy and a strong and sovereign European Union, yes, I think there
   is a broad majority in Germany understanding it. And if you argue in
   the questions and explain what is necessary for it, I think you will
   have the support of the people. There is no need for being afraid. Q:
   Hello. Brad Setser. I’m a senior fellow here at the Council on Foreign
   Relations.  I’m wondering if you would be willing to comment on the
   consequences of negative interest rates for fiscal policy, both in
   Germany but also for European fiscal rules. And in particular, do you
   believe that it is still necessary for questions like France and Italy
   to aim to bring their debt-to-GDP ratios down to 60 percent? SCHOLZ: I
   think that it is one of the key advantages in building the European
   Central Bank Germany fought for that we have an independent central
   bank. So the decisions on interest rates, which are taken by the
   central bank and all the activities they undertake, are their business.
   We are discussing with them, we have our own views on the one or the
   other discussion. But if you are the one that was fighting for
   independence, you cannot always intervene and say, please do it the
   following, because this would be a wrong arrangement in this field. So
   I think, just looking at the past, that the European Central Bank more
   or less did necessary things. And especially what Mr. Draghi said when
   there was the big crisis. And what he did was a big advantage, which
   saved the European economies. And we should not forget that. This is my
   view on this question. So we will see what will happen the next time.
   My view on interest rates is that the problem is not just a question of
   central banks, neither in Europe, nor in the Bank of England, nor the
   Fed, or the Bank of Japan, or—and so on. There is a lot of money in the
   world looking for interest and for ways to earn money. And if they
   are—and they have to go to the real economy, and to invest more in this
   field. But this is the question we are dealing with. And as it is the
   case that we have that much money, this will have an impact on interest
   rates, aside of the activities of the central banks. It’s not just a
   central bank question, to my—this is my point of view. On the
   GDP—debt-to-GDP ratio, I think it’s wise to have a stable financial
   situation. You should do it very intelligent, to look at the situation
   where you are in and where you want to get to. In the case of Germany,
   when there was the last crisis we increased the debt-to-GDP ratio to 80
   percent. Now we are doing down this year down under 60 percent. And
   having this idea of being able to act in a crisis, but using better
   times to get to a lower debt-to-GDP ratio I think is still wise,
   because the strength in the crisis is key for the ability to do
   something against negative impacts coming from a world economy
   slowdown, and things like that. And the message for Germany is we would
   be able to do anything necessary. And this is, I think, a good message.
   ALLEN: I’ll throw a question in. Would you care to comment on the
   current large current account surplus in Germany, and certainly the
   larger eurozone, and what should be done, if anything, to bring it
   down? SCHOLZ: The surplus is the outcome of business activities. And it
   was already mentioned, there was a question about it, but the strong
   Mittelstrand companies being competitive on the world market are the
   reason for the surplus. And in the end, any country needs some
   companies that are not just acting on the home market, but also
   worldwide. And they may be small. They may have just five hundred
   employees, or two hundred, or two thousand or so. But if they are
   competitive, this is the key reason for strength, and economic
   strength. And the outcome of this sometimes is then the surplus you
   mentioned. For the future, just to give you some figures, there is more
   than $500 billion which are invested in research and development by the
   United States. It’s a bit smaller from China, but they are at this
   size. Japan is at about $170 billion research and development. Germany
   is about $130-140 billion. The rest is following far behind. If the
   European Union would do the same as Germany is doing, investing more
   than 3 percent of GDP in research and development, it would be $600
   billion. And this is one of the answers to your question. Q: Gale
   Mattox from the U.S. Naval Academy. Let me ask you another percentage,
   and that is the one that this administration mentioned often, and
   that’s the 2 percent for defense. Where do you stand on this? And will
   you meet the Wales summit percentage that you agreed to? SCHOLZ: We
   increased the military budget in the last years more than we did all
   the years before. And we did it due to needs from our defense forces.
   And this is part of our activities within the NATO, since we are
   supporting very much transatlantic partnership and all the things
   related to that. We are always doing it in a way that we can finance it
   from our budget. And this is, I think, the most important message. What
   we do, we will be able to continue to do in the next years. And if we
   have increases, they should be not just for one year, or for two. They
   should be something that is stable for the future as well. And
   constantly we are working on this question, looking at our budget
   abilities, and things like that. And as you look—see from the past,
   there has been a bigger increase than we had before. ALLEN: Maybe I’ll
   close out with a question related to our conversation before we came
   in. If you read the minister’s biography, you know he’s a former mayor
   of Hamburg, Germany, a major seaport. We had a discussion, maybe we
   could extend it into the room here, sir, on maritime transportation
   growth. Ninety-five percent of the goods that come in and out of the
   United States go by sea. There are environmental issues related to
   that. There are cyber issues. There are issues regarding modernization
   of ports. You had some interesting views. Would you like to share them?
   SCHOLZ: Yeah. We had a very interesting debate on that question. I
   hadn’t expected it, but it was really something which I was—I discussed
   about very much when I was the mayor of the city of Hamburg. I think we
   should understand that for globalization and for the global economy,
   shipping is key. It’s a cheap transport we have. And without the ships,
   and without the containers, all the possibilities we—advantages we had
   from globalization would not happen. But we have to manage it in a way
   that it is good for our future. So we have to reduce emissions. It is
   necessary that decisions are taken, and that we try to implement it
   into the shipping systems. We have to do something with the ports, so
   that there is less emissions-producing problems for the people. And for
   instance, I think we should make it feasible that when they are at the
   shore, in the port, they should—they should use electricity from land
   and not from the ship with some diesel, and things like that. And we
   should discuss about something, which is getting away from a permanent
   growth of the size of ships. So we are now—we reached twenty thousand
   containers, and more. I don’t think that we should give—go far beyond
   that, because this would have constantly new investments necessary in
   all the ports all over the world. This would enforce dredging and
   things like that all over the world, which is not the best thing for
   the environment. And so international agreement possibly about the size
   of ships and the further enlargement could be helpful for environment
   and for the world economy. ALLEN: Thank you. We have time for one final
   question. Otherwise, we’ll give you back a couple minutes here. Thank
   you very much, sir, for joining us this morning. We appreciate it.
   (Applause.) (END)

   Event with Olaf Scholz October 18, 2019

   Economics

   C. Peter McColough Series on International Economics With Jens Weidmann
   Jens Weidmann discusses the challenges facing the Deutsche Bundesbank,
   the role of central banks in Europe, and the global effects of
   transatlantic trade tensions. This event is cosponsored with the
   American Council on Germany. The C. Peter McColough Series on
   International Economics brings the world's foremost economic
   policymakers and scholars to address members on current topics in
   international economics and U.S. monetary policy. This meeting series
   is presented by the Maurice R. Greenberg Center for Geoeconomic
   Studies.

   Event with Jens Weidmann October 16, 2019 C. Peter McColough Series on
   International Economics
   View All

   Expert Spotlight
   Follow Carla Anne Robbins Carla Anne Robbins

   Adjunct Senior Fellow

   Defense and Security Cuba North Korea

   What Can We Know and When Can We Know It?

   Via The American Interest March 18, 2017
   Follow Brad W. Setser Brad W. Setser

   Steven A. Tananbaum Senior Fellow for International Economics

   International Economic Policy Capital Flows Economics

   Ireland’s Statistical Cry for Help…

   Blog Post October 30, 2019 Follow the Money
   Follow Max Boot Max Boot

   Jeane J. Kirkpatrick Senior Fellow for National Security Studies

   U.S. Foreign Policy Defense and Security Military History

   The Deadly Protests Shaking Iraq: What to Know

   In Brief October 30, 2019
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Explainers

   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs
   Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen
   Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities
   Belt and Road Tracker
   The Truth About Tariffs

   1
     __________________________________________________________________

   4
   China Photos: Thirty Years of Protests in China Since Tiananmen

   Pollution Why Air Pollution Is So Bad in Asia's Cities

   China Belt and Road Tracker

   This tracker shows how the Belt and Road Initiative has changed
   countries’ bilateral economic relationships with China over time.
   Trade The Truth About Tariffs

   Tariffs have been applied over the years to protect homegrown
   industries and target competitors who are seen as using unfair trade
   practices. They impose costs on both importers and exporters and had
   been in decline until the recent U.S.-China trade spat.
   (BUTTON) Previous
   View All
   (BUTTON) Next

Experts in the News

   Gayle Tzemach Lemmon

   Tzemach Lemmon: Women on the Front Lines in Syria Are Fighting for
   Security and Stability

   Via PBS NewsHour October 23, 2019
   Jennifer Anne Hillman

   Hillman: Chaos Is Creating a Downward Pull on the Global Economy

   Via Bloomberg Markets October 15, 2019
   Steven A. Cook

   Cook: U.S. Withdrawal From Syria Would Allow Russia to Act With
   Impunity

   Via Chedder October 8, 2019
   View All

Featured Publications

   Public Health

   Plagues and the Paradox of Progress
   Global health expert Thomas J. Bollyky explores the paradox in our
   fight against infectious disease: the world is getting healthier in
   ways that should make us worry.

   Book by Thomas J. Bollyky September 1, 2018 Global Health Program

   Conflict Prevention

   Preventive Engagement
   Stares proposes a comprehensive new strategy for how the United States
   can manage an increasingly turbulent world and reduce the risk of
   costly military commitments.

   Book by Paul B. Stares November 28, 2017 Center for Preventive Action

   China

   The Third Revolution
   The Third Revolution argues that Xi Jinping’s dual-reform
   trajectories—a more authoritarian system at home and a more ambitious
   foreign policy abroad—provide Beijing with new levers of influence that
   the United States must learn to exploit to protect its own interests.

   Book by Elizabeth C. Economy May 2, 2018 Asia Program
   View All

     * About CFR
     * Think Tank
     * Support CFR
     * For Media
     * Careers
     * Contact Us

   Daily News Brief Sign up for a morning roundup of news and analysis
   from around the world.

   Url ____________________________________________________________
   Email Address
   ____________________________________________________________
   Submit

   Thanks for signing up!

   Check your Email Address.

   Browse more CFR newsletters

   ©2019 Council on Foreign Relations. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   and Terms of Use.
